The morning had dawned clear and cold, with a crispness that hinted at the end of summer. They set forth at daybreak to see a man beheaded, twenty in all, and Bran rode among them, nervous with excitement. This was the first time he had been deemed old enough to go with his lord father and his brothers to see the king’s justice done. It was the ninth year of summer, and the seventh of Bran’s life.
The man had been taken outside a small holdfast in the hills. Robb thought he was a wildling, his sword sworn to Mance Rayder, the King-beyond-the-Wall. It made Bran’s skin prickle to think of it. He remembered the hearth tales Old Nan told them. The wildlings were cruel men, she said, slavers and slayers and thieves. They consorted with giants and ghouls, stole girl children in the dead of night, and drank blood from polished horns. And their women lay with the Others in the Long Night to sire terrible half-human children.
But the man they found bound hand and foot to the holdfast wall awaiting the king’s justice was old and scrawny, not much taller than Robb. He had lost both ears and a finger to frostbite, and he dressed all in black, the same as a brother of the Night’s Watch, except that his furs were ragged and greasy.
The breath of man and horse mingled, steaming, in the cold morning air as his lord father had the man cut down from the wall and dragged before them. Robb and Jon sat tall and still on their horses, with Bran between them on his pony, trying to seem older than seven, trying to pretend that he’d seen all this before. A faint wind blew through the holdfast gate. Over their heads flapped the banner of the Starks of Winterfell: a grey direwolf racing across an ice-white field.
Bran’s father sat solemnly on his horse, long brown hair stirring in the wind. His closely trimmed beard was shot with white, making him look older than his thirty-five years. He had a grim cast to his grey eyes this day, and he seemed not at all the man who would sit before the fire in the evening and talk softly of the age of heroes and the children of the forest. He had taken off Father’s face, Bran thought, and donned the face of Lord Stark of Winterfell.
There were questions asked and answers given there in the chill of morning, but afterward Bran could not recall much of what had been said. Finally his lord father gave a command, and two of his guardsmen dragged the ragged man to the ironwood stump in the center of the square. They forced his head down onto the hard black wood. Lord Eddard Stark dismounted and his ward Theon Greyjoy brought forth the sword. “Ice,” that sword was called. It was as wide across as a man’s hand, and taller even than Robb. The blade was Valyrian steel, spell-forged and dark as smoke. Nothing held an edge like Valyrian steel.
His father peeled off his gloves and handed them to Jory Cassel, the captain of his household guard. He took hold of Ice with both hands and said, “In the name of Robert of the House Baratheon, the First of his Name, King of the Andals and the Rhoynar and the First Men, Lord of the Seven Kingdoms and Protector of the Realm, by the word of Eddard of the House Stark, Lord of Winterfell and Warden of the North, I do sentence you to die.” He lifted the greatsword high above his head.
Bran’s bastard brother Jon Snow moved closer. “Keep the pony well in hand,” he whispered. “And don’t look away. Father will know if you do.”
Bran kept his pony well in hand, and did not look away.
His father took off the man’s head with a single sure stroke. Blood sprayed out across the snow, as red as summerwine. One of the horses reared and had to be restrained to keep from bolting. Bran could not take his eyes off the blood. The snows around the stump drank it eagerly, reddening as he watched.
The head bounced off a thick root and rolled. It came up near Greyjoy’s feet. Theon was a lean, dark youth of nineteen who found everything amusing. He laughed, put his boot on the head, and kicked it away.
“Ass,” Jon muttered, low enough so Greyjoy did not hear. He put a hand on Bran’s shoulder, and Bran looked over at his bastard brother. “You did well,” Jon told him solemnly. Jon was fourteen, an old hand at justice.
It seemed colder on the long ride back to Winterfell, though the wind had died by then and the sun was higher in the sky. Bran rode with his brothers, well ahead of the main party, his pony struggling hard to keep up with their horses.
“The deserter died bravely,” Robb said. He was big and broad and growing every day, with his mother’s coloring, the fair skin, red-brown hair, and blue eyes of the Tullys of Riverrun. “He had courage, at the least.”
“No,” Jon Snow said quietly. “It was not courage. This one was dead of fear. You could see it in his eyes, Stark.” Jon’s eyes were a grey so dark they seemed almost black, but there was little they did not see. He was of an age with Robb, but they did not look alike. Jon was slender where Robb was muscular, dark where Robb was fair, graceful and quick where his half brother was strong and fast.
Robb was not impressed. “The Others take his eyes,” he swore. “He died well. Race you to the bridge?”
“Done,” Jon said, kicking his horse forward. Robb cursed and followed, and they galloped off down the trail, Robb laughing and hooting, Jon silent and intent. The hooves of their horses kicked up showers of snow as they went.
Bran did not try to follow. His pony could not keep up. He had seen the ragged man’s eyes, and he was thinking of them now. After a while, the sound of Robb’s laughter receded, and the woods grew silent again.
So deep in thought was he that he never heard the rest of the party until his father moved up to ride beside him. “Are you well, Bran?” he asked, not unkindly.
“Yes, Father,” Bran told him. He looked up. Wrapped in his furs and leathers, mounted on his great warhorse, his lord father loomed over him like a giant. “Robb says the man died bravely, but Jon says he was afraid.”
“What do you think?” his father asked.
Bran thought about it. “Can a man still be brave if he’s afraid?”
“That is the only time a man can be brave,” his father told him. “Do you understand why I did it?”
“He was a wildling,” Bran said. “They carry off women and sell them to the Others.”
His lord father smiled. “Old Nan has been telling you stories again. In truth, the man was an oathbreaker, a deserter from the Night’s Watch. No man is more dangerous. The deserter knows his life is forfeit if he is taken, so he will not flinch from any crime, no matter how vile. But you mistake me. The question was not why the man had to die, but why I must do it.”
Bran had no answer for that. “King Robert has a headsman,” he said, uncertainly.
“He does,” his father admitted. “As did the Targaryen kings before him. Yet our way is the older way. The blood of the First Men still flows in the veins of the Starks, and we hold to the belief that the man who passes the sentence should swing the sword. If you would take a man’s life, you owe it to him to look into his eyes and hear his final words. And if you cannot bear to do that, then perhaps the man does not deserve to die.
“One day, Bran, you will be Robb’s bannerman, holding a keep of your own for your brother and your king, and justice will fall to you. When that day comes, you must take no pleasure in the task, but neither must you look away. A ruler who hides behind paid executioners soon forgets what death is.”
That was when Jon reappeared on the crest of the hill before them. He waved and shouted down at them. “Father, Bran, come quickly, see what Robb has found!” Then he was gone again.
Jory rode up beside them. “Trouble, my lord?”
“Beyond a doubt,” his lord father said. “Come, let us see what mischief my sons have rooted out now.” He sent his horse into a trot. Jory and Bran and the rest came after.
They found Robb on the riverbank north of the bridge, with Jon still mounted beside him. The late summer snows had been heavy this moonturn. Robb stood knee-deep in white, his hood pulled back so the sun shone in his hair. He was cradling something in his arm, while the boys talked in hushed, excited voices.
The riders picked their way carefully through the drifts, groping for solid footing on the hidden, uneven ground. Jory Cassel and Theon Greyjoy were the first to reach the boys. Greyjoy was laughing and joking as he rode. Bran heard the breath go out of him. “Gods!” he exclaimed, struggling to keep control of his horse as he reached for his sword.
Jory’s sword was already out. “Robb, get away from it!” he called as his horse reared under him.
Robb grinned and looked up from the bundle in his arms. “She can’t hurt you,” he said. “She’s dead, Jory.”
Bran was afire with curiosity by then. He would have spurred the pony faster, but his father made them dismount beside the bridge and approach on foot. Bran jumped off and ran.
By then Jon, Jory, and Theon Greyjoy had all dismounted as well. “What in the seven hells is it?” Greyjoy was saying.
“A wolf,” Robb told him.
“A freak,” Greyjoy said. “Look at the size of it.”
Bran’s heart was thumping in his chest as he pushed through a waist-high drift to his brothers’ side.
Half-buried in bloodstained snow, a huge dark shape slumped in death. Ice had formed in its shaggy grey fur, and the faint smell of corruption clung to it like a woman’s perfume. Bran glimpsed blind eyes crawling with maggots, a wide mouth full of yellowed teeth. But it was the size of it that made him gasp. It was bigger than his pony, twice the size of the largest hound in his father’s kennel.
“It’s no freak,” Jon said calmly. “That’s a direwolf. They grow larger than the other kind.”
Theon Greyjoy said, “There’s not been a direwolf sighted south of the Wall in two hundred years.”
“I see one now,” Jon replied.
Bran tore his eyes away from the monster. That was when he noticed the bundle in Robb’s arms. He gave a cry of delight and moved closer. The pup was a tiny ball of grey-black fur, its eyes still closed. It nuzzled blindly against Robb’s chest as he cradled it, searching for milk among his leathers, making a sad little whimpery sound. Bran reached out hesitantly. “Go on,” Robb told him. “You can touch him.”
Bran gave the pup a quick nervous stroke, then turned as Jon said, “Here you go.” His half brother put a second pup into his arms. “There are five of them.” Bran sat down in the snow and hugged the wolf pup to his face. Its fur was soft and warm against his cheek.
“Direwolves loose in the realm, after so many years,” muttered Hullen, the master of horse. “I like it not.”
“It is a sign,” Jory said.
Father frowned. “This is only a dead animal, Jory,” he said. Yet he seemed troubled. Snow crunched under his boots as he moved around the body. “Do we know what killed her?”
“There’s something in the throat,” Robb told him, proud to have found the answer before his father even asked. “There, just under the jaw.”
His father knelt and groped under the beast’s head with his hand. He gave a yank and held it up for all to see. A foot of shattered antler, tines snapped off, all wet with blood.
A sudden silence descended over the party. The men looked at the antler uneasily, and no one dared to speak. Even Bran could sense their fear, though he did not understand.
His father tossed the antler to the side and cleansed his hands in the snow. “I’m surprised she lived long enough to whelp,” he said. His voice broke the spell.
“Maybe she didn’t,” Jory said. “I’ve heard tales … maybe the bitch was already dead when the pups came.”
“Born with the dead,” another man put in. “Worse luck.”
“No matter,” said Hullen. “They be dead soon enough too.”
Bran gave a wordless cry of dismay.
“The sooner the better,” Theon Greyjoy agreed. He drew his sword. “Give the beast here, Bran.”
The little thing squirmed against him, as if it heard and understood. “No!” Bran cried out fiercely. “It’s mine.”
“Put away your sword, Greyjoy,” Robb said. For a moment he sounded as commanding as their father, like the lord he would someday be. “We will keep these pups.”
“You cannot do that, boy,” said Harwin, who was Hullen’s son.
“It be a mercy to kill them,” Hullen said.
Bran looked to his lord father for rescue, but got only a frown, a furrowed brow. “Hullen speaks truly, son. Better a swift death than a hard one from cold and starvation.”
“No!” He could feel tears welling in his eyes, and he looked away. He did not want to cry in front of his father.
Robb resisted stubbornly. “Ser Rodrik’s red bitch whelped again last week,” he said. “It was a small litter, only two live pups. She’ll have milk enough.”
“She’ll rip them apart when they try to nurse.”
“Lord Stark,” Jon said. It was strange to hear him call Father that, so formal. Bran looked at him with desperate hope. “There are five pups,” he told Father. “Three male, two female.”
“What of it, Jon?”
“You have five trueborn children,” Jon said. “Three sons, two daughters. The direwolf is the sigil of your House. Your children were meant to have these pups, my lord.”
Bran saw his father’s face change, saw the other men exchange glances. He loved Jon with all his heart at that moment. Even at seven, Bran understood what his brother had done. The count had come right only because Jon had omitted himself. He had included the girls, included even Rickon, the baby, but not the bastard who bore the surname Snow, the name that custom decreed be given to all those in the north unlucky enough to be born with no name of their own.
Their father understood as well. “You want no pup for yourself, Jon?” he asked softly.
“The direwolf graces the banners of House Stark,” Jon pointed out. “I am no Stark, Father.”
Their lord father regarded Jon thoughtfully. Robb rushed into the silence he left. “I will nurse him myself, Father,” he promised. “I will soak a towel with warm milk, and give him suck from that.”
“Me too!” Bran echoed.
The lord weighed his sons long and carefully with his eyes. “Easy to say, and harder to do. I will not have you wasting the servants’ time with this. If you want these pups, you will feed them yourselves. Is that understood?”
Bran nodded eagerly. The pup squirmed in his grasp, licked at his face with a warm tongue.
“You must train them as well,” their father said. “You must train them. The kennelmaster will have nothing to do with these monsters, I promise you that. And the gods help you if you neglect them, or brutalize them, or train them badly. These are not dogs to beg for treats and slink off at a kick. A direwolf will rip a man’s arm off his shoulder as easily as a dog will kill a rat. Are you sure you want this?”
“Yes, Father,” Bran said.
“Yes,” Robb agreed.
“The pups may die anyway, despite all you do.”
“They won’t die,” Robb said. “We won’t let them die.”
“Keep them, then. Jory, Desmond, gather up the other pups. It’s time we were back to Winterfell.”
It was not until they were mounted and on their way that Bran allowed himself to taste the sweet air of victory. By then, his pup was snuggled inside his leathers, warm against him, safe for the long ride home. Bran was wondering what to name him.
Halfway across the bridge, Jon pulled up suddenly.
“What is it, Jon?” their lord father asked.
“Can’t you hear it?”
Bran could hear the wind in the trees, the clatter of their hooves on the ironwood planks, the whimpering of his hungry pup, but Jon was listening to something else.
“There,” Jon said. He swung his horse around and galloped back across the bridge. They watched him dismount where the direwolf lay dead in the snow, watched him kneel. A moment later he was riding back to them, smiling.
“He must have crawled away from the others,” Jon said.
“Or been driven away,” their father said, looking at the sixth pup. His fur was white, where the rest of the litter was grey. His eyes were as red as the blood of the ragged man who had died that morning. Bran thought it curious that this pup alone would have opened his eyes while the others were still blind.
“An albino,” Theon Greyjoy said with wry amusement. “This one will die even faster than the others.”
Jon Snow gave his father’s ward a long, chilling look. “I think not, Greyjoy,” he said. “This one belongs to me.”

The hunt left at dawn. The king wanted wild boar at the feast tonight. Prince Joffrey rode with his father, so Robb had been allowed to join the hunters as well. Uncle Benjen, Jory, Theon Greyjoy, Ser Rodrik, and even the queen’s funny little brother had all ridden out with them. It was the last hunt, after all. On the morrow they left for the south.
Bran had been left behind with Jon and the girls and Rickon. But Rickon was only a baby and the girls were only girls and Jon and his wolf were nowhere to be found. Bran did not look for him very hard. He thought Jon was angry at him. Jon seemed to be angry at everyone these days. Bran did not know why. He was going with Uncle Ben to the Wall, to join the Night’s Watch. That was almost as good as going south with the king. Robb was the one they were leaving behind, not Jon.
For days, Bran could scarcely wait to be off. He was going to ride the kingsroad on a horse of his own, not a pony but a real horse. His father would be the Hand of the King, and they were going to live in the red castle at King’s Landing, the castle the Dragonlords had built. Old Nan said there were ghosts there, and dungeons where terrible things had been done, and dragon heads on the walls. It gave Bran a shiver just to think of it, but he was not afraid. How could he be afraid? His father would be with him, and the king with all his knights and sworn swords.
Bran was going to be a knight himself someday, one of the Kingsguard. Old Nan said they were the finest swords in all the realm. There were only seven of them, and they wore white armor and had no wives or children, but lived only to serve the king. Bran knew all the stories. Their names were like music to him. Serwyn of the Mirror Shield. Ser Ryam Redwyne. Prince Aemon the Dragonknight. The twins Ser Erryk and Ser Arryk, who had died on one another’s swords hundreds of years ago, when brother fought sister in the war the singers called the Dance of the Dragons. The White Bull, Gerold Hightower. Ser Arthur Dayne, the Sword of the Morning. Barristan the Bold.
Two of the Kingsguard had come north with King Robert. Bran had watched them with fascination, never quite daring to speak to them. Ser Boros was a bald man with a jowly face, and Ser Meryn had droopy eyes and a beard the color of rust. Ser Jaime Lannister looked more like the knights in the stories, and he was of the Kingsguard too, but Robb said he had killed the old mad king and shouldn’t count anymore. The greatest living knight was Ser Barristan Selmy, Barristan the Bold, the Lord Commander of the Kingsguard. Father had promised that they would meet Ser Barristan when they reached King’s Landing, and Bran had been marking the days on his wall, eager to depart, to see a world he had only dreamed of and begin a life he could scarcely imagine.
Yet now that the last day was at hand, suddenly Bran felt lost. Winterfell had been the only home he had ever known. His father had told him that he ought to say his farewells today, and he had tried. After the hunt had ridden out, he wandered through the castle with his wolf at his side, intending to visit the ones who would be left behind, Old Nan and Gage the cook, Mikken in his smithy, Hodor the stableboy who smiled so much and took care of his pony and never said anything but “Hodor,” the man in the glass gardens who gave him a blackberry when he came to visit …
But it was no good. He had gone to the stable first, and seen his pony there in its stall, except it wasn’t his pony anymore, he was getting a real horse and leaving the pony behind, and all of a sudden Bran just wanted to sit down and cry. He turned and ran off before Hodor and the other stableboys could see the tears in his eyes. That was the end of his farewells. Instead Bran spent the morning alone in the godswood, trying to teach his wolf to fetch a stick, and failing. The wolfling was smarter than any of the hounds in his father’s kennel and Bran would have sworn he understood every word that was said to him, but he showed very little interest in chasing sticks.
He was still trying to decide on a name. Robb was calling his Grey Wind, because he ran so fast. Sansa had named hers Lady, and Arya named hers after some old witch queen in the songs, and little Rickon called his Shaggydog, which Bran thought was a pretty stupid name for a direwolf. Jon’s wolf, the white one, was Ghost. Bran wished he had thought of that first, even though his wolf wasn’t white. He had tried a hundred names in the last fortnight, but none of them sounded right.
Finally he got tired of the stick game and decided to go climbing. He hadn’t been up to the broken tower for weeks with everything that had happened, and this might be his last chance.
He raced across the godswood, taking the long way around to avoid the pool where the heart tree grew. The heart tree had always frightened him; trees ought not have eyes, Bran thought, or leaves that looked like hands. His wolf came sprinting at his heels. “You stay here,” he told him at the base of the sentinel tree near the armory wall. “Lie down. That’s right. Now stay.”
The wolf did as he was told. Bran scratched him behind the ears, then turned away, jumped, grabbed a low branch, and pulled himself up. He was halfway up the tree, moving easily from limb to limb, when the wolf got to his feet and began to howl.
Bran looked back down. His wolf fell silent, staring up at him through slitted yellow eyes. A strange chill went through him. He began to climb again. Once more the wolf howled. “Quiet,” he yelled. “Sit down. Stay. You’re worse than Mother.” The howling chased him all the way up the tree, until finally he jumped off onto the armory roof and out of sight.
The rooftops of Winterfell were Bran’s second home. His mother often said that Bran could climb before he could walk. Bran could not remember when he first learned to walk, but he could not remember when he started to climb either, so he supposed it must be true.
To a boy, Winterfell was a grey stone labyrinth of walls and towers and courtyards and tunnels spreading out in all directions. In the older parts of the castle, the halls slanted up and down so that you couldn’t even be sure what floor you were on. The place had grown over the centuries like some monstrous stone tree, Maester Luwin told him once, and its branches were gnarled and thick and twisted, its roots sunk deep into the earth.
When he got out from under it and scrambled up near the sky, Bran could see all of Winterfell in a glance. He liked the way it looked, spread out beneath him, only birds wheeling over his head while all the life of the castle went on below. Bran could perch for hours among the shapeless, rain-worn gargoyles that brooded over the First Keep, watching it all: the men drilling with wood and steel in the yard, the cooks tending their vegetables in the glass garden, restless dogs running back and forth in the kennels, the silence of the godswood, the girls gossiping beside the washing well. It made him feel like he was lord of the castle, in a way even Robb would never know.
It taught him Winterfell’s secrets too. The builders had not even leveled the earth; there were hills and valleys behind the walls of Winterfell. There was a covered bridge that went from the fourth floor of the bell tower across to the second floor of the rookery. Bran knew about that. And he knew you could get inside the inner wall by the south gate, climb three floors and run all the way around Winterfell through a narrow tunnel in the stone, and then come out on ground level at the north gate, with a hundred feet of wall looming over you. Even Maester Luwin didn’t know that, Bran was convinced.
His mother was terrified that one day Bran would slip off a wall and kill himself. He told her that he wouldn’t, but she never believed him. Once she made him promise that he would stay on the ground. He had managed to keep that promise for almost a fortnight, miserable every day, until one night he had gone out the window of his bedroom when his brothers were fast asleep.
He confessed his crime the next day in a fit of guilt. Lord Eddard ordered him to the godswood to cleanse himself. Guards were posted to see that Bran remained there alone all night to reflect on his disobedience. The next morning Bran was nowhere to be seen. They finally found him fast asleep in the upper branches of the tallest sentinel in the grove.
As angry as he was, his father could not help but laugh. “You’re not my son,” he told Bran when they fetched him down, “you’re a squirrel. So be it. If you must climb, then climb, but try not to let your mother see you.”
Bran did his best, although he did not think he ever really fooled her. Since his father would not forbid it, she turned to others. Old Nan told him a story about a bad little boy who climbed too high and was struck down by lightning, and how afterward the crows came to peck out his eyes. Bran was not impressed. There were crows’ nests atop the broken tower, where no one ever went but him, and sometimes he filled his pockets with corn before he climbed up there and the crows ate it right out of his hand. None of them had ever shown the slightest bit of interest in pecking out his eyes.
Later, Maester Luwin built a little pottery boy and dressed him in Bran’s clothes and flung him off the wall into the yard below, to demonstrate what would happen to Bran if he fell. That had been fun, but afterward Bran just looked at the maester and said, “I’m not made of clay. And anyhow, I never fall.”
Then for a while the guards would chase him whenever they saw him on the roofs, and try to haul him down. That was the best time of all. It was like playing a game with his brothers, except that Bran always won. None of the guards could climb half so well as Bran, not even Jory. Most of the time they never saw him anyway. People never looked up. That was another thing he liked about climbing; it was almost like being invisible.
He liked how it felt too, pulling himself up a wall stone by stone, fingers and toes digging hard into the small crevices between. He always took off his boots and went barefoot when he climbed; it made him feel as if he had four hands instead of two. He liked the deep, sweet ache it left in the muscles afterward. He liked the way the air tasted way up high, sweet and cold as a winter peach. He liked the birds: the crows in the broken tower, the tiny little sparrows that nested in cracks between the stones, the ancient owl that slept in the dusty loft above the old armory. Bran knew them all.
Most of all, he liked going places that no one else could go, and seeing the grey sprawl of Winterfell in a way that no one else ever saw it. It made the whole castle Bran’s secret place.
His favorite haunt was the broken tower. Once it had been a watchtower, the tallest in Winterfell. A long time ago, a hundred years before even his father had been born, a lightning strike had set it afire. The top third of the structure had collapsed inward, and the tower had never been rebuilt. Sometimes his father sent ratters into the base of the tower, to clean out the nests they always found among the jumble of fallen stones and charred and rotten beams. But no one ever got up to the jagged top of the structure now except for Bran and the crows.
He knew two ways to get there. You could climb straight up the side of the tower itself, but the stones were loose, the mortar that held them together long gone to ash, and Bran never liked to put his full weight on them.
The best way was to start from the godswood, shinny up the tall sentinel, and cross over the armory and the guards hall, leaping roof to roof, barefoot so the guards wouldn’t hear you overhead. That brought you up to the blind side of the First Keep, the oldest part of the castle, a squat round fortress that was taller than it looked. Only rats and spiders lived there now but the old stones still made for good climbing. You could go straight up to where the gargoyles leaned out blindly over empty space, and swing from gargoyle to gargoyle, hand over hand, around to the north side. From there, if you really stretched, you could reach out and pull yourself over to the broken tower where it leaned close. The last part was the scramble up the blackened stones to the eyrie, no more than ten feet, and then the crows would come round to see if you’d brought any corn.
Bran was moving from gargoyle to gargoyle with the ease of long practice when he heard the voices. He was so startled he almost lost his grip. The First Keep had been empty all his life.
“I do not like it,” a woman was saying. There was a row of windows beneath him, and the voice was drifting out of the last window on this side. “You should be the Hand.”
“Gods forbid,” a man’s voice replied lazily. “It’s not an honor I’d want. There’s far too much work involved.”
Bran hung, listening, suddenly afraid to go on. They might glimpse his feet if he tried to swing by.
“Don’t you see the danger this puts us in?” the woman said. “Robert loves the man like a brother.”
“Robert can barely stomach his brothers. Not that I blame him. Stannis would be enough to give anyone indigestion.”
“Don’t play the fool. Stannis and Renly are one thing, and Eddard Stark is quite another. Robert will listen to Stark. Damn them both. I should have insisted that he name you, but I was certain Stark would refuse him.”
“We ought to count ourselves fortunate,” the man said. “The king might as easily have named one of his brothers, or even Littlefinger, gods help us. Give me honorable enemies rather than ambitious ones, and I’ll sleep more easily by night.”
They were talking about Father, Bran realized. He wanted to hear more. A few more feet … but they would see him if he swung out in front of the window.
“We will have to watch him carefully,” the woman said.
“I would sooner watch you,” the man said. He sounded bored. “Come back here.”
“Lord Eddard has never taken any interest in anything that happened south of the Neck,” the woman said. “Never. I tell you, he means to move against us. Why else would he leave the seat of his power?”
“A hundred reasons. Duty. Honor. He yearns to write his name large across the book of history, to get away from his wife, or both. Perhaps he just wants to be warm for once in his life.”
“His wife is Lady Arryn’s sister. It’s a wonder Lysa was not here to greet us with her accusations.”
Bran looked down. There was a narrow ledge beneath the window, only a few inches wide. He tried to lower himself toward it. Too far. He would never reach.
“You fret too much. Lysa Arryn is a frightened cow.”
“That frightened cow shared Jon Arryn’s bed.”
“If she knew anything, she would have gone to Robert before she fled King’s Landing.”
“When he had already agreed to foster that weakling son of hers at Casterly Rock? I think not. She knew the boy’s life would be hostage to her silence. She may grow bolder now that he’s safe atop the Eyrie.”
“Mothers.” The man made the word sound like a curse. “I think birthing does something to your minds. You are all mad.” He laughed. It was a bitter sound. “Let Lady Arryn grow as bold as she likes. Whatever she knows, whatever she thinks she knows, she has no proof.” He paused a moment. “Or does she?”
“Do you think the king will require proof?” the woman said. “I tell you, he loves me not.”
“And whose fault is that, sweet sister?”
Bran studied the ledge. He could drop down. It was too narrow to land on, but if he could catch hold as he fell past, pull himself up … except that might make a noise, draw them to the window. He was not sure what he was hearing, but he knew it was not meant for his ears.
“You are as blind as Robert,” the woman was saying.
“If you mean I see the same thing, yes,” the man said. “I see a man who would sooner die than betray his king.”
“He betrayed one already, or have you forgotten?” the woman said. “Oh, I don’t deny he’s loyal to Robert, that’s obvious. What happens when Robert dies and Joff takes the throne? And the sooner that comes to pass, the safer we’ll all be. My husband grows more restless every day. Having Stark beside him will only make him worse. He’s still in love with the sister, the insipid little dead sixteen-year-old. How long till he decides to put me aside for some new Lyanna?”
Bran was suddenly very frightened. He wanted nothing so much as to go back the way he had come, to find his brothers. Only what would he tell them? He had to get closer, Bran realized. He had to see who was talking.
The man sighed. “You should think less about the future and more about the pleasures at hand.”
“Stop that!” the woman said. Bran heard the sudden slap of flesh on flesh, then the man’s laughter.
Bran pulled himself up, climbed over the gargoyle, crawled out onto the roof. This was the easy way. He moved across the roof to the next gargoyle, right above the window of the room where they were talking.
“All this talk is getting very tiresome, sister,” the man said. “Come here and be quiet.”
Bran sat astride the gargoyle, tightened his legs around it, and swung himself around, upside down. He hung by his legs and slowly stretched his head down toward the window. The world looked strange upside down. A courtyard swam dizzily below him, its stones still wet with melted snow.
Bran looked in the window.
Inside the room, a man and a woman were wrestling. They were both naked. Bran could not tell who they were. The man’s back was to him, and his body screened the woman from view as he pushed her up against a wall.
There were soft, wet sounds. Bran realized they were kissing. He watched, wide-eyed and frightened, his breath tight in his throat. The man had a hand down between her legs, and he must have been hurting her there, because the woman started to moan, low in her throat. “Stop it,” she said, “stop it, stop it. Oh, please …” But her voice was low and weak, and she did not push him away. Her hands buried themselves in his hair, his tangled golden hair, and pulled his face down to her breast.
Bran saw her face. Her eyes were closed and her mouth was open, moaning. Her golden hair swung from side to side as her head moved back and forth, but still he recognized the queen.
He must have made a noise. Suddenly her eyes opened, and she was staring right at him. She screamed.
Everything happened at once then. The woman pushed the man away wildly, shouting and pointing. Bran tried to pull himself up, bending double as he reached for the gargoyle. He was in too much of a hurry. His hand scraped uselessly across smooth stone, and in his panic his legs slipped, and suddenly he was falling. There was an instant of vertigo, a sickening lurch as the window flashed past. He shot out a hand, grabbed for the ledge, lost it, caught it again with his other hand. He swung against the building, hard. The impact took the breath out of him. Bran dangled, one-handed, panting.
Faces appeared in the window above him.
The queen. And now Bran recognized the man beside her. They looked as much alike as reflections in a mirror.
“He saw us,” the woman said shrilly.
“So he did,” the man said.
Bran’s fingers started to slip. He grabbed the ledge with his other hand. Fingernails dug into unyielding stone. The man reached down. “Take my hand,” he said. “Before you fall.”
Bran seized his arm and held on tight with all his strength. The man yanked him up to the ledge. “What are you doing?” the woman demanded.
The man ignored her. He was very strong. He stood Bran up on the sill. “How old are you, boy?”
“Seven,” Bran said, shaking with relief. His fingers had dug deep gouges in the man’s forearm. He let go sheepishly.
The man looked over at the woman. “The things I do for love,” he said with loathing. He gave Bran a shove.
Screaming, Bran went backward out the window into empty air. There was nothing to grab on to. The courtyard rushed up to meet him.
Somewhere off in the distance, a wolf was howling. Crows circled the broken tower, waiting for corn.

It seemed as though he had been falling for years.
Fly, a voice whispered in the darkness, but Bran did not know how to fly, so all he could do was fall.
Maester Luwin made a little boy of clay, baked him till he was hard and brittle, dressed him in Bran’s clothes, and flung him off a roof. Bran remembered the way he shattered. “But I never fall,” he said, falling.
The ground was so far below him he could barely make it out through the grey mists that whirled around him, but he could feel how fast he was falling, and he knew what was waiting for him down there. Even in dreams, you could not fall forever. He would wake up in the instant before he hit the ground, he knew. You always woke up in the instant before you hit the ground.
And if you don’t? the voice asked.
The ground was closer now, still far far away, a thousand miles away, but closer than it had been. It was cold here in the darkness. There was no sun, no stars, only the ground below coming up to smash him, and the grey mists, and the whispering voice. He wanted to cry.
Not cry. Fly.
“I can’t fly,” Bran said. “I can’t, I can’t …”
How do you know? Have you ever tried?
The voice was high and thin. Bran looked around to see where it was coming from. A crow was spiraling down with him, just out of reach, following him as he fell. “Help me,” he said.
I’m trying, the crow replied. Say, got any corn?
Bran reached into his pocket as the darkness spun dizzily around him. When he pulled his hand out, golden kernels slid from between his fingers into the air. They fell with him.
The crow landed on his hand and began to eat.
“Are you really a crow?” Bran asked.
Are you really falling? the crow asked back.
“It’s just a dream,” Bran said.
Is it? asked the crow.
“I’ll wake up when I hit the ground,” Bran told the bird.
You’ll die when you hit the ground, the crow said. It went back to eating corn.
Bran looked down. He could see mountains now, their peaks white with snow, and the silver thread of rivers in dark woods. He closed his eyes and began to cry.
That won’t do any good, the crow said. I told you, the answer is flying, not crying. How hard can it be. I’m doing it. The crow took to the air and flapped around Bran’s hand.
“You have wings,” Bran pointed out.
Maybe you do too.
Bran felt along his shoulders, groping for feathers.
There are different kinds of wings, the crow said.
Bran was staring at his arms, his legs. He was so skinny, just skin stretched taut over bones. Had he always been so thin? He tried to remember. A face swam up at him out of the grey mist, shining with light, golden. “The things I do for love,” it said.
Bran screamed.
The crow took to the air, cawing. Not that, it shrieked at him. Forget that, you do not need it now, put it aside, put it away. It landed on Bran’s shoulder, and pecked at him, and the shining golden face was gone.
Bran was falling faster than ever. The grey mists howled around him as he plunged toward the earth below. “What are you doing to me?” he asked the crow, tearful.
Teaching you how to fly.
“I can’t fly!”
You’re flying right now.
“I’m falling!”
Every flight begins with a fall, the crow said. Look down.
“I’m afraid …”
LOOK DOWN!
Bran looked down, and felt his insides turn to water. The ground was rushing up at him now. The whole world was spread out below him, a tapestry of white and brown and green. He could see everything so clearly that for a moment he forgot to be afraid. He could see the whole realm, and everyone in it.
He saw Winterfell as the eagles see it, the tall towers looking squat and stubby from above, the castle walls just lines in the dirt. He saw Maester Luwin on his balcony, studying the sky through a polished bronze tube and frowning as he made notes in a book. He saw his brother Robb, taller and stronger than he remembered him, practicing swordplay in the yard with real steel in his hand. He saw Hodor, the simple giant from the stables, carrying an anvil to Mikken’s forge, hefting it onto his shoulder as easily as another man might heft a bale of hay. At the heart of the godswood, the great white weirwood brooded over its reflection in the black pool, its leaves rustling in a chill wind. When it felt Bran watching, it lifted its eyes from the still waters and stared back at him knowingly.
He looked east, and saw a galley racing across the waters of the Bite. He saw his mother sitting alone in a cabin, looking at a bloodstained knife on a table in front of her, as the rowers pulled at their oars and Ser Rodrik leaned across a rail, shaking and heaving. A storm was gathering ahead of them, a vast dark roaring lashed by lightning, but somehow they could not see it.
He looked south, and saw the great blue-green rush of the Trident. He saw his father pleading with the king, his face etched with grief. He saw Sansa crying herself to sleep at night, and he saw Arya watching in silence and holding her secrets hard in her heart. There were shadows all around them. One shadow was dark as ash, with the terrible face of a hound. Another was armored like the sun, golden and beautiful. Over them both loomed a giant in armor made of stone, but when he opened his visor, there was nothing inside but darkness and thick black blood.
He lifted his eyes and saw clear across the narrow sea, to the Free Cities and the green Dothraki sea and beyond, to Vaes Dothrak under its mountain, to the fabled lands of the Jade Sea, to Asshai by the Shadow, where dragons stirred beneath the sunrise.
Finally he looked north. He saw the Wall shining like blue crystal, and his bastard brother Jon sleeping alone in a cold bed, his skin growing pale and hard as the memory of all warmth fled from him. And he looked past the Wall, past endless forests cloaked in snow, past the frozen shore and the great blue-white rivers of ice and the dead plains where nothing grew or lived. North and north and north he looked, to the curtain of light at the end of the world, and then beyond that curtain. He looked deep into the heart of winter, and then he cried out, afraid, and the heat of his tears burned on his cheeks.
Now you know, the crow whispered as it sat on his shoulder. Now you know why you must live.
“Why?” Bran said, not understanding, falling, falling.
Because winter is coming.
Bran looked at the crow on his shoulder, and the crow looked back. It had three eyes, and the third eye was full of a terrible knowledge. Bran looked down. There was nothing below him now but snow and cold and death, a frozen wasteland where jagged blue-white spires of ice waited to embrace him. They flew up at him like spears. He saw the bones of a thousand other dreamers impaled upon their points. He was desperately afraid.
“Can a man still be brave if he’s afraid?” he heard his own voice saying, small and far away.
And his father’s voice replied to him. “That is the only time a man can be brave.”
Now, Bran, the crow urged. Choose. Fly or die.
Death reached for him, screaming.
Bran spread his arms and flew.
Wings unseen drank the wind and filled and pulled him upward. The terrible needles of ice receded below him. The sky opened up above. Bran soared. It was better than climbing. It was better than anything. The world grew small beneath him.
“I’m flying!” he cried out in delight.
I’ve noticed, said the three-eyed crow. It took to the air, flapping its wings in his face, slowing him, blinding him. He faltered in the air as its pinions beat against his cheeks. Its beak stabbed at him fiercely, and Bran felt a sudden blinding pain in the middle of his forehead, between his eyes.
“What are you doing?” he shrieked.
The crow opened its beak and cawed at him, a shrill scream of fear, and the grey mists shuddered and swirled around him and ripped away like a veil, and he saw that the crow was really a woman, a serving woman with long black hair, and he knew her from somewhere, from Winterfell, yes, that was it, he remembered her now, and then he realized that he was in Winterfell, in a bed high in some chilly tower room, and the black-haired woman dropped a basin of water to shatter on the floor and ran down the steps, shouting, “He’s awake, he’s awake, he’s awake.”
Bran touched his forehead, between his eyes. The place where the crow had pecked him was still burning, but there was nothing there, no blood, no wound. He felt weak and dizzy. He tried to get out of bed, but nothing happened.
And then there was movement beside the bed, and something landed lightly on his legs. He felt nothing. A pair of yellow eyes looked into his own, shining like the sun. The window was open and it was cold in the room, but the warmth that came off the wolf enfolded him like a hot bath. His pup, Bran realized … or was it? He was so big now. He reached out to pet him, his hand trembling like a leaf.
When his brother Robb burst into the room, breathless from his dash up the tower steps, the direwolf was licking Bran’s face. Bran looked up calmly. “His name is Summer,” he said.

In the yard below, Rickon ran with the wolves.
Bran watched from his window seat. Wherever the boy went, Grey Wind was there first, loping ahead to cut him off, until Rickon saw him, screamed in delight, and went pelting off in another direction. Shaggydog ran at his heels, spinning and snapping if the other wolves came too close. His fur had darkened until he was all black, and his eyes were green fire. Bran’s Summer came last. He was silver and smoke, with eyes of yellow gold that saw all there was to see. Smaller than Grey Wind, and more wary. Bran thought he was the smartest of the litter. He could hear his brother’s breathless laughter as Rickon dashed across the hard-packed earth on little baby legs.
His eyes stung. He wanted to be down there, laughing and running. Angry at the thought, Bran knuckled away the tears before they could fall. His eighth name day had come and gone. He was almost a man grown now, too old to cry.
“It was just a lie,” he said bitterly, remembering the crow from his dream. “I can’t fly. I can’t even run.”
“Crows are all liars,” Old Nan agreed, from the chair where she sat doing her needlework. “I know a story about a crow.”
“I don’t want any more stories,” Bran snapped, his voice petulant. He had liked Old Nan and her stories once. Before. But it was different now. They left her with him all day now, to watch over him and clean him and keep him from being lonely, but she just made it worse. “I hate your stupid stories.”
The old woman smiled at him toothlessly. “My stories? No, my little lord, not mine. The stories are, before me and after me, before you too.”
She was a very ugly old woman, Bran thought spitefully; shrunken and wrinkled, almost blind, too weak to climb stairs, with only a few wisps of white hair left to cover a mottled pink scalp. No one really knew how old she was, but his father said she’d been called Old Nan even when he was a boy. She was the oldest person in Winterfell for certain, maybe the oldest person in the Seven Kingdoms. Nan had come to the castle as a wet nurse for a Brandon Stark whose mother had died birthing him. He had been an older brother of Lord Rickard, Bran’s grandfather, or perhaps a younger brother, or a brother to Lord Rickard’s father. Sometimes Old Nan told it one way and sometimes another. In all the stories the little boy died at three of a summer chill, but Old Nan stayed on at Winterfell with her own children. She had lost both her sons to the war when King Robert won the throne, and her grandson was killed on the walls of Pyke during Balon Greyjoy’s rebellion. Her daughters had long ago married and moved away and died. All that was left of her own blood was Hodor, the simpleminded giant who worked in the stables, but Old Nan just lived on and on, doing her needlework and telling her stories.
“I don’t care whose stories they are,” Bran told her, “I hate them.” He didn’t want stories and he didn’t want Old Nan. He wanted his mother and father. He wanted to go running with Summer loping beside him. He wanted to climb the broken tower and feed corn to the crows. He wanted to ride his pony again with his brothers. He wanted it to be the way it had been before.
“I know a story about a boy who hated stories,” Old Nan said with her stupid little smile, her needles moving all the while, click click click, until Bran was ready to scream at her.
It would never be the way it had been, he knew. The crow had tricked him into flying, but when he woke up he was broken and the world was changed. They had all left him, his father and his mother and his sisters and even his bastard brother Jon. His father had promised he would ride a real horse to King’s Landing, but they’d gone without him. Maester Luwin had sent a bird after Lord Eddard with a message, and another to Mother and a third to Jon on the Wall, but there had been no answers. “Ofttimes the birds are lost, child,” the maester had told him. “There’s many a mile and many a hawk between here and King’s Landing, the message may not have reached them.” Yet to Bran it felt as if they had all died while he had slept … or perhaps Bran had died, and they had forgotten him. Jory and Ser Rodrik and Vayon Poole had gone too, and Hullen and Harwin and Fat Tom and a quarter of the guard.
Only Robb and baby Rickon were still here, and Robb was changed. He was Robb the Lord now, or trying to be. He wore a real sword and never smiled. His days were spent drilling the guard and practicing his swordplay, making the yard ring with the sound of steel as Bran watched forlornly from his window. At night he closeted himself with Maester Luwin, talking or going over account books. Sometimes he would ride out with Hallis Mollen and be gone for days at a time, visiting distant holdfasts. Whenever he was away more than a day, Rickon would cry and ask Bran if Robb was ever coming back. Even when he was home at Winterfell, Robb the Lord seemed to have more time for Hallis Mollen and Theon Greyjoy than he ever did for his brothers.
“I could tell you the story about Brandon the Builder,” Old Nan said. “That was always your favorite.”
Thousands and thousands of years ago, Brandon the Builder had raised Winterfell, and some said the Wall. Bran knew the story, but it had never been his favorite. Maybe one of the other Brandons had liked that story. Sometimes Nan would talk to him as if he were her Brandon, the baby she had nursed all those years ago, and sometimes she confused him with his uncle Brandon, who was killed by the Mad King before Bran was even born. She had lived so long, Mother had told him once, that all the Brandon Starks had become one person in her head.
“That’s not my favorite,” he said. “My favorites were the scary ones.” He heard some sort of commotion outside and turned back to the window. Rickon was running across the yard toward the gatehouse, the wolves following him, but the tower faced the wrong way for Bran to see what was happening. He smashed a fist on his thigh in frustration and felt nothing.
“Oh, my sweet summer child,” Old Nan said quietly, “what do you know of fear? Fear is for the winter, my little lord, when the snows fall a hundred feet deep and the ice wind comes howling out of the north. Fear is for the long night, when the sun hides its face for years at a time, and little children are born and live and die all in darkness while the direwolves grow gaunt and hungry, and the white walkers move through the woods.”
“You mean the Others,” Bran said querulously.
“The Others,” Old Nan agreed. “Thousands and thousands of years ago, a winter fell that was cold and hard and endless beyond all memory of man. There came a night that lasted a generation, and kings shivered and died in their castles even as the swineherds in their hovels. Women smothered their children rather than see them starve, and cried, and felt their tears freeze on their cheeks.” Her voice and her needles fell silent, and she glanced up at Bran with pale, filmy eyes and asked, “So, child. This is the sort of story you like?”
“Well,” Bran said reluctantly, “yes, only …”
Old Nan nodded. “In that darkness, the Others came for the first time,” she said as her needles went click click click. “They were cold things, dead things, that hated iron and fire and the touch of the sun, and every creature with hot blood in its veins. They swept over holdfasts and cities and kingdoms, felled heroes and armies by the score, riding their pale dead horses and leading hosts of the slain. All the swords of men could not stay their advance, and even maidens and suckling babes found no pity in them. They hunted the maids through frozen forests, and fed their dead servants on the flesh of human children.”
Her voice had dropped very low, almost to a whisper, and Bran found himself leaning forward to listen.
“Now these were the days before the Andals came, and long before the women fled across the narrow sea from the cities of the Rhoyne, and the hundred kingdoms of those times were the kingdoms of the First Men, who had taken these lands from the children of the forest. Yet here and there in the fastness of the woods the children still lived in their wooden cities and hollow hills, and the faces in the trees kept watch. So as cold and death filled the earth, the last hero determined to seek out the children, in the hopes that their ancient magics could win back what the armies of men had lost. He set out into the dead lands with a sword, a horse, a dog, and a dozen companions. For years he searched, until he despaired of ever finding the children of the forest in their secret cities. One by one his friends died, and his horse, and finally even his dog, and his sword froze so hard the blade snapped when he tried to use it. And the Others smelled the hot blood in him, and came silent on his trail, stalking him with packs of pale white spiders big as hounds—”
The door opened with a bang, and Bran’s heart leapt up into his mouth in sudden fear, but it was only Maester Luwin, with Hodor looming in the stairway behind him. “Hodor!” the stableboy announced, as was his custom, smiling hugely at them all.
Maester Luwin was not smiling. “We have visitors,” he announced, “and your presence is required, Bran.”
“I’m listening to a story now,” Bran complained.
“Stories wait, my little lord, and when you come back to them, why, there they are,” Old Nan said. “Visitors are not so patient, and ofttimes they bring stories of their own.”
“Who is it?” Bran asked Maester Luwin.
“Tyrion Lannister, and some men of the Night’s Watch, with word from your brother Jon. Robb is meeting with them now. Hodor, will you help Bran down to the hall?”
“Hodor!” Hodor agreed happily. He ducked to get his great shaggy head under the door. Hodor was nearly seven feet tall. It was hard to believe that he was the same blood as Old Nan. Bran wondered if he would shrivel up as small as his great-grandmother when he was old. It did not seem likely, even if Hodor lived to be a thousand.
Hodor lifted Bran as easy as if he were a bale of hay, and cradled him against his massive chest. He always smelled faintly of horses, but it was not a bad smell. His arms were thick with muscle and matted with brown hair. “Hodor,” he said again. Theon Greyjoy had once commented that Hodor did not know much, but no one could doubt that he knew his name. Old Nan had cackled like a hen when Bran told her that, and confessed that Hodor’s real name was Walder. No one knew where “Hodor” had come from, she said, but when he started saying it, they started calling him by it. It was the only word he had.
They left Old Nan in the tower room with her needles and her memories. Hodor hummed tunelessly as he carried Bran down the steps and through the gallery, with Maester Luwin following behind, hurrying to keep up with the stableboy’s long strides.
Robb was seated in Father’s high seat, wearing ringmail and boiled leather and the stern face of Robb the Lord. Theon Greyjoy and Hallis Mollen stood behind him. A dozen guardsmen lined the grey stone walls beneath tall narrow windows. In the center of the room the dwarf stood with his servants, and four strangers in the black of the Night’s Watch. Bran could sense the anger in the hall the moment that Hodor carried him through the doors.
“Any man of the Night’s Watch is welcome here at Winterfell for as long as he wishes to stay,” Robb was saying with the voice of Robb the Lord. His sword was across his knees, the steel bare for all the world to see. Even Bran knew what it meant to greet a guest with an unsheathed sword.
“Any man of the Night’s Watch,” the dwarf repeated, “but not me, do I take your meaning, boy?”
Robb stood and pointed at the little man with his sword. “I am the lord here while my mother and father are away, Lannister. I am not your boy.”
“If you are a lord, you might learn a lord’s courtesy,” the little man replied, ignoring the sword point in his face. “Your bastard brother has all your father’s graces, it would seem.”
“Jon,” Bran gasped out from Hodor’s arms.
The dwarf turned to look at him. “So it is true, the boy lives. I could scarce believe it. You Starks are hard to kill.”
“You Lannisters had best remember that,” Robb said, lowering his sword. “Hodor, bring my brother here.”
“Hodor,” Hodor said, and he trotted forward smiling and set Bran in the high seat of the Starks, where the Lords of Winterfell had sat since the days when they called themselves the Kings in the North. The seat was cold stone, polished smooth by countless bottoms; the carved heads of direwolves snarled on the ends of its massive arms. Bran clasped them as he sat, his useless legs dangling. The great seat made him feel half a baby.
Robb put a hand on his shoulder. “You said you had business with Bran. Well, here he is, Lannister.”
Bran was uncomfortably aware of Tyrion Lannister’s eyes. One was black and one was green, and both were looking at him, studying him, weighing him. “I am told you were quite the climber, Bran,” the little man said at last. “Tell me, how is it you happened to fall that day?”
“I never,” Bran insisted. He never fell, never never never.
“The child does not remember anything of the fall, or the climb that came before it,” said Maester Luwin gently.
“Curious,” said Tyrion Lannister.
“My brother is not here to answer questions, Lannister,” Robb said curtly. “Do your business and be on your way.”
“I have a gift for you,” the dwarf said to Bran. “Do you like to ride, boy?”
Maester Luwin came forward. “My lord, the child has lost the use of his legs. He cannot sit a horse.”
“Nonsense,” said Lannister. “With the right horse and the right saddle, even a cripple can ride.”
The word was a knife through Bran’s heart. He felt tears come unbidden to his eyes. “I’m not a cripple!”
“Then I am not a dwarf,” the dwarf said with a twist of his mouth. “My father will rejoice to hear it.” Greyjoy laughed.
“What sort of horse and saddle are you suggesting?” Maester Luwin asked.
“A smart horse,” Lannister replied. “The boy cannot use his legs to command the animal, so you must shape the horse to the rider, teach it to respond to the reins, to the voice. I would begin with an unbroken yearling, with no old training to be unlearned,” He drew a rolled paper from his belt. “Give this to your saddler. He will provide the rest.”
Maester Luwin took the paper from the dwarf’s hand, curious as a small grey squirrel. He unrolled it, studied it. “I see. You draw nicely, my lord. Yes, this ought to work. I should have thought of this myself.”
“It came easier to me, Maester. It is not terribly unlike my own saddles.”
“Will I truly be able to ride?” Bran asked. He wanted to believe them, but he was afraid. Perhaps it was just another lie. The crow had promised him that he could fly.
“You will,” the dwarf told him. “And I swear to you, boy, on horseback you will be as tall as any of them.”
Robb Stark seemed puzzled. “Is this some trap, Lannister? What’s Bran to you? Why should you want to help him?”
“Your brother Jon asked it of me. And I have a tender spot in my heart for cripples and bastards and broken things.” Tyrion Lannister placed a hand over his heart and grinned.
The door to the yard flew open. Sunlight came streaming across the hall as Rickon burst in, breathless. The direwolves were with him. The boy stopped by the door, wide-eyed, but the wolves came on. Their eyes found Lannister, or perhaps they caught his scent. Summer began to growl first. Grey Wind picked it up. They padded toward the little man, one from the right and one from the left.
“The wolves do not like your smell, Lannister,” Theon Greyjoy commented.
“Perhaps it’s time I took my leave,” Tyrion said. He took a step backward … and Shaggydog came out of the shadows behind him, snarling. Lannister recoiled, and Summer lunged at him from the other side. He reeled away, unsteady on his feet, and Grey Wind snapped at his arm, teeth ripping at his sleeve and tearing loose a scrap of cloth.
“No!” Bran shouted from the high seat as Lannister’s men reached for their steel. “Summer, here. Summer, to me!”
The direwolf heard the voice, glanced at Bran, and again at Lannister. He crept backward, away from the little man, and settled down below Bran’s dangling feet.
Robb had been holding his breath. He let it out with a sigh and called, “Grey Wind.” His direwolf moved to him, swift and silent. Now there was only Shaggy dog, rumbling at the small man, his eyes burning like green fire.
“Rickon, call him,” Bran shouted to his baby brother, and Rickon remembered himself and screamed, “Home, Shaggy, home now.” The black wolf gave Lannister one final snarl and bounded off to Rickon, who hugged him tightly around the neck.
Tyrion Lannister undid his scarf, mopped at his brow, and said in a flat voice, “How interesting.”
“Are you well, my lord?” asked one of his men, his sword in hand. He glanced nervously at the direwolves as he spoke.
“My sleeve is torn and my breeches are unaccountably damp, but nothing was harmed save my dignity.”
Even Robb looked shaken. “The wolves … I don’t know why they did that …”
“No doubt they mistook me for dinner.” Lannister bowed stiffly to Bran. “I thank you for calling them off, young ser. I promise you, they would have found me quite indigestible. And now I will be leaving, truly.”
“A moment, my lord,” Maester Luwin said. He moved to Robb and they huddled close together, whispering. Bran tried to hear what they were saying, but their voices were too low.
Robb Stark finally sheathed his sword. “I … I may have been hasty with you,” he said. “You’ve done Bran a kindness, and, well …” Robb composed himself with an effort. “The hospitality of Winterfell is yours if you wish it, Lannister.”
“Spare me your false courtesies, boy. You do not love me and you do not want me here. I saw an inn outside your walls, in the winter town. I’ll find a bed there, and both of us will sleep easier. For a few coppers I may even find a comely wench to warm the sheets for me.” He spoke to one of the black brothers, an old man with a twisted back and a tangled beard. “Yoren, we go south at daybreak. You will find me on the road, no doubt.” With that he made his exit, struggling across the hall on his short legs, past Rickon and out the door. His men followed.
The four of the Night’s Watch remained. Robb turned to them uncertainly. “I have had rooms prepared, and you’ll find no lack of hot water to wash off the dust of the road. I hope you will honor us at table tonight,” He spoke the words so awkwardly that even Bran took note; it was a speech he had learned, not words from the heart, but the black brothers thanked him all the same.
Summer followed them up the tower steps as Hodor carried Bran back to his bed. Old Nan was asleep in her chair. Hodor said “Hodor,” gathered up his great-grandmother, and carried her off, snoring softly, while Bran lay thinking. Robb had promised that he could feast with the Night’s Watch in the Great Hall. “Summer,” he called. The wolf bounded up on the bed. Bran hugged him so hard he could feel the hot breath on his cheek. “I can ride now,” he whispered to his friend. “We can go hunting in the woods soon, wait and see.” After a time he slept.
In his dream he was climbing again, pulling himself up an ancient windowless tower, his fingers forcing themselves between blackened stones, his feet scrabbling for purchase. Higher and higher he climbed, through the clouds and into the night sky, and still the tower rose before him. When he paused to look down, his head swam dizzily and he felt his fingers slipping. Bran cried out and clung for dear life. The earth was a thousand miles beneath him and he could not fly. He could not fly. He waited until his heart had stopped pounding, until he could breathe, and he began to climb again. There was no way to go but up. Far above him, outlined against a vast pale moon, he thought he could see the shapes of gargoyles. His arms were sore and aching, but he dared not rest. He forced himself to climb faster. The gargoyles watched him ascend. Their eyes glowed red as hot coals in a brazier. Perhaps once they had been lions, but now they were twisted and grotesque. Bran could hear them whispering to each other in soft stone voices terrible to hear. He must not listen, he told himself, he must not hear, so long as he did not hear them he was safe. But when the gargoyles pulled themselves loose from the stone and padded down the side of the tower to where Bran clung, he knew he was not safe after all. “I didn’t hear,” he wept as they came closer and closer, “I didn’t, I didn’t.”
He woke gasping, lost in darkness, and saw a vast shadow looming over him. “I didn’t hear,” he whispered, trembling in fear, but then the shadow said “Hodor,” and lit the candle by the bedside, and Bran sighed with relief.
Hodor washed the sweat from him with a warm, damp cloth and dressed him with deft and gentle hands. When it was time, he carried him down to the Great Hall, where a long trestle table had been set up near the fire. The lord’s seat at the head of the table had been left empty, but Robb sat to the right of it, with Bran across from him. They ate suckling pig that night, and pigeon pie, and turnips soaking in butter, and afterward the cook had promised honeycombs. Summer snatched table scraps from Bran’s hand, while Grey Wind and Shaggydog fought over a bone in the corner. Winterfell’s dogs would not come near the hall now. Bran had found that strange at first, but he was growing used to it.
Yoren was senior among the black brothers, so the steward had seated him between Robb and Maester Luwin. The old man had a sour smell, as if he had not washed in a long time. He ripped at the meat with his teeth, cracked the ribs to suck out the marrow from the bones, and shrugged at the mention of Jon Snow. “Ser Alliser’s bane,” he grunted, and two of his companions shared a laugh that Bran did not understand. But when Robb asked for news of their uncle Benjen, the black brothers grew ominously quiet.
“What is it?” Bran asked.
Yoren wiped his fingers on his vest. “There’s hard news, m’lords, and a cruel way to pay you for your meat and mead, but the man as asks the question must bear the answer. Stark’s gone.”
One of the other men said, “The Old Bear sent him out to look for Waymar Royce, and he’s late returning, my lord.”
“Too long,” Yoren said. “Most like he’s dead.”
“My uncle is not dead,” Robb Stark said loudly, anger in his tones. He rose from the bench and laid his hand on the hilt of his sword. “Do you hear me? My uncle is not dead!” His voice rang against the stone walls, and Bran was suddenly afraid.
Old sour-smelling Yoren looked up at Robb, unimpressed. “Whatever you say, m’lord,” he said. He sucked at a piece of meat between his teeth.
The youngest of the black brothers shifted uncomfortably in his seat. “There’s not a man on the Wall knows the haunted forest better than Benjen Stark. He’ll find his way back.”
“Well,” said Yoren, “maybe he will and maybe he won’t. Good men have gone into those woods before, and never come out.”
All Bran could think of was Old Nan’s story of the Others and the last hero, hounded through the white woods by dead men and spiders big as hounds. He was afraid for a moment, until he remembered how that story ended. “The children will help him,” he blurted, “the children of the forest!”
Theon Greyjoy sniggered, and Maester Luwin said, “Bran, the children of the forest have been dead and gone for thousands of years. All that is left of them are the faces in the trees.”
“Down here, might be that’s true, Maester,” Yoren said, “but up past the Wall, who’s to say? Up there, a man can’t always tell what’s alive and what’s dead.”
That night, after the plates had been cleared, Robb carried Bran up to bed himself. Grey Wind led the way, and Summer came close behind. His brother was strong for his age, and Bran was as light as a bundle of rags, but the stairs were steep and dark, and Robb was breathing hard by the time they reached the top.
He put Bran into bed, covered him with blankets, and blew out the candle. For a time Robb sat beside him in the dark. Bran wanted to talk to him, but he did not know what to say. “We’ll find a horse for you, I promise,” Robb whispered at last.
“Are they ever coming back?” Bran asked him.
“Yes,” Robb said with such hope in his voice that Bran knew he was hearing his brother and not just Robb the Lord. “Mother will be home soon. Maybe we can ride out to meet her when she comes. Wouldn’t that surprise her, to see you ahorse?” Even in the dark room, Bran could feel his brother’s smile. “And afterward, we’ll ride north to see the Wall. We won’t even tell Jon we’re coming, we’ll just be there one day, you and me. It will be an adventure.”
“An adventure,” Bran repeated wistfully. He heard his brother sob. The room was so dark he could not see the tears on Robb’s face, so he reached out and found his hand. Their fingers twined together.

Alight snow was falling. Bran could feel the flakes on his face, melting as they touched his skin like the gentlest of rains. He sat straight atop his horse, watching as the iron portcullis was winched upward. Try as he might to keep calm, his heart was fluttering in his chest.
“Are you ready?” Robb asked.
Bran nodded, trying not to let his fear show. He had not been outside Winterfell since his fall, but he was determined to ride out as proud as any knight.
“Let’s ride, then.” Robb put his heels into his big grey-and-white gelding, and the horse walked under the portcullis.
“Go,” Bran whispered to his own horse. He touched her neck lightly, and the small chestnut filly started forward. Bran had named her Dancer. She was two years old, and Joseth said she was smarter than any horse had a right to be. They had trained her special, to respond to rein and voice and touch. Up to now, Bran had only ridden her around the yard. At first Joseth or Hodor would lead her, while Bran sat strapped to her back in the oversize saddle the Imp had drawn up for him, but for the past fortnight he had been riding her on his own, trotting her round and round, and growing bolder with every circuit.
They passed beneath the gatehouse, over the drawbridge, through the outer walls. Summer and Grey Wind came loping beside them, sniffing at the wind. Close behind came Theon Greyjoy, with his longbow and a quiver of broadheads; he had a mind to take a deer, he had told them. He was followed by four guardsmen in mailed shirts and coifs, and Joseth, a stick-thin stableman whom Robb had named master of horse while Hullen was away. Maester Luwin brought up the rear, riding on a donkey. Bran would have liked it better if he and Robb had gone off alone, just the two of them, but Hal Mollen would not hear of it, and Maester Luwin backed him. If Bran fell off his horse or injured himself, the maester was determined to be with him.
Beyond the castle lay the market square, its wooden stalls deserted now. They rode down the muddy streets of the village, past rows of small neat houses of log and undressed stone. Less than one in five were occupied, thin tendrils of woodsmoke curling up from their chimneys. The rest would fill up one by one as it grew colder. When the snow fell and the ice winds howled down out of the north, Old Nan said, farmers left their frozen fields and distant holdfasts, loaded up their wagons, and then the winter town came alive. Bran had never seen it happen, but Maester Luwin said the day was looming closer. The end of the long summer was near at hand. Winter is coming.
A few villagers eyed the direwolves anxiously as the riders went past, and one man dropped the wood he was carrying as he shrank away in fear, but most of the town-folk had grown used to the sight. They bent the knee when they saw the boys, and Robb greeted each of them with a lordly nod.
With his legs unable to grip, the swaying motion of the horse made Bran feel unsteady at first, but the huge saddle with its thick horn and high back cradled him comfortingly, and the straps around his chest and thighs would not allow him to fall. After a time the rhythm began to feel almost natural. His anxiety faded, and a tremulous smile crept across his face.
Two serving wenches stood beneath the sign of the Smoking Log, the local alehouse. When Theon Greyjoy called out to them, the younger girl turned red and covered her face. Theon spurred his mount to move up beside Robb. “Sweet Kyra,” he said with a laugh. “She squirms like a weasel in bed, but say a word to her on the street, and she blushes pink as a maid. Did I ever tell you about the night that she and Bessa—”
“Not where my brother can hear, Theon,” Robb warned him with a glance at Bran.
Bran looked away and pretended not to have heard, but he could feel Greyjoy’s eyes on him. No doubt he was smiling. He smiled a lot, as if the world were a secret joke that only he was clever enough to understand. Robb seemed to admire Theon and enjoy his company, but Bran had never warmed to his father’s ward.
Robb rode closer. “You are doing well, Bran.”
“I want to go faster,” Bran replied.
Robb smiled. “As you will.” He sent his gelding into a trot. The wolves raced after him. Bran snapped the reins sharply, and Dancer picked up her pace. He heard a shout from Theon Greyjoy, and the hoofbeats of the other horses behind him.
Bran’s cloak billowed out, rippling in the wind, and the snow seemed to rush at his face. Robb was well ahead, glancing back over his shoulder from time to time to make sure Bran and the others were following. He snapped the reins again. Smooth as silk, Dancer slid into a gallop. The distance closed. By the time he caught Robb on the edge of the wolfswood, two miles beyond the winter town, they had left the others well behind. “I can ride!” Bran shouted, grinning. It felt almost as good as flying.
“I’d race you, but I fear you’d win.” Robb’s tone was light and joking, yet Bran could tell that something was troubling his brother underneath the smile.
“I don’t want to race.” Bran looked around for the direwolves. Both had vanished into the wood. “Did you hear Summer howling last night?”
“Grey Wind was restless too,” Robb said. His auburn hair had grown shaggy and unkempt, and a reddish stubble covered his jaw, making him look older than his fifteen years. “Sometimes I think they know things … sense things …” Robb sighed. “I never know how much to tell you, Bran. I wish you were older.”
“I’m eight now!” Bran said. “Eight isn’t so much younger than fifteen, and I’m the heir to Winterfell, after you.”
“So you are.” Robb sounded sad, and even a little scared. “Bran, I need to tell you something. There was a bird last night. From King’s Landing. Maester Luwin woke me.”
Bran felt a sudden dread. Dark wings, dark words, Old Nan always said, and of late the messenger ravens had been proving the truth of the proverb. When Robb wrote to the Lord Commander of the Night’s Watch, the bird that came back brought word that Uncle Benjen was still missing. Then a message had arrived from the Eyrie, from Mother, but that had not been good news either. She did not say when she meant to return, only that she had taken the Imp as prisoner. Bran had sort of liked the little man, yet the name Lannister sent cold fingers creeping up his spine. There was something about the Lannisters, something he ought to remember, but when he tried to think what, he felt dizzy and his stomach clenched hard as a stone. Robb spent most of that day locked behind closed doors with Maester Luwin, Theon Greyjoy, and Hallis Mollen. Afterward, riders were sent out on fast horses, carrying Robb’s commands throughout the north. Bran heard talk of Moat Cailin, the ancient stronghold the First Men had built at the top of the Neck. No one ever told him what was happening, yet he knew it was not good.
And now another raven, another message. Bran clung to hope. “Was the bird from Mother? Is she coming home?”
“The message was from Alyn in King’s Landing. Jory Cassel is dead. And Wyl and Heward as well. Murdered by the Kingslayer.” Robb lifted his face to the snow, and the flakes melted on his cheeks. “May the gods give them rest.”
Bran did not know what to say. He felt as if he’d been punched. Jory had been captain of the household guard at Winterfell since before Bran was born. “They killed Jory?” He remembered all the times Jory had chased him over the roofs. He could picture him striding across the yard in mail and plate, or sitting at his accustomed place on the bench in the Great Hall, joking as he ate. “Why would anyone kill Jory?”
Robb shook his head numbly, the pain plain in his eyes. “I don’t know, and … Bran, that’s not the worst of it. Father was caught beneath a falling horse in the fight. Alyn says his leg was shattered, and … Maester Pycelle has given him the milk of the poppy, but they aren’t sure when … when he …” The sound of hoofbeats made him glance down the road, to where Theon and the others were coming up. “When he will wake,” Robb finished. He laid his hand on the pommel of his sword then, and went on in the solemn voice of Robb the Lord. “Bran, I promise you, whatever might happen, I will not let this be forgotten.”
Something in his tone made Bran even more fearful. “What will you do?” he asked as Theon Greyjoy reined in beside them.
“Theon thinks I should call the banners,” Robb said.
“Blood for blood.” For once Greyjoy did not smile. His lean, dark face had a hungry look to it, and black hair fell down across his eyes.
“Only the lord can call the banners,” Bran said as the snow drifted down around them.
“If your father dies,” Theon said, “Robb will be Lord of Winterfell.”
“He won’t die!” Bran screamed at him.
Robb took his hand. “He won’t die, not Father,” he said calmly. “Still … the honor of the north is in my hands now. When our lord father took his leave of us, he told me to be strong for you and for Rickon. I’m almost a man grown, Bran.”
Bran shivered. “I wish Mother was back,” he said miserably. He looked around for Maester Luwin; his donkey was visible in the far distance, trotting over a rise. “Does Maester Luwin say to call the banners too?”
“The maester is timid as an old woman,” said Theon.
“Father always listened to his counsel,” Bran reminded his brother. “Mother too.”
“I listen to him,” Robb insisted. “I listen to everyone.”
The joy Bran had felt at the ride was gone, melted away like the snowflakes on his face. Not so long ago, the thought of Robb calling the banners and riding off to war would have filled him with excitement, but now he felt only dread. “Can we go back now?” he asked. “I’m cold.”
Robb glanced around. “We need to find the wolves. Can you stand to go a bit longer?”
“I can go as long as you can.” Maester Luwin had warned him to keep the ride short, for fear of saddle sores, but Bran would not admit to weakness in front of his brother. He was sick of the way everyone was always fussing over him and asking how he was.
“Let’s hunt down the hunters, then,” Robb said. Side by side, they urged their mounts off the kingsroad and struck out into the wolfswood. Theon dropped back and followed well behind them, talking and joking with the guardsmen.
It was nice under the trees. Bran kept Dancer to a walk, holding the reins lightly and looking all around him as they went. He knew this wood, but he had been so long confined to Winterfell that he felt as though he were seeing it for the first time. The smells filled his nostrils; the sharp fresh tang of pine needles, the earthy odor of wet rotting leaves, the hints of animal musk and distant cooking fires. He caught a glimpse of a black squirrel moving through the snow-covered branches of an oak, and paused to study the silvery web of an empress spider.
Theon and the others fell farther and farther behind, until Bran could no longer hear their voices. From ahead came the faint sound of rushing waters. It grew louder until they reached the stream. Tears stung his eyes.
“Bran?” Robb asked. “What’s wrong?”
Bran shook his head. “I was just remembering,” he said. “Jory brought us here once, to fish for trout. You and me and Jon. Do you remember?”
“I remember,” Robb said, his voice quiet and sad.
“I didn’t catch anything,” Bran said, “but Jon gave me his fish on the way back to Winterfell. Will we ever see Jon again?”
“We saw Uncle Benjen when the king came to visit,” Robb pointed out. “Jon will visit too, you’ll see.”
The stream was running high and fast. Robb dismounted and led his gelding across the ford. In the deepest part of the crossing, the water came up to midthigh. He tied his horse to a tree on the far side, and waded back across for Bran and Dancer. The current foamed around rock and root, and Bran could feel the spray on his face as Robb led him over. It made him smile. For a moment he felt strong again, and whole. He looked up at the trees and dreamed of climbing them, right up to the very top, with the whole forest spread out beneath him.
They were on the far side when they heard the howl, a long rising wail that moved through the trees like a cold wind. Bran raised his head to listen. “Summer,” he said. No sooner had he spoken than a second voice joined the first.
“They’ve made a kill,” Robb said as he remounted, “I’d best go and bring them back. Wait here, Theon and the others should be along shortly.”
“I want to go with you,” Bran said.
“I’ll find them faster by myself.” Robb spurred his gelding and vanished into the trees.
Once he was gone, the woods seemed to close in around Bran. The snow was falling more heavily now. Where it touched the ground it melted, but all about him rock and root and branch wore a thin blanket of white. As he waited, he was conscious of how uncomfortable he felt. He could not feel his legs, hanging useless in the stirrups, but the strap around his chest was tight and chafing, and the melting snow had soaked through his gloves to chill his hands. He wondered what was keeping Theon and Maester Luwin and Joseth and the rest.
When he heard the rustle of leaves, Bran used the reins to make Dancer turn, expecting to see his friends, but the ragged men who stepped out onto the bank of the stream were strangers.
“Good day to you,” he said nervously. One look, and Bran knew they were neither foresters nor farmers. He was suddenly conscious of how richly he was dressed. His surcoat was new, dark grey wool with silver buttons, and a heavy silver pin fastened his fur-trimmed cloak at the shoulders. His boots and gloves were lined with fur as well.
“All alone, are you?” said the biggest of them, a bald man with a raw windburnt face. “Lost in the wolfswood, poor lad.”
“I’m not lost.” Bran did not like the way the strangers were looking at him. He counted four, but when he turned his head, he saw two others behind him. “My brother rode off just a moment ago, and my guard will be here shortly.”
“Your guard, is it?” a second man said. Grey stubble covered his gaunt face. “And what would they be guarding, my little lord? Is that a silver pin I see there on your cloak?”
“Pretty,” said a woman’s voice. She scarcely looked like a woman; tall and lean, with the same hard face as the others, her hair hidden beneath a bowl-shaped halfhelm. The spear she held was eight feet of black oak, tipped in rusted steel.
“Let’s have a look,” said the big bald man.
Bran watched him anxiously. The man’s clothes were filthy, fallen almost to pieces, patched here with brown and here with blue and there with a dark green, and faded everywhere to grey, but once that cloak might have been black. The grey stubbly man wore black rags too, he saw with a sudden start. Suddenly Bran remembered the oathbreaker his father had beheaded, the day they had found the wolf pups; that man had worn black as well, and Father said he had been a deserter from the Night’s Watch. No man is more dangerous, he remembered Lord Eddard saying. The deserter knows his life is forfeit if he is taken, so he will not flinch from any crime, no matter how vile or cruel.
“The pin, lad,” the big man said. He held out his hand.
“We’ll take the horse too,” said another of them, a woman shorter than Robb, with a broad flat face and lank yellow hair. “Get down, and be quick about it.” A knife slid from her sleeve into her hand, its edge jagged as a saw.
“No,” Bran blurted. “I can’t …”
The big man grabbed his reins before Bran could think to wheel Dancer around and gallop off. “You can, lordling … and will, if you know what’s good for you.”
“Stiv, look how he’s strapped on.” The tall woman pointed with her spear. “Might be it’s the truth he’s telling.”
“Straps, is it?” Stiv said. He drew a dagger from a sheath at his belt. “There’s ways to deal with straps.”
“You some kind of cripple?” asked the short woman.
Bran flared. “I’m Brandon Stark of Winterfell, and you better let go of my horse, or I’ll see you all dead.”
The gaunt man with the grey stubbled face laughed. “The boy’s a Stark, true enough. Only a Stark would be fool enough to threaten where smarter men would beg.”
“Cut his little cock off and stuff it in his mouth,” suggested the short woman. “That should shut him up.”
“You’re as stupid as you are ugly, Hali,” said the tall woman. “The boy’s worth nothing dead, but alive … gods be damned, think what Mance would give to have Benjen Stark’s own blood to hostage!”
“Mance be damned,” the big man cursed. “You want to go back there, Osha? More fool you. Think the white walkers will care if you have a hostage?” He turned back to Bran and slashed at the strap around his thigh. The leather parted with a sigh.
The stroke had been quick and careless, biting deep. Looking down, Bran glimpsed pale flesh where the wool of his leggings had parted. Then the blood began to flow. He watched the red stain spread, feeling light-headed, curiously apart; there had been no pain, not even a hint of feeling. The big man grunted in surprise.
“Put down your steel now, and I promise you shall have a quick and painless death,” Robb called out.
Bran looked up in desperate hope, and there he was. The strength of the words were undercut by the way his voice cracked with strain. He was mounted, the bloody carcass of an elk slung across the back of his horse, his sword in a gloved hand.
“The brother,” said the man with the grey stubbly face.
“He’s a fierce one, he is,” mocked the short woman. Hali, they called her. “You mean to fight us, boy?”
“Don’t be a fool, lad. You’re one against six.” The tall woman, Osha, leveled her spear. “Off the horse, and throw down the sword. We’ll thank you kindly for the mount and for the venison, and you and your brother can be on your way.”
Robb whistled. They heard the faint sound of soft feet on wet leaves. The undergrowth parted, low-hanging branches giving up their accumulation of snow, and Grey Wind and Summer emerged from the green. Summer sniffed the air and growled.
“Wolves,” gasped Hali.
“Direwolves,” Bran said. Still half-grown, they were as large as any wolf he had ever seen, but the differences were easy to spot, if you knew what to look for. Maester Luwin and Farlen the kennelmaster had taught him. A direwolf had a bigger head and longer legs in proportion to its body, and its snout and jaw were markedly leaner and more pronounced. There was something gaunt and terrible about them as they stood there amid the gently falling snow. Fresh blood spotted Grey Wind’s muzzle.
“Dogs,” the big bald man said contemptuously. “Yet I’m told there’s nothing like a wolfskin cloak to warm a man by night.” He made a sharp gesture. “Take them.”
Robb shouted, “Winterfell!” and kicked his horse. The gelding plunged down the bank as the ragged men closed. A man with an axe rushed in, shouting and heedless. Robb’s sword caught him full in the face with a sickening crunch and a spray of bright blood. The man with the gaunt stubbly face made a grab for the reins, and for half a second he had them … and then Grey Wind was on him, bearing him down. He fell back into the stream with a splash and a shout, flailing wildly with his knife as his head went under. The direwolf plunged in after him, and the white water turned red where they had vanished.
Robb and Osha matched blows in midstream. Her long spear was a steel-headed serpent, flashing out at his chest, once, twice, three times, but Robb parried every thrust with his longsword, turning the point aside. On the fourth or fifth thrust, the tall woman overextended herself and lost her balance, just for a second. Robb charged, riding her down.
A few feet away, Summer darted in and snapped at Hali. The knife bit at his flank. Summer slid away, snarling, and came rushing in again. This time his jaws closed around her calf. Holding the knife with both hands, the small woman stabbed down, but the direwolf seemed to sense the blade coming. He pulled free for an instant, his mouth full of leather and cloth and bloody flesh. When Hali stumbled and fell, he came at her again, slamming her backward, teeth tearing at her belly.
The sixth man ran from the carnage … but not far. As he went scrambling up the far side of the bank, Grey Wind emerged from the stream, dripping wet. He shook the water off and bounded after the running man, hamstringing him with a single snap of his teeth, and going for the throat as the screaming man slid back down toward the water.
And then there was no one left but the big man, Stiv. He slashed at Bran’s chest strap, grabbed his arm, and yanked. Suddenly Bran was falling. He sprawled on the ground, his legs tangled under him, one foot in the stream. He could not feel the cold of the water, but he felt the steel when Stiv pressed his dagger to his throat. “Back away,” the man warned, “or I’ll open the boy’s windpipe, I swear it.”
Robb reined his horse in, breathing hard. The fury went out of his eyes, and his sword arm dropped.
In that moment Bran saw everything. Summer was savaging Hali, pulling glistening blue snakes from her belly. Her eyes were wide and staring. Bran could not tell whether she was alive or dead. The grey stubbly man and the one with the axe lay unmoving, but Osha was on her knees, crawling toward her fallen spear. Grey Wind padded toward her, dripping wet. “Call him off!” the big man shouted. “Call them both off, or the cripple boy dies now!”
“Grey Wind, Summer, to me,” Robb said.
The direwolves stopped, turned their heads. Grey Wind loped back to Robb. Summer stayed where he was, his eyes on Bran and the man beside him. He growled. His muzzle was wet and red, but his eyes burned.
Osha used the butt end of her spear to lever herself back to her feet. Blood leaked from a wound on the upper arm where Robb had cut her. Bran could see sweat trickling down the big man’s face. Stiv was as scared as he was, he realized. “Starks,” the man muttered, “bloody Starks.” He raised his voice. “Osha, kill the wolves and get his sword.”
“Kill them yourself,” she replied. “I’ll not be getting near those monsters.”
For a moment Stiv was at a loss. His hand trembled; Bran felt a trickle of blood where the knife pressed against his neck. The stench of the man filled his nose; he smelled of fear. “You,” he called out to Robb. “You have a name?”
“I am Robb Stark, the heir to Winterfell.”
“This is your brother?”
“Yes.”
“You want him alive, you do what I say. Off the horse.”
Robb hesitated a moment. Then, slowly and deliberately, he dismounted and stood with his sword in hand.
“Now kill the wolves.”
Robb did not move.
“You do it. The wolves or the boy.”
“No!” Bran screamed. If Robb did as they asked, Stiv would kill them both anyway, once the direwolves were dead.
The bald man took hold of his hair with his free hand and twisted it cruelly, till Bran sobbed in pain. “You shut your mouth, cripple, you hear me?” He twisted harder. “You hear me?”
A low thrum came from the woods behind them. Stiv gave a choked gasp as a half foot of razor-tipped broadhead suddenly exploded out of his chest. The arrow was bright red, as if it had been painted in blood.
The dagger fell away from Bran’s throat. The big man swayed and collapsed, facedown in the stream. The arrow broke beneath him. Bran watched his life go swirling off in the water.
Osha glanced around as Father’s guardsmen appeared from beneath the trees, steel in hand. She threw down her spear. “Mercy, m’lord,” she called to Robb.
The guardsmen had a strange, pale look to their faces as they took in the scene of slaughter. They eyed the wolves uncertainly, and when Summer returned to Hali’s corpse to feed, Joseth dropped his knife and scrambled for the bush, heaving. Even Maester Luwin seemed shocked as he stepped from behind a tree, but only for an instant. Then he shook his head and waded across the stream to Bran’s side. “Are you hurt?”
“He cut my leg,” Bran said, “but I couldn’t feel it.”
As the maester knelt to examine the wound, Bran turned his head. Theon Greyjoy stood beside a sentinel tree, his bow in hand. He was smiling. Ever smiling. A half-dozen arrows were thrust into the soft ground at his feet, but it had taken only one. “A dead enemy is a thing of beauty,” he announced.
“Jon always said you were an ass, Greyjoy,” Robb said loudly. “I ought to chain you up in the yard and let Bran take a few practice shots at you.”
“You should be thanking me for saving your brother’s life.”
“What if you had missed the shot?” Robb said. “What if you’d only wounded him? What if you had made his hand jump, or hit Bran instead? For all you knew, the man might have been wearing a breastplate, all you could see was the back of his cloak. What would have happened to my brother then? Did you ever think of that, Greyjoy?”
Theon’s smile was gone. He gave a sullen shrug and began to pull his arrows from the ground, one by one.
Robb glared at his guardsmen. “Where were you?” he demanded of them. “I was sure you were close behind us.”
The men traded unhappy glances. “We were following, m’lord,” said Quent, the youngest of them, his beard a soft brown fuzz. “Only first we waited for Maester Luwin and his ass, begging your pardons, and then, well, as it were …” He glanced over at Theon and quickly looked away, abashed.
“I spied a turkey,” Theon said, annoyed by the question. “How was I to know that you’d leave the boy alone?”
Robb turned his head to look at Theon once more. Bran had never seen him so angry, yet he said nothing. Finally he knelt beside Maester Luwin. “How badly is my brother wounded?”
“No more than a scratch,” the maester said. He wet a cloth in the stream to clean the cut. “Two of them wear the black,” he told Robb as he worked.
Robb glanced over at where Stiv lay sprawled in the stream, his ragged black cloak moving fitfully as the rushing waters tugged at it. “Deserters from the Night’s Watch,” he said grimly. “They must have been fools, to come so close to Winterfell.”
“Folly and desperation are ofttimes hard to tell apart,” said Maester Luwin.
“Shall we bury them, m’lord?” asked Quent.
“They would not have buried us,” Robb said. “Hack off their heads, we’ll send them back to the Wall. Leave the rest for the carrion crows.”
“And this one?” Quent jerked a thumb toward Osha.
Robb walked over to her. She was a head taller than he was, but she dropped to her knees at his approach. “Give me my life, m’lord of Stark, and I am yours.”
“Mine? What would I do with an oathbreaker?”
“I broke no oaths. Stiv and Wallen flew down off the Wall, not me. The black crows got no place for women.”
Theon Greyjoy sauntered closer. “Give her to the wolves,” he urged Robb. The woman’s eyes went to what was left of Hali, and just as quickly away. She shuddered. Even the guardsmen looked queasy.
“She’s a woman,” Robb said.
“A wildling,” Bran told him. “She said they should keep me alive so they could take me to Mance Rayder.”
“Do you have a name?” Robb asked her.
“Osha, as it please the lord,” she muttered sourly.
Maester Luwin stood. “We might do well to question her.”
Bran could see the relief on his brother’s face. “As you say, Maester. Wayn, bind her hands. She’ll come back to Winterfell with us … and live or die by the truths she gives us.”

The Karstarks came in on a cold windy morning, bringing three hundred horsemen and near two thousand foot from their castle at Karhold. The steel points of their pikes winked in the pale sunlight as the column approached. A man went before them, pounding out a slow, deep-throated marching rhythm on a drum that was bigger than he was, boom, boom, boom.
Bran watched them come from a guard turret atop the outer wall, peering through Maester Luwin’s bronze far-eye while perched on Hodor’s shoulders. Lord Rickard himself led them, his sons Harrion and Eddard and Torrhen riding beside him beneath night-black banners emblazoned with the white sunburst of their House. Old Nan said they had Stark blood in them, going back hundreds of years, but they did not look like Starks to Bran. They were big men, and fierce, faces covered with thick beards, hair worn loose past the shoulders. Their cloaks were made of skins, the pelts of bear and seal and wolf.
They were the last, he knew. The other lords were already here, with their hosts. Bran yearned to ride out among them, to see the winter houses full to bursting, the jostling crowds in the market square every morning, the streets rutted and torn by wheel and hoof. But Robb had forbidden him to leave the castle. “We have no men to spare to guard you,” his brother had explained.
“I’ll take Summer,” Bran argued.
“Don’t act the boy with me, Bran,” Robb said. “You know better than that. Only two days ago one of Lord Bolton’s men knifed one of Lord Cerwyn’s at the Smoking Log. Our lady mother would skin me for a pelt if I let you put yourself at risk.” He was using the voice of Robb the Lord when he said it; Bran knew that meant there was no appeal.
It was because of what had happened in the wolfswood, he knew. The memory still gave him bad dreams. He had been as helpless as a baby, no more able to defend himself than Rickon would have been. Less, even … Rickon would have kicked them, at the least. It shamed him. He was only a few years younger than Robb; if his brother was almost a man grown, so was he. He should have been able to protect himself.
A year ago, before, he would have visited the town even if it meant climbing over the walls by himself. In those days he could run down stairs, get on and off his pony by himself, and wield a wooden sword good enough to knock Prince Tommen in the dirt. Now he could only watch, peering out through Maester Luwin’s lens tube. The maester had taught him all the banners: the mailed fist of the Glovers, silver on scarlet; Lady Mormont’s black bear; the hideous flayed man that went before Roose Bolton of the Dreadfort; a bull moose for the Hornwoods; a battle-axe for the Cerwyns; three sentinel trees for the Tallharts; and the fearsome sigil of House Umber, a roaring giant in shattered chains.
And soon enough he learned the faces too, when the lords and their sons and knights retainer came to Winterfell to feast. Even the Great Hall was not large enough to seat all of them at once, so Robb hosted each of the principal bannermen in turn. Bran was always given the place of honor at his brother’s right hand. Some of the lords bannermen gave him queer hard stares as he sat there, as if they wondered by what right a green boy should be placed above them, and him a cripple too.
“How many is it now?” Bran asked Maester Luwin as Lord Karstark and his sons rode through the gates in the outer wall.
“Twelve thousand men, or near enough as makes no matter.”
“How many knights?”
“Few enough,” the maester said with a touch of impatience. “To be a knight, you must stand your vigil in a sept, and be anointed with the seven oils to consecrate your vows. In the north, only a few of the great houses worship the Seven. The rest honor the old gods, and name no knights … but those lords and their sons and sworn swords are no less fierce or loyal or honorable. A man’s worth is not marked by a ser before his name. As I have told you a hundred times before.”
“Still,” said Bran, “how many knights?”
Maester Luwin sighed. “Three hundred, perhaps four … among three thousand armored lances who are not knights.”
“Lord Karstark is the last,” Bran said thoughtfully. “Robb will feast him tonight.”
“No doubt he will.”
“How long before … before they go?”
“He must march soon, or not at all,” Maester Luwin said. “The winter town is full to bursting, and this army of his will eat the countryside clean if it camps here much longer. Others are waiting to join him all along the kingsroad, barrow knights and crannogmen and the Lords Manderly and Flint. The fighting has begun in the riverlands, and your brother has many leagues to go.”
“I know.” Bran felt as miserable as he sounded. He handed the bronze tube back to the maester, and noticed how thin Luwin’s hair had grown on top. He could see the pink of scalp showing through. It felt queer to look down on him this way, when he’d spent his whole life looking up at him, but when you sat on Hodor’s back you looked down on everyone. “I don’t want to watch anymore. Hodor, take me back to the keep.”
“Hodor,” said Hodor.
Maester Luwin tucked the tube up his sleeve. “Bran, your lord brother will not have time to see you now. He must greet Lord Karstark and his sons and make them welcome.”
“I won’t trouble Robb. I want to visit the godswood.” He put his hand on Hodor’s shoulder. “Hodor.”
A series of chisel-cut handholds made a ladder in the granite of the tower’s inner wall. Hodor hummed tunelessly as he went down hand under hand, Bran bouncing against his back in the wicker seat that Maester Luwin had fashioned for him. Luwin had gotten the idea from the baskets the women used to carry firewood on their backs; after that it had been a simple matter of cutting legholes and attaching some new straps to spread Bran’s weight more evenly. It was not as good as riding Dancer, but there were places Dancer could not go, and this did not shame Bran the way it did when Hodor carried him in his arms like a baby. Hodor seemed to like it too, though with Hodor it was hard to tell. The only tricky part was doors. Sometimes Hodor forgot that he had Bran on his back, and that could be painful when he went through a door.
For near a fortnight there had been so many comings and goings that Robb ordered both portcullises kept up and the drawbridge down between them, even in the dead of night. A long column of armored lancers was crossing the moat between the walls when Bran emerged from the tower; Karstark men, following their lords into the castle. They wore black iron halfhelms and black woolen cloaks patterned with the white sunburst. Hodor trotted along beside them, smiling to himself, his boots thudding against the wood of the drawbridge. The riders gave them queer looks as they went by, and once Bran heard someone guffaw. He refused to let it trouble him. “Men will look at you,” Maester Luwin had warned him the first time they had strapped the wicker basket around Hodor’s chest. “They will look, and they will talk, and some will mock you.” Let them mock, Bran thought. No one mocked him in his bedchamber, but he would not live his life in bed.
As they passed beneath the gatehouse portcullis, Bran put two fingers into his mouth and whistled. Summer came loping across the yard. Suddenly the Karstark lancers were fighting for control, as their horses rolled their eyes and whickered in dismay. One stallion reared, screaming, his rider cursing and hanging on desperately. The scent of the direwolves sent horses into a frenzy of fear if they were not accustomed to it, but they’d quiet soon enough once Summer was gone. “The godswood,” Bran reminded Hodor.
Even Winterfell itself was crowded. The yard rang to the sound of sword and axe, the rumble of wagons, and the barking of dogs. The armory doors were open, and Bran glimpsed Mikken at his forge, his hammer ringing as sweat dripped off his bare chest. Bran had never seen as many strangers in all his years, not even when King Robert had come to visit Father.
He tried not to flinch as Hodor ducked through a low door. They walked down a long dim hallway, Summer padding easily beside them. The wolf glanced up from time to time, eyes smoldering like liquid gold. Bran would have liked to touch him, but he was riding too high for his hand to reach.
The godswood was an island of peace in the sea of chaos that Winterfell had become. Hodor made his way through the dense stands of oak and ironwood and sentinels, to the still pool beside the heart tree. He stopped under the gnarled limbs of the weirwood, humming. Bran reached up over his head and pulled himself out of his seat, drawing the dead weight of his legs up through the holes in the wicker basket. He hung for a moment, dangling, the dark red leaves brushing against his face, until Hodor lifted him and lowered him to the smooth stone beside the water. “I want to be by myself for a while,” he said. “You go soak. Go to the pools.”
“Hodor.” Hodor stomped through the trees and vanished. Across the godswood, beneath the windows of the Guest House, an underground hot spring fed three small ponds. Steam rose from the water day and night, and the wall that loomed above was thick with moss. Hodor hated cold water, and would fight like a treed wildcat when threatened with soap, but he would happily immerse himself in the hottest pool and sit for hours, giving a loud burp to echo the spring whenever a bubble rose from the murky green depths to break upon the surface.
Summer lapped at the water and settled down at Bran’s side. He rubbed the wolf under the jaw, and for a moment boy and beast both felt at peace. Bran had always liked the godswood, even before, but of late he found himself drawn to it more and more. Even the heart tree no longer scared him the way it used to. The deep red eyes carved into the pale trunk still watched him, yet somehow he took comfort from that now. The gods were looking over him, he told himself; the old gods, gods of the Starks and the First Men and the children of the forest, his father’s gods. He felt safe in their sight, and the deep silence of the trees helped him think. Bran had been thinking a lot since his fall; thinking, and dreaming, and talking with the gods.
“Please make it so Robb won’t go away,” he prayed softly. He moved his hand through the cold water, sending ripples across the pool. “Please make him stay. Or if he has to go, bring him home safe, with Mother and Father and the girls. And make it … make it so Rickon understands.”
His baby brother had been wild as a winter storm since he learned Robb was riding off to war, weeping and angry by turns. He’d refused to eat, cried and screamed for most of a night, even punched Old Nan when she tried to sing him to sleep, and the next day he’d vanished. Robb had set half the castle searching for him, and when at last they’d found him down in the crypts, Rickon had slashed at them with a rusted iron sword he’d snatched from a dead king’s hand, and Shaggydog had come slavering out of the darkness like a green-eyed demon. The wolf was near as wild as Rickon; he’d bitten Gage on the arm and torn a chunk of flesh from Mikken’s thigh. It had taken Robb himself and Grey Wind to bring him to bay. Farlen had the black wolf chained up in the kennels now, and Rickon cried all the more for being without him.
Maester Luwin counseled Robb to remain at Winterfell, and Bran pleaded with him too, for his own sake as much as Rickon’s, but his brother only shook his head stubbornly and said, “I don’t want to go. I have to.”
It was only half a lie. Someone had to go, to hold the Neck and help the Tullys against the Lannisters, Bran could understand that, but it did not have to be Robb. His brother might have given the command to Hal Mollen or Theon Greyjoy, or to one of his lords bannermen. Maester Luwin urged him to do just that, but Robb would not hear of it. “My lord father would never have sent men off to die while he huddled like a craven behind the walls of Winterfell,” he said, all Robb the Lord.
Robb seemed half a stranger to Bran now, transformed, a lord in truth, though he had not yet seen his sixteenth name day. Even their father’s bannermen seemed to sense it. Many tried to test him, each in his own way. Roose Bolton and Robett Glover both demanded the honor of battle command, the first brusquely, the second with a smile and a jest. Stout, grey-haired Maege Mormont, dressed in mail like a man, told Robb bluntly that he was young enough to be her grandson, and had no business giving her commands … but as it happened, she had a granddaughter she would be willing to have him marry. Soft-spoken Lord Cerwyn had actually brought his daughter with him, a plump, homely maid of thirty years who sat at her father’s left hand and never lifted her eyes from her plate. Jovial Lord Hornwood had no daughters, but he did bring gifts, a horse one day, a haunch of venison the next, a silver-chased hunting horn the day after, and he asked nothing in return … nothing but a certain holdfast taken from his grandfather, and hunting rights north of a certain ridge, and leave to dam the White Knife, if it please the lord.
Robb answered each of them with cool courtesy, much as Father might have, and somehow he bent them to his will.
And when Lord Umber, who was called the Greatjon by his men and stood as tall as Hodor and twice as wide, threatened to take his forces home if he was placed behind the Hornwoods or the Cerwyns in the order of march, Robb told him he was welcome to do so. “And when we are done with the Lannisters,” he promised, scratching Grey Wind behind the ear, “we will march back north, root you out of your keep, and hang you for an oathbreaker.” Cursing, the Greatjon flung a flagon of ale into the fire and bellowed that Robb was so green he must piss grass. When Hallis Mollen moved to restrain him, he knocked him to the floor, kicked over a table, and unsheathed the biggest, ugliest greatsword that Bran had ever seen. All along the benches, his sons and brothers and sworn swords leapt to their feet, grabbing for their steel.
Yet Robb only said a quiet word, and in a snarl and the blink of an eye Lord Umber was on his back, his sword spinning on the floor three feet away and his hand dripping blood where Grey Wind had bitten off two fingers. “My lord father taught me that it was death to bare steel against your liege lord,” Robb said, “but doubtless you only meant to cut my meat.” Bran’s bowels went to water as the Greatjon struggled to rise, sucking at the red stumps of fingers … but then, astonishingly, the huge man laughed. “Your meat,” he roared, “is bloody tough.”
And somehow after that the Greatjon became Robb’s right hand, his staunchest champion, loudly telling all and sundry that the boy lord was a Stark after all, and they’d damn well better bend their knees if they didn’t fancy having them chewed off.
Yet that very night, his brother came to Bran’s bedchamber pale and shaken, after the fires had burned low in the Great Hall. “I thought he was going to kill me,” Robb confessed. “Did you see the way he threw down Hal, like he was no bigger than Rickon? Gods, I was so scared. And the Greatjon’s not the worst of them, only the loudest. Lord Roose never says a word, he only looks at me, and all I can think of is that room they have in the Dreadfort, where the Boltons hang the skins of their enemies.”
“That’s just one of Old Nan’s stories,” Bran said. A note of doubt crept into his voice. “Isn’t it?”
“I don’t know.” He gave a weary shake of his head. “Lord Cerwyn means to take his daughter south with us. To cook for him, he says. Theon is certain I’ll find the girl in my bedroll one night. I wish … I wish Father was here …”
That was the one thing they could agree on, Bran and Rickon and Robb the Lord; they all wished Father was here. But Lord Eddard was a thousand leagues away, a captive in some dungeon, a hunted fugitive running for his life, or even dead. No one seemed to know for certain; every traveler told a different tale, each more terrifying than the last. The heads of Father’s guardsmen were rotting on the walls of the Red Keep, impaled on spikes. King Robert was dead at Father’s hands. The Baratheons had laid siege to King’s Landing. Lord Eddard had fled south with the king’s wicked brother Renly. Arya and Sansa had been murdered by the Hound. Mother had killed Tyrion the Imp and hung his body from the walls of Riverrun. Lord Tywin Lannister was marching on the Eyrie, burning and slaughtering as he went. One wine-sodden taleteller even claimed that Rhaegar Targaryen had returned from the dead and was marshaling a vast host of ancient heroes on Dragonstone to reclaim his father’s throne.
When the raven came, bearing a letter marked with Father’s own seal and written in Sansa’s hand, the cruel truth seemed no less incredible. Bran would never forget the look on Robb’s face as he stared at their sister’s words. “She says Father conspired at treason with the king’s brothers,” he read. “King Robert is dead, and Mother and I are summoned to the Red Keep to swear fealty to Joffrey. She says we must be loyal, and when she marries Joffrey she will plead with him to spare our lord father’s life.” His fingers closed into a fist, crushing Sansa’s letter between them. “And she says nothing of Arya, nothing, not so much as a word. Damn her! What’s wrong with the girl?”
Bran felt all cold inside. “She lost her wolf,” he said, weakly, remembering the day when four of his father’s guardsmen had returned from the south with Lady’s bones. Summer and Grey Wind and Shaggydog had begun to howl before they crossed the drawbridge, in voices drawn and desolate. Beneath the shadow of the First Keep was an ancient lichyard, its headstones spotted with pale lichen, where the old Kings of Winter had laid their faithful servants. It was there they buried Lady, while her brothers stalked between the graves like restless shadows. She had gone south, and only her bones had returned.
Their grandfather, old Lord Rickard, had gone as well, with his son Brandon who was Father’s brother, and two hundred of his best men. None had ever returned. And Father had gone south, with Arya and Sansa, and Jory and Hullen and Fat Tom and the rest, and later Mother and Ser Rodrik had gone, and they hadn’t come back either. And now Robb meant to go. Not to King’s Landing and not to swear fealty, but to Riverrun, with a sword in his hand. And if their lord father were truly a prisoner, that could mean his death for a certainty. It frightened Bran more than he could say.
“If Robb has to go, watch over him,” Bran entreated the old gods, as they watched him with the heart tree’s red eyes, “and watch over his men, Hal and Quent and the rest, and Lord Umber and Lady Mormont and the other lords. And Theon too, I suppose. Watch them and keep them safe, if it please you, gods. Help them defeat the Lannisters and save Father and bring them home.”
A faint wind sighed through the godswood and the red leaves stirred and whispered. Summer bared his teeth. “You hear them, boy?” a voice asked.
Bran lifted his head. Osha stood across the pool, beneath an ancient oak, her face shadowed by leaves. Even in irons, the Wildling moved quiet as a cat. Summer circled the pool, sniffed at her. The tall woman flinched.
“Summer, to me,” Bran called. The direwolf took one final sniff, spun, and bounded back. Bran wrapped his arms around him. “What are you doing here?” He had not seen Osha since they’d taken her captive in the wolfswood, though he knew she’d been set to working in the kitchens.
“They are my gods too,” Osha said. “Beyond the Wall, they are the only gods.” Her hair was growing out, brown and shaggy. It made her look more womanly, that and the simple dress of brown roughspun they’d given her when they took her mail and leather. “Gage lets me have my prayers from time to time, when I feel the need, and I let him do as he likes under my skirt, when he feels the need. It’s nothing to me. I like the smell of flour on his hands, and he’s gentler than Stiv.” She gave an awkward bow. “I’ll leave you. There’s pots that want scouring.”
“No, stay,” Bran commanded her. “Tell me what you meant, about hearing the gods.”
Osha studied him. “You asked them and they’re answering. Open your ears, listen, you’ll hear.”
Bran listened. “It’s only the wind,” he said after a moment, uncertain. “The leaves are rustling.”
“Who do you think sends the wind, if not the gods?” She seated herself across the pool from him, clinking faintly as she moved. Mikken had fixed iron manacles to her ankles, with a heavy chain between them; she could walk, so long as she kept her strides small, but there was no way for her to run, or climb, or mount a horse. “They see you, boy. They hear you talking. That rustling, that’s them talking back.”
“What are they saying?”
“They’re sad. Your lord brother will get no help from them, not where he’s going. The old gods have no power in the south. The weirwoods there were all cut down, thousands of years ago. How can they watch your brother when they have no eyes?”
Bran had not thought of that. It frightened him. If even the gods could not help his brother, what hope was there? Maybe Osha wasn’t hearing them right. He cocked his head and tried to listen again. He thought he could hear the sadness now, but nothing more than that.
The rustling grew louder. Bran heard muffled footfalls and a low humming, and Hodor came blundering out of the trees, naked and smiling. “Hodor!”
“He must have heard our voices,” Bran said. “Hodor, you forgot your clothes.”
“Hodor,” Hodor agreed. He was dripping wet from the neck down, steaming in the chill air. His body was covered with brown hair, thick as a pelt. Between his legs, his manhood swung long and heavy.
Osha eyed him with a sour smile. “Now there’s a big man,” she said. “He has giant’s blood in him, or I’m the queen.”
“Maester Luwin says there are no more giants. He says they’re all dead, like the children of the forest. All that’s left of them are old bones in the earth that men turn up with plows from time to time.”
“Let Maester Luwin ride beyond the Wall,” Osha said. “He’ll find giants then, or they’ll find him. My brother killed one. Ten foot tall she was, and stunted at that. They’ve been known to grow big as twelve and thirteen feet. Fierce things they are too, all hair and teeth, and the wives have beards like their husbands, so there’s no telling them apart. The women take human men for lovers, and it’s from them the half bloods come. It goes harder on the women they catch. The men are so big they’ll rip a maid apart before they get her with child.” She grinned at him. “But you don’t know what I mean, do you, boy?”
“Yes I do,” Bran insisted. He understood about mating; he had seen dogs in the yard, and watched a stallion mount a mare. But talking about it made him uncomfortable. He looked at Hodor. “Go back and bring your clothes, Hodor,” he said. “Go dress.”
“Hodor.” He walked back the way he had come, ducking under a low-hanging tree limb.
He was awfully big, Bran thought as he watched him go. “Are there truly giants beyond the Wall?” he asked Osha, uncertainly.
“Giants and worse than giants, Lordling. I tried to tell your brother when he asked his questions, him and your maester and that smiley boy Greyjoy. The cold winds are rising, and men go out from their fires and never come back … or if they do, they’re not men no more, but only wights, with blue eyes and cold black hands. Why do you think I run south with Stiv and Hali and the rest of them fools? Mance thinks he’ll fight, the brave sweet stubborn man, like the white walkers were no more than rangers, but what does he know? He can call himself King-beyond-the-Wall all he likes, but he’s still just another old black crow who flew down from the Shadow Tower. He’s never tasted winter. I was born up there, child, like my mother and her mother before her and her mother before her, born of the Free Folk. We remember.” Osha stood, her chains rattling together. “I tried to tell your lordling brother. Only yesterday, when I saw him in the yard. ‘M’lord Stark,’ I called to him, respectful as you please, but he looked through me, and that sweaty oaf Greatjon Umber shoves me out of the path. So be it. I’ll wear my irons and hold my tongue. A man who won’t listen can’t hear.”
“Tell me. Robb will listen to me, I know he will.”
“Will he now? We’ll see. You tell him this, m’lord. You tell him he’s bound on marching the wrong way. It’s north he should be taking his swords. North, not south. You hear me?”
Bran nodded. “I’ll tell him.”
But that night, when they feasted in the Great Hall, Robb was not with them. He took his meal in the solar instead, with Lord Rickard and the Greatjon and the other lords bannermen, to make the final plans for the long march to come. It was left to Bran to fill his place at the head of the table, and act the host to Lord Karstark’s sons and honored friends. They were already at their places when Hodor carried Bran into the hall on his back, and knelt beside the high seat. Two of the serving men helped lift him from his basket. Bran could feel the eyes of every stranger in the hall. It had grown quiet. “My lords,” Hallis Mollen announced, “Brandon Stark, of Winterfell.”
“I welcome you to our fires,” Bran said stiffly, “and offer you meat and mead in honor of our friendship.”
Harrion Karstark, the oldest of Lord Rickard’s sons, bowed, and his brothers after him, yet as they settled back in their places he heard the younger two talking in low voices, over the clatter of wine cups. “…   sooner die than live like that,” muttered one, his father’s namesake Eddard, and his brother Torrhen said likely the boy was broken inside as well as out, too craven to take his own life.
Broken, Bran thought bitterly as he clutched his knife. Is that what he was now? Bran the Broken? “I don’t want to be broken,” he whispered fiercely to Maester Luwin, who’d been seated to his right. “I want to be a knight.”
“There are some who call my order the knights of the mind,” Luwin replied. “You are a surpassing clever boy when you work at it, Bran. Have you ever thought that you might wear a maester’s chain? There is no limit to what you might learn.”
“I want to learn magic,” Bran told him. “The crow promised that I would fly.”
Maester Luwin sighed. “I can teach you history, healing, herblore. I can teach you the speech of ravens, and how to build a castle, and the way a sailor steers his ship by the stars. I can teach you to measure the days and mark the seasons, and at the Citadel in Oldtown they can teach you a thousand things more. But, Bran, no man can teach you magic.”
“The children could,” Bran said. “The children of the forest.” That reminded him of the promise he had made to Osha in the godswood, so he told Luwin what she had said.
The maester listened politely. “The Wildling woman could give Old Nan lessons in telling tales, I think,” he said when Bran was done. “I will talk with her again if you like, but it would be best if you did not trouble your brother with this folly. He has more than enough to concern him without fretting over giants and dead men in the woods. It’s the Lannisters who hold your lord father, Bran, not the children of the forest.” He put a gentle hand on Bran’s arm. “Think on what I said, child.”
And two days later, as a red dawn broke across a windswept sky, Bran found himself in the yard beneath the gatehouse, strapped atop Dancer as he said his farewells to his brother.
“You are the lord in Winterfell now,” Robb told him. He was mounted on a shaggy grey stallion, his shield hung from the horse’s side; wood banded with iron, white and grey, and on it the snarling face of a direwolf. His brother wore grey chainmail over bleached leathers, sword and dagger at his waist, a fur-trimmed cloak across his shoulders. “You must take my place, as I took Father’s, until we come home.”
“I know,” Bran replied miserably. He had never felt so little or alone or scared. He did not know how to be a lord.
“Listen to Maester Luwin’s counsel, and take care of Rickon. Tell him that I’ll be back as soon as the fighting is done.”
Rickon had refused to come down. He was up in his chamber, red-eyed and defiant. “No!” he’d screamed when Bran had asked if he didn’t want to say farewell to Robb. “NO farewell!”
“I told him,” Bran said. “He says no one ever comes back.”
“He can’t be a baby forever. He’s a Stark, and near four.” Robb sighed. “Well, Mother will be home soon. And I’ll bring back Father, I promise.”
He wheeled his courser around and trotted away. Grey Wind followed, loping beside the warhorse, lean and swift. Hallis Mollen went before them through the gate, carrying the rippling white banner of House Stark atop a high standard of grey ash. Theon Greyjoy and the Greatjon fell in on either side of Robb, and their knights formed up in a double column behind them, steel-tipped lances glinting in the sun.
Uncomfortably, he remembered Osha’s words. He’s marching the wrong way, he thought. For an instant he wanted to gallop after him and shout a warning, but when Robb vanished beneath the portcullis, the moment was gone.
Beyond the castle walls, a roar of sound went up. The foot soldiers and townsfolk were cheering Robb as he rode past, Bran knew; cheering for Lord Stark, for the Lord of Winterfell on his great stallion, with his cloak streaming and Grey Wind racing beside him. They would never cheer for him that way, he realized with a dull ache. He might be the lord in Winterfell while his brother and father were gone, but he was still Bran the Broken. He could not even get off his own horse, except to fall.
When the distant cheers had faded to silence and the yard was empty at last, Winterfell seemed deserted and dead. Bran looked around at the faces of those who remained, women and children and old men … and Hodor. The huge stableboy had a lost and frightened look to his face. “Hodor?” he said sadly.
“Hodor,” Bran agreed, wondering what it meant.

The oldest were men grown, seventeen and eighteen years from the day of their naming. One was past twenty. Most were younger, sixteen or less.
Bran watched them from the balcony of Maester Luwin’s turret, listening to them grunt and strain and curse as they swung their staves and wooden swords. The yard was alive to the clack of wood on wood, punctuated all too often by thwacks and yowls of pain when a blow struck leather or flesh. Ser Rodrik strode among the boys, face reddening beneath his white whiskers, muttering at them one and all. Bran had never seen the old knight look so fierce. “No,” he kept saying. “No. No. No.”
“They don’t fight very well,” Bran said dubiously. He scratched Summer idly behind the ears as the direwolf tore at a haunch of meat. Bones crunched between his teeth.
“For a certainty,” Maester Luwin agreed with a deep sigh. The maester was peering through his big Myrish lens tube, measuring shadows and noting the position of the comet that hung low in the morning sky. “Yet given time … Ser Rodrik has the truth of it, we need men to walk the walls. Your lord father took the cream of his guard to King’s Landing, and your brother took the rest, along with all the likely lads for leagues around. Many will not come back to us, and we must needs find the men to take their places.”
Bran stared resentfully at the sweating boys below. “If I still had my legs, I could beat them all.” He remembered the last time he’d held a sword in his hand, when the king had come to Winterfell. It was only a wooden sword, yet he’d knocked Prince Tommen down half a hundred times. “Ser Rodrik should teach me to use a poleaxe. If I had a poleaxe with a big long haft, Hodor could be my legs. We could be a knight together.”
“I think that … unlikely,” Maester Luwin said. “Bran, when a man fights, his arms and legs and thoughts must be as one.”
Below in the yard, Ser Rodrik was yelling. “You fight like a goose. He pecks you and you peck him harder. Parry! Block the blow. Goose fighting will not suffice. If those were real swords, the first peck would take your arm off!” One of the other boys laughed, and the old knight rounded on him. “You laugh. You. Now that is gall. You fight like a hedgehog …”
“There was a knight once who couldn’t see,” Bran said stubbornly, as Ser Rodrik went on below. “Old Nan told me about him. He had a long staff with blades at both ends and he could spin it in his hands and chop two men at once.”
“Symeon Star-Eyes,” Luwin said as he marked numbers in a book. “When he lost his eyes, he put star sapphires in the empty sockets, or so the singers claim. Bran, that is only a story, like the tales of Florian the Fool. A fable from the Age of Heroes.” The maester tsked. “You must put these dreams aside, they will only break your heart.”
The mention of dreams reminded him. “I dreamed about the crow again last night. The one with three eyes. He flew into my bedchamber and told me to come with him, so I did. We went down to the crypts. Father was there, and we talked. He was sad.”
“And why was that?” Luwin peered through his tube.
“It was something to do about Jon, I think.” The dream had been deeply disturbing, more so than any of the other crow dreams. “Hodor won’t go down into the crypts.”
The maester had only been half listening, Bran could tell. He lifted his eye from the tube, blinking. “Hodor won’t …?”
“Go down into the crypts. When I woke, I told him to take me down, to see if Father was truly there. At first he didn’t know what I was saying, but I got him to the steps by telling him to go here and go there, only then he wouldn’t go down. He just stood on the top step and said ‘Hodor,’ like he was scared of the dark, but I had a torch. It made me so mad I almost gave him a swat in the head, like Old Nan is always doing.” He saw the way the maester was frowning and hurriedly added, “I didn’t, though.”
“Good. Hodor is a man, not a mule to be beaten.”
“In the dream I flew down with the crow, but I can’t do that when I’m awake,” Bran explained.
“Why would you want to go down to the crypts?”
“I told you. To look for Father.”
The maester tugged at the chain around his neck, as he often did when he was uncomfortable. “Bran, sweet child, one day Lord Eddard will sit below in stone, beside his father and his father’s father and all the Starks back to the old Kings in the North … but that will not be for many years, gods be good. Your father is a prisoner of the queen in King’s Landing. You will not find him in the crypts.”
“He was there last night. I talked to him.”
“Stubborn boy,” the maester sighed, setting his book aside. “Would you like to go see?”
“I can’t. Hodor won’t go, and the steps are too narrow and twisty for Dancer.”
“I believe I can solve that difficulty.”
In place of Hodor, the wildling woman Osha was summoned. She was tall and tough and uncomplaining, willing to go wherever she was commanded. “I lived my life beyond the Wall, a hole in the ground won’t fret me none, m’lords,” she said.
“Summer, come,” Bran called as she lifted him in wiry-strong arms. The direwolf left his bone and followed as Osha carried Bran across the yard and down the spiral steps to the cold vault under the earth. Maester Luwin went ahead with a torch. Bran did not even mind—too badly—that she carried him in her arms and not on her back. Ser Rodrik had ordered Osha’s chain struck off, since she had served faithfully and well since she had been at Winterfell. She still wore the heavy iron shackles around her ankles—a sign that she was not yet wholly trusted—but they did not hinder her sure strides down the steps.
Bran could not recall the last time he had been in the crypts. It had been before, for certain. When he was little, he used to play down here with Robb and Jon and his sisters.
He wished they were here now; the vault might not have seemed so dark and scary. Summer stalked out in the echoing gloom, then stopped, lifted his head, and sniffed the chill dead air. He bared his teeth and crept backward, eyes glowing golden in the light of the maester’s torch. Even Osha, hard as old iron, seemed uncomfortable. “Grim folk, by the look of them,” she said as she eyed the long row of granite Starks on their stone thrones.
“They were the Kings of Winter,” Bran whispered. Somehow it felt wrong to talk too loudly in this place.
Osha smiled. “Winter’s got no king. If you’d seen it, you’d know that, summer boy.”
“They were the Kings in the North for thousands of years,” Maester Luwin said, lifting the torch high so the light shone on the stone faces. Some were hairy and bearded, shaggy men fierce as the wolves that crouched by their feet. Others were shaved clean, their features gaunt and sharp-edged as the iron longswords across their laps. “Hard men for a hard time. Come.” He strode briskly down the vault, past the procession of stone pillars and the endless carved figures. A tongue of flame trailed back from the upraised torch as he went.
The vault was cavernous, longer than Winterfell itself, and Jon had told him once that there were other levels underneath, vaults even deeper and darker where the older kings were buried. It would not do to lose the light. Summer refused to move from the steps, even when Osha followed the torch, Bran in her arms.
“Do you recall your history, Bran?” the maester said as they walked. “Tell Osha who they were and what they did, if you can.”
He looked at the passing faces and the tales came back to him. The maester had told him the stories, and Old Nan had made them come alive. “That one is Jon Stark. When the sea raiders landed in the east, he drove them out and built the castle at White Harbor. His son was Rickard Stark, not my father’s father but another Rickard, he took the Neck away from the Marsh King and married his daughter. Theon Stark’s the real thin one with the long hair and the skinny beard. They called him the ‘Hungry Wolf,’ because he was always at war. That’s a Brandon, the tall one with the dreamy face, he was Brandon the Shipwright, because he loved the sea. His tomb is empty. He tried to sail west across the Sunset Sea and was never seen again. His son was Brandon the Burner, because he put the torch to all his father’s ships in grief. There’s Rodrik Stark, who won Bear Island in a wrestling match and gave it to the Mormonts. And that’s Torrhen Stark, the King Who Knelt. He was the last King in the North and the first Lord of Winterfell, after he yielded to Aegon the Conqueror. Oh, there, he’s Cregan Stark. He fought with Prince Aemon once, and the Dragonknight said he’d never faced a finer swordsman.” They were almost at the end now, and Bran felt a sadness creeping over him. “And there’s my grandfather, Lord Rickard, who was beheaded by Mad King Aerys. His daughter Lyanna and his son Brandon are in the tombs beside him. Not me, another Brandon, my father’s brother. They’re not supposed to have statues, that’s only for the lords and the kings, but my father loved them so much he had them done.”
“The maid’s a fair one,” Osha said.
“Robert was betrothed to marry her, but Prince Rhaegar carried her off and raped her,” Bran explained. “Robert fought a war to win her back. He killed Rhaegar on the Trident with his hammer, but Lyanna died and he never got her back at all.”
“A sad tale,” said Osha, “but those empty holes are sadder.”
“Lord Eddard’s tomb, for when his time comes,” Maester Luwin said. “Is this where you saw your father in your dream, Bran?”
“Yes.” The memory made him shiver. He looked around the vault uneasily, the hairs on the back of his neck bristling. Had he heard a noise? Was there someone here?
Maester Luwin stepped toward the open sepulchre, torch in hand. “As you see, he’s not here. Nor will he be, for many a year. Dreams are only dreams, child.” He thrust his arm into the blackness inside the tomb, as into the mouth of some great beast. “Do you see? It’s quite empt—”
The darkness sprang at him, snarling.
Bran saw eyes like green fire, a flash of teeth, fur as black as the pit around them. Maester Luwin yelled and threw up his hands. The torch went flying from his fingers, caromed off the stone face of Brandon Stark, and tumbled to the statue’s feet, the flames licking up his legs. In the drunken shifting torchlight, they saw Luwin struggling with the direwolf, beating at his muzzle with one hand while the jaws closed on the other.
“Summer!” Bran screamed.
And Summer came, shooting from the dimness behind them, a leaping shadow. He slammed into Shaggydog and knocked him back, and the two direwolves rolled over and over in a tangle of grey and black fur, snapping and biting at each other, while Maester Luwin struggled to his knees, his arm torn and bloody. Osha propped Bran up against Lord Rickard’s stone wolf as she hurried to assist the maester. In the light of the guttering torch, shadow wolves twenty feet tall fought on the wall and roof.
“Shaggy,” a small voice called. When Bran looked up, his little brother was standing in the mouth of Father’s tomb. With one final snap at Summer’s face, Shaggydog broke off and bounded to Rickon’s side. “You let my father be,” Rickon warned Luwin. “You let him be.”
“Rickon,” Bran said softly. “Father’s not here.”
“Yes he is. I saw him.” Tears glistened on Rickon’s face. “I saw him last night.”
“In your dream …?”
Rickon nodded. “You leave him. You leave him be. He’s coming home now, like he promised. He’s coming home.”
Bran had never seen Maester Luwin look so uncertain before. Blood dripped down his arm where Shaggydog had shredded the wool of his sleeve and the flesh beneath. “Osha, the torch,” he said, biting through his pain, and she snatched it up before it went out. Soot stains blackened both legs of his uncle’s likeness. “That … that beast,” Luwin went on, “is supposed to be chained up in the kennels.”
Rickon patted Shaggydog’s muzzle, damp with blood. “I let him loose. He doesn’t like chains.” He licked at his fingers.
“Rickon,” Bran said, “would you like to come with me?”
“No. I like it here.”
“It’s dark here. And cold.”
“I’m not afraid. I have to wait for Father.”
“You can wait with me,” Bran said. “We’ll wait together, you and me and our wolves.” Both of the direwolves were licking wounds now, and would bear close watching.
“Bran,” the maester said firmly, “I know you mean well, but Shaggydog is too wild to run loose. I’m the third man he’s savaged. Give him the freedom of the castle and it’s only a question of time before he kills someone. The truth is hard, but the wolf has to be chained, or …” He hesitated.
 … or killed, Bran thought, but what he said was, “He was not made for chains. We will wait in your tower, all of us.”
“That is quite impossible,” Maester Luwin said.
Osha grinned. “The boy’s the lordling here, as I recall.” She handed Luwin back his torch and scooped Bran up into her arms again. “The maester’s tower it is.”
“Will you come, Rickon?”
His brother nodded. “If Shaggy comes too,” he said, running after Osha and Bran, and there was nothing Maester Luwin could do but follow, keeping a wary eye on the wolves.
Maester Luwin’s turret was so cluttered that it seemed to Bran a wonder that he ever found anything. Tottering piles of books covered tables and chairs, rows of stoppered jars lined the shelves, candle stubs and puddles of dried wax dotted the furniture, the bronze Myrish lens tube sat on a tripod by the terrace door, star charts hung from the walls, shadow maps lay scattered among the rushes, papers, quills, and pots of inks were everywhere, and all of it was spotted with droppings from the ravens in the rafters. Their strident quorks drifted down from above as Osha washed and cleaned and bandaged the maester’s wounds, under Luwin’s terse instruction. “This is folly,” the small grey man said while she dabbed at the wolf bites with a stinging ointment. “I agree that it is odd that both you boys dreamed the same dream, yet when you stop to consider it, it’s only natural. You miss your lord father, and you know that he is a captive. Fear can fever a man’s mind and give him queer thoughts. Rickon is too young to comprehend—”
“I’m four now,” Rickon said. He was peeking through the lens tube at the gargoyles on the First Keep. The direwolves sat on opposite sides of the large round room, licking their wounds and gnawing on bones.
“—too young, and—ooh, seven hells, that burns, no, don’t stop, more. Too young, as I say, but you, Bran, you’re old enough to know that dreams are only dreams.”
“Some are, some aren’t.” Osha poured pale red firemilk into a long gash. Luwin gasped. “The children of the forest could tell you a thing or two about dreaming.”
Tears were streaming down the maester’s face, yet he shook his head doggedly. “The children … live only in dreams. Now. Dead and gone. Enough, that’s enough. Now the bandages. Pads and then wrap, and make it tight, I’ll be bleeding.”
“Old Nan says the children knew the songs of the trees, that they could fly like birds and swim like fish and talk to the animals,” Bran said. “She says that they made music so beautiful that it made you cry like a little baby just to hear it.”
“And all this they did with magic,” Maester Luwin said, distracted. “I wish they were here now. A spell would heal my arm less painfully, and they could talk to Shaggy dog and tell him not to bite.” He gave the big black wolf an angry glance out of the corner of his eye. “Take a lesson, Bran. The man who trusts in spells is dueling with a glass sword. As the children did. Here, let me show you something.” He stood abruptly, crossed the room, and returned with a green jar in his good hand. “Have a look at these,” he said as he pulled the stopper and shook out a handful of shiny black arrowheads.
Bran picked one up. “It’s made of glass.” Curious, Rickon drifted closer to peer over the table.
“Dragonglass,” Osha named it as she sat down beside Luwin, bandagings in hand.
“Obsidian,” Maester Luwin insisted, holding out his wounded arm. “Forged in the fires of the gods, far below the earth. The children of the forest hunted with that, thousands of years ago. The children worked no metal. In place of mail, they wore long shirts of woven leaves and bound their legs in bark, so they seemed to melt into the wood. In place of swords, they carried blades of obsidian.”
“And still do.” Osha placed soft pads over the bites on the maester’s forearm and bound them tight with long strips of linen.
Bran held the arrowhead up close. The black glass was slick and shiny. He thought it beautiful. “Can I keep one?”
“As you wish,” the maester said.
“I want one too,” Rickon said. “I want four. I’m four.”
Luwin made him count them out. “Careful, they’re still sharp. Don’t cut yourself.”
“Tell me about the children,” Bran said. It was important.
“What do you wish to know?”
“Everything.”
Maester Luwin tugged at his chain collar where it chafed against his neck. “They were people of the Dawn Age, the very first, before kings and kingdoms,” he said. “In those days, there were no castles or holdfasts, no cities, not so much as a market town to be found between here and the sea of Dorne. There were no men at all. Only the children of the forest dwelt in the lands we now call the Seven Kingdoms.
“They were a people dark and beautiful, small of stature, no taller than children even when grown to manhood. They lived in the depths of the wood, in caves and crannogs and secret tree towns. Slight as they were, the children were quick and graceful. Male and female hunted together, with weirwood bows and flying snares. Their gods were the gods of the forest, stream, and stone, the old gods whose names are secret. Their wise men were called greenseers, and carved strange faces in the weirwoods to keep watch on the woods. How long the children reigned here or where they came from, no man can know.
“But some twelve thousand years ago, the First Men appeared from the east, crossing the Broken Arm of Dorne before it was broken. They came with bronze swords and great leathern shields, riding horses. No horse had ever been seen on this side of the narrow sea. No doubt the children were as frightened by the horses as the First Men were by the faces in the trees. As the First Men carved out holdfasts and farms, they cut down the faces and gave them to the fire. Horror-struck, the children went to war. The old songs say that the greenseers used dark magics to make the seas rise and sweep away the land, shattering the Arm, but it was too late to close the door. The wars went on until the earth ran red with blood of men and children both, but more children than men, for men were bigger and stronger, and wood and stone and obsidian make a poor match for bronze. Finally the wise of both races prevailed, and the chiefs and heroes of the First Men met the greenseers and wood dancers amidst the weirwood groves of a small island in the great lake called Gods Eye.
“There they forged the Pact. The First Men were given the coastlands, the high plains and bright meadows, the mountains and bogs, but the deep woods were to remain forever the children’s, and no more weirwoods were to be put to the axe anywhere in the realm. So the gods might bear witness to the signing, every tree on the island was given a face, and afterward, the sacred order of green men was formed to keep watch over the Isle of Faces.
“The Pact began four thousand years of friendship between men and children. In time, the First Men even put aside the gods they had brought with them, and took up the worship of the secret gods of the wood. The signing of the Pact ended the Dawn Age, and began the Age of Heroes.”
Bran’s fist curled around the shiny black arrowhead. “But the children of the forest are all gone now, you said.”
“Here, they are,” said Osha, as she bit off the end of the last bandage with her teeth. “North of the Wall, things are different. That’s where the children went, and the giants, and the other old races.”
Maester Luwin sighed. “Woman, by rights you ought to be dead or in chains. The Starks have treated you more gently than you deserve. It is unkind to repay them for their kindness by filling the boys’ heads with folly.”
“Tell me where they went,” Bran said. “I want to know.”
“Me too,” Rickon echoed.
“Oh, very well,” Luwin muttered. “So long as the kingdoms of the First Men held sway, the Pact endured, all through the Age of Heroes and the Long Night and the birth of the Seven Kingdoms, yet finally there came a time, many centuries later, when other peoples crossed the narrow sea.
“The Andals were the first, a race of tall, fair-haired warriors who came with steel and fire and the seven-pointed star of the new gods painted on their chests. The wars lasted hundreds of years, but in the end the six southron kingdoms all fell before them. Only here, where the King in the North threw back every army that tried to cross the Neck, did the rule of the First Men endure. The Andals burnt out the weirwood groves, hacked down the faces, slaughtered the children where they found them, and everywhere proclaimed the triumph of the Seven over the old gods. So the children fled north—”
Summer began to howl.
Maester Luwin broke off, startled. When Shaggydog bounded to his feet and added his voice to his brother’s, dread clutched at Bran’s heart. “It’s coming,” he whispered, with the certainty of despair. He had known it since last night, he realized, since the crow had led him down into the crypts to say farewell. He had known it, but he had not believed. He had wanted Maester Luwin to be right. The crow, he thought, the three-eyed crow …
The howling stopped as suddenly as it had begun. Summer padded across the tower floor to Shaggydog, and began to lick at a mat of bloody fur on the back of his brother’s neck. From the window came a flutter of wings.
A raven landed on the grey stone sill, opened its beak, and gave a harsh, raucous rattle of distress.
Rickon began to cry. His arrowheads fell from his hand one by one and clattered on the floor. Bran pulled him close and hugged him.
Maester Luwin stared at the black bird as if it were a scorpion with feathers. He rose, slow as a sleepwalker, and moved to the window. When he whistled, the raven hopped onto his bandaged forearm. There was dried blood on its wings. “A hawk,” Luwin murmured, “perhaps an owl. Poor thing, a wonder it got through.” He took the letter from its leg.
Bran found himself shivering as the maester unrolled the paper. “What is it?” he said, holding his brother all the harder.
“You know what it is, boy,” Osha said, not unkindly. She put her hand on his head.
Maester Luwin looked up at them numbly, a small grey man with blood on the sleeve of his grey wool robe and tears in his bright grey eyes. “My lords,” he said to the sons, in a voice gone hoarse and shrunken, “we … we shall need to find a stonecarver who knew his likeness well …”

Bran preferred the hard stone of the window seat to the comforts of his 
featherbed and blankets. Abed, the walls pressed close and the ceiling hung 
heavy above him; abed, the room was his cell, and Winterfell his prison. Yet 
outside his window, the wide world still called.
He could not walk, nor climb nor hunt nor fight with a wooden sword as once he 
had, but he could still look. He liked to watch the windows begin to 
glow all over Winterfell as candles and hearth fires were lit behind the 
diamond-shaped panes of tower and hall, and he loved to listen to the 
direwolves sing to the stars.Of late, he often dreamed of wolves. They are
talking to me, brother 
to brother, he told himself when the direwolves howled. He could almost 
understand them . . . not quite, not truly, but 
almost . . . as if they were singing in a language he 
had once known and somehow forgotten. The Walders might be scared of them, but 
the Starks had wolf blood. Old Nan told him so. “Though it is stronger in some 
than in others,” she warned.
Summer’s howls were long and sad, full of grief and longing. Shaggydog’s were 
more savage. Their voices echoed through the yards and halls until the castle 
rang and it seemed as though some great pack of direwolves haunted Winterfell, 
instead of only two . . . two where there had once been six. 
Do they miss their
brothers and sisters too? Bran wondered. Are they calling to Grey 
Wind and Ghost, to Nymeria and Lady’s Shade? Do they want them to come home and 
be a pack together?
“Who can know the mind of a wolf?” Ser Rodrik Cassel said when Bran asked him 
why they howled. Bran’s lady mother had named him castellan of Winterfell in 
her absence, and his duties left him little time for idle questions.
“It’s freedom they’re calling for,” declared Farlen, who was kennelmaster and 
had no more love for the direwolves than his hounds did. “They don’t like 
being walled up, and who’s to blame them? Wild things belong in the wild, not 
in a castle.”
“They want to hunt,” agreed Gage the cook as he tossed cubes of suet in a 
great kettle of stew. “A wolf smells better’n any man. Like as not, they’ve 
caught the scent o’ prey.”
Maester Luwin did not think so. “Wolves often howl at the moon. These are 
howling at the comet. See how bright it is, Bran? Perchance they think it 
is the moon.”
When Bran repeated that to Osha, she laughed aloud. “Your wolves have more wit 
than your maester,” the wildling woman said. “They know truths the grey man 
has forgotten.” The way she said it made him shiver, and when he asked what 
the comet meant, she answered, “Blood and fire, boy, and nothing 
sweet.”
Bran asked Septon Chayle about the comet while they were sorting through some 
scrolls snatched from the library fire. “It is the sword that slays the 
season,” he replied, and soon after the white raven came from Oldtown bringing 
word of autumn, so

doubtless he was right.
Though Old Nan did not think so, and she’d lived longer than any of them. 
“Dragons,” she said, lifting her head and sniffing. She was near blind and 
could not see the comet, yet she claimed she could smell it. “It be 
dragons, boy,” she insisted. Bran got no princes from Nan, no more 
than he ever had.
Hodor said only, “Hodor.” That was all he ever said.
And still the direwolves howled. The guards on the walls muttered curses, 
hounds in the kennels barked furiously, horses kicked at their stalls, the 
Walders shivered by their fire, and even Maester Luwin complained of sleepless 
nights. Only Bran did not mind. Ser Rodrik had confined the wolves to the 
godswood after Shaggydog bit Little Walder, but the stones of Winterfell played 
queer tricks with sound, and sometimes it sounded as if they were in the yard 
right below Bran’s window. Other times he would have sworn they were up on the 
curtain walls, loping round like sentries. He wished that he could see 
them.
He could see the comet hanging above the Guards Hall and the Bell 
Tower, and farther back the First Keep, squat and round, its gargoyles black 
shapes against the bruised purple dusk. Once Bran had known every stone of 
those buildings, inside and out; he had climbed them all, scampering up walls 
as easily as other boys ran down stairs. Their rooftops had been his secret 
places, and the crows atop the broken tower his special friends.
And then he had fallen.
Bran did not remember falling, yet they said he had, so he

supposed it must be true. He had almost died. When he saw the weatherworn 
gargoyles atop the First Keep where it had happened, he got a queer tight 
feeling in his belly. And now he could not climb, nor walk nor run nor 
swordfight, and the dreams he’d dreamed of knighthood had soured in his 
head.
Summer had howled the day Bran had fallen, and for long after as he lay broken 
in his bed; Robb had told him so before he went away to war. Summer had mourned 
for him, and Shaggydog and Grey Wind had joined in his grief. And the night the 
bloody raven had brought word of their father’s death, the wolves had known 
that too. Bran had been in the maester’s turret with Rickon talking of the 
children of the forest when Summer and Shaggydog had drowned out Luwin with 
their howls.
Who are they mourning now? Had some enemy slain the King in the 
North, who used to be his brother Robb? Had his bastard brother Jon Snow fallen 
from the Wall? Had his mother died, or one of his sisters? Or was this 
something else, as maester and septon and Old Nan seemed to think?
If I were truly a direwolf, I would understand the song, he thought 
wistfully. In his wolf dreams, he could race up the sides of mountains, jagged 
icy mountains taller than any tower, and stand at the summit beneath the full 
moon with all the world below him, the way it used to be.
“Oooo,” Bran cried tentatively. He cupped his hands around his mouth and 
lifted his head to the comet. “Ooooooooooooooooooo, 
ahooooooooooooooo,” he howled. It sounded stupid, high and hollow

and quavering, a little boy’s howl, not a wolf’s. Yet Summer gave answer, his 
deep voice drowning out Bran’s thin one, and Shaggydog made it a chorus. Bran 
haroooed again. They howled together, last of their pack.
The noise brought a guard to his door, Hayhead with the wen on his nose. He 
peered in, saw Bran howling out the window, and said, “What’s this, my 
prince?”
It made Bran feel queer when they called him prince, though he was 
Robb’s heir, and Robb was King in the North now. He turned his head to howl at 
the guard. “Oooooooo. Oo-oo-oooooooooooo.”
Hayhead screwed up his face. “Now you stop that there.”
“Ooo-ooo-oooooo. Ooo-ooo-ooooooooooooooooo.”
The guardsman retreated. When he came back, Maester Luwin was with him, all in 
grey, his chain tight about his neck. “Bran, those beasts make sufficient 
noise without your help.” He crossed the room and put his hand on the boy’s 
brow. “The hour grows late, you ought to be fast asleep.”
“I’m talking to the wolves.” Bran brushed the hand away.
“Shall I have Hayhead carry you to your bed?”
“I can get to bed myself.” Mikken had hammered a row of iron bars into the 
wall, so Bran could pull himself about the room with his arms. It was slow and 
hard and it made his shoulders ache, but he hated being carried. “Anyway, I 
don’t have to sleep if I don’t want to.”
“All men must sleep, Bran. Even princes.”
“When I sleep I turn into a wolf.” Bran turned his face

away and looked back out into the night. “Do wolves dream?”
“All creatures dream, I think, yet not as men do.”
“Do dead men dream?” Bran asked, thinking of his father. In the dark crypts 
below Winterfell, a stonemason was chiseling out his father’s likeness in 
granite.
“Some say yes, some no,” the maester answered. “The dead themselves are 
silent on the matter.”
“Do trees dream?”
“Trees? No . . .”
“They do,” Bran said with sudden certainty. “They dream tree dreams. I dream 
of a tree sometimes. A weirwood, like the one in the godswood. It calls to me. 
The wolf dreams are better. I smell things, and sometimes I can taste the 
blood.”
Maester Luwin tugged at his chain where it chafed his neck. “If you would only 
spend more time with the other children—”
“I hate the other children,” Bran said, meaning the Walders. “I commanded 
you to send them away.”
Luwin grew stern. “The Freys are your lady mother’s wards, sent here to be 
fostered at her express command. It is not for you to expel them, nor is it 
kind. If we turned them out, where would they go?”
“Home. It’s their fault you won’t let me have
Summer.”
“The Frey boy did not ask to be attacked,” the maester said, “no more than I 
did.”
“That was Shaggydog.” Rickon’s big black wolf was so wild he even frightened 
Bran at times. “Summer never bit anyone.”“Summer ripped out a man’s throat in this very chamber, or have you 
forgotten? The truth is, those sweet pups you and your brothers found in the 
snow have grown into dangerous beasts. The Frey boys are wise to be wary of 
them.”
“We should put the Walders in the godswood. They could play lord of the 
crossing all they want, and Summer could sleep with me again. If I’m the 
prince, why won’t you heed me? I wanted to ride Dancer, but Alebelly wouldn’t 
let me past the gate.”
“And rightly so. The wolfswood is full of danger; your last ride should have 
taught you that. Would you want some outlaw to take you captive and sell you to 
the Lannisters?”
“Summer would save me,” Bran insisted stubbornly. “Princes should be allowed 
to sail the sea and hunt boar in the wolfswood and joust with 
lances.”
“Bran, child, why do you torment yourself so? One day you may do some of these 
things, but now you are only a boy of eight.”
“I’d sooner be a wolf. Then I could live in the wood and sleep when I wanted, 
and I could find Arya and Sansa. I’d smell where they were and go 
save them, and when Robb went to battle I’d fight beside him like Grey Wind. 
I’d tear out the Kingslayer’s throat with my teeth, rip, and then the 
war would be over and everyone would come back to Winterfell. If I was a 
wolf . . .” He howled. 
“Ooo-ooo-oooooooooooo.”
Luwin raised his voice. “A true prince would 
welcome—”
“AAHOOOOOOO,” Bran howled, louder. 
“OOOO-OOOO-OOOO.”
The maester surrendered. “As you will, child.” With a look

that was part grief and part disgust, he left the bedchamber.
Howling lost its savor once Bran was alone. After a time he quieted. I did 
welcome them, he told himself, resentful. I was the lord in 
Winterfell, a true lord, he can’t say I wasn’t. When the Walders had 
arrived from the Twins, it had been Rickon who wanted them gone. A baby of 
four, he had screamed that he wanted Mother and Father and Robb, not these 
strangers. It had been up to Bran to soothe him and bid the Freys welcome. He 
had offered them meat and mead and a seat by the fire, and even Maester Luwin 
had said afterward that he’d done well.
Only that was before the game.
The game was played with a log, a staff, a body of water, and a great deal of 
shouting. The water was the most important, Walder and Walder assured Bran. You 
could use a plank or even a series of stones, and a branch could be your staff. 
You didn’t have to shout. But without water, there was no game. As 
Maester Luwin and Ser Rodrik were not about to let the children go wandering 
off into the wolfswood in search of a stream, they made do with one of the 
murky pools in the godswood. Walder and Walder had never seen hot water 
bubbling from the ground before, but they both allowed how it would make the 
game even better.
Both of them were called Walder Frey. Big Walder said there were bunches of 
Walders at the Twins, all named after the boys’ grandfather, Lord Walder Frey. 
“We have our own names at Winterfell,” Rickon told them haughtily 
when he heard that.
The way their game was played, you laid the log across the

water, and one player stood in the middle with the stick. He was the lord of 
the crossing, and when one of
the other players came up, he had to say, “I am the 
lord of the crossing, who goes there?” And the other player had to make up a 
speech about who they were and why they should be allowed to cross. The lord 
could make them swear oaths and answer questions. They didn’t have to tell the 
truth, but the oaths were binding unless they said “Mayhaps,” so the trick 
was to say “Mayhaps” so the lord of the crossing didn’t notice. Then you 
could try and knock the lord into the water and you got to be lord of 
the crossing, but only if you’d said “Mayhaps.” Otherwise you were out of the 
game. The lord got to knock anyone in the water anytime he pleased, and he was 
the only one who got to use a stick.
In practice, the game seemed to come down to mostly shoving, hitting, and 
falling into the water, along with a lot of loud arguments about whether or not 
someone had said “Mayhaps.” Little Walder was lord of the crossing more often 
than not.
He was Little Walder even though he was tall and stout, with a red face and a 
big round belly. Big Walder was sharp-faced and skinny and half a foot shorter. 
“He’s fifty-two days older than me,” Little Walder explained, “so he was 
bigger at first, but I grew faster.”
“We’re cousins, not brothers,” added Big Walder, the little one. “I’m Walder 
son of Jammos. My father was Lord Walder’s son by his fourth wife. He’s Walder 
son of Merrett. His grandmother was Lord Walder’s third wife, the Crakehall. 
He’s ahead of me in

the line of succession even though I’m older.”
“Only by fifty-two days,” Little Walder objected. “And neither of us will 
ever hold the Twins, stupid.”
“I will,” Big Walder declared. “We’re not the only Walders either. Ser 
Stevron has a grandson, Black Walder, he’s fourth in line of succession, and 
there’s Red Walder, Ser Emmon’s son, and Bastard Walder, who isn’t in the line 
at all. He’s called Walder Rivers not Walder Frey. Plus there’s girls named 
Walda.”
“And Tyr. You always forget Tyr.”
“He’s Waltyr, not Walder,” Big Walder said airily. “And he’s after 
us, so he doesn’t matter. Anyhow, I never liked him.”
Ser Rodrik decreed that they would share Jon Snow’s old bedchamber, since Jon 
was in the Night’s Watch and never coming back. Bran hated that; it made him 
feel as if the Freys were trying to steal Jon’s place.
He had watched wistfully while the Walders contested with Turnip the cook’s boy 
and Joseth’s girls Bandy and Shyra. The Walders had decreed that Bran should be 
the judge and decide whether or not people had said “Mayhaps,” but as soon as 
they started playing they forgot all about him.
The shouts and splashes soon drew others: Palla the kennel girl, Cayn’s boy 
Calon, TomToo whose father Fat Tom had died with Bran’s father at King’s 
Landing. Before very long, every one of them was soaked and muddy. Palla was 
brown from head to heel, with moss in her hair, breathless from laughter. Bran 
had not heard so much laughing since the night the bloody raven came. If

I had my legs, I’d knock all of them into the water, he thought bitterly. 
No one would ever be lord of the crossing but me.
Finally Rickon came running into the godswood, Shaggydog at his heels. He 
watched Turnip and Little Walder struggle for the stick until Turnip lost his 
footing and went in with a huge splash, arms waving. Rickon yelled, “Me! Me 
now! I want to play!” Little Walder beckoned him on, and Shaggydog started to 
follow. “No, Shaggy,” his brother commanded. “Wolves can’t play. You stay 
with Bran.” And he did . . .
. . . until Little Walder had smacked Rickon with the stick, square 
across his belly. Before Bran could blink, the black wolf was flying over the 
plank, there was blood in the water, the Walders were shrieking red murder, 
Rickon sat in the mud laughing, and Hodor came lumbering in shouting “Hodor! 
Hodor! Hodor!”
After that, oddly, Rickon decided he liked the Walders. They never 
played lord of the crossing again, but they played other games—monsters 
and maidens, rats and cats, come-into-my-castle, all sorts of things. With 
Rickon by their side, the Walders plundered the kitchens for pies and 
honeycombs, raced round the walls, tossed bones to the pups in the kennels, and 
trained with wooden swords under Ser Rodrik’s sharp eye. Rickon even showed 
them the deep vaults under the earth where the stonemason was carving father’s 
tomb. “You had no right!” Bran screamed at his brother when he heard. “That 
was our place, a Stark place!” But Rickon never cared.
The door to his bedchamber opened. Maester Luwin was

carrying a green jar, and this time Osha and Hayhead came with him. “I’ve made 
you a sleeping draught, Bran.”
Osha scooped him up in her bony arms. She was very tall for a woman, and wiry 
strong. She bore him effortlessly to his bed.
“This will give you dreamless sleep,” Maester Luwin said as he pulled the 
stopper from the jar. “Sweet, dreamless sleep.”
“It will?” Bran said, wanting to believe.
“Yes. Drink.”
Bran drank. The potion was thick and chalky, but there was honey in it, so it 
went down easy.
“Come the morn, you’ll feel better.” Luwin gave Bran a smile and a pat as he 
took his leave.
Osha lingered behind. “Is it the wolf dreams again?”
Bran nodded.
“You should not fight so hard, boy. I see you talking to the heart tree. Might 
be the gods are trying to talk back.”
“The gods?” he murmured, drowsy already. Osha’s face grew blurry and grey. 
Sweet, dreamless sleep, Bran thought.
Yet when the darkness closed over him, he found himself in the godswood, moving 
silently beneath green-grey sentinels and gnarled oaks as old as time. I 
am walking, he thought, exulting. Part of him knew that it was only a 
dream, but even the dream of walking was better than the truth of his 
bedchamber, walls and ceiling and door.
It was dark amongst the trees, but the comet lit his way, and his feet were sure. 
He was moving on four good legs, strong

and swift, and he could feel the ground underfoot, the soft crackling of fallen 
leaves, thick roots and hard stones, the deep layers of humus. It was a good 
feeling.
The smells filled his head, alive and intoxicating; the green muddy stink of 
the hot pools, the perfume of rich rotting earth beneath his paws, the 
squirrels in the oaks. The scent of squirrel made him remember the taste of hot 
blood and the way the bones would crack between his teeth. Slaver filled his 
mouth. He had eaten no more than half a day past, but there was no joy in dead 
meat, even deer. He could hear the squirrels chittering and rustling above him, 
safe among their leaves, but they knew better than to come down to where his 
brother and he were prowling.
He could smell his brother too, a familiar scent, strong and earthy, his scent 
as black as his coat. His brother was loping around the walls, full of fury. 
Round and round he went, night after day after night, tireless, 
searching . . . for prey, for a way out, for his mother, his 
littermates, his pack . . . searching, searching, and never 
finding.
Behind the trees the walls rose, piles of dead man-rock that loomed all about 
this speck of living wood. Speckled grey they rose, and moss-spotted, yet thick 
and strong and higher than any wolf could hope to leap. Cold iron and splintery 
wood closed off the only holes through the piled stones that hemmed them in. 
His brother would stop at every hole and bare his fangs in rage, but the ways 
stayed closed.
He had done the same the first night, and learned that it

was no good. Snarls would open no paths here. Circling the walls would not push 
them back. Lifting a leg and marking the trees would keep no men away. The 
world had tightened around them, but beyond the walled wood still stood the 
great grey caves of man-rock. Winterfell, he remembered, the sound 
coming to him suddenly. Beyond its sky-tall man-cliffs the true world was 
calling, and he knew he must answer or die.

Long before the first pale fingers of light pried apart Bran’s shutters, 
his eyes were open.
There were guests in Winterfell, visitors come for the harvest feast. This 
morning they would be tilting at quintains in the yard. Once that prospect 
would have filled him with excitement, but that was before.
Not now. The Walders would break lances with the squires of Lord Manderly’s 
escort, but Bran would have no part of it. He must play the prince in his 
father’s solar. “Listen, and it may be that you will learn something of what 
lordship is all about,” Maester Luwin had said.
Bran had never asked to be a prince. It was knighthood he had always dreamed 
of; bright armor and streaming banners, lance and sword, a warhorse between his 
legs. Why must he waste his days listening to old men speak of things he only 
half understood? Because you’re broken, a voice inside reminded him. 
A lord on his cushioned chair might be crippled—the Walders said their 
grandfather was so feeble he had to be carried everywhere in a 
litter—but not a knight on his destrier. Besides, it was his duty. “You 
are your brother’s heir and the Stark in Winterfell,” Ser Rodrik said, 
reminding him of how Robb used to sit with their lord father when his bannermen 
came to see him.Lord Wyman Manderly had arrived from White Harbor two days past, 
traveling by barge and litter, as he was too fat to sit a horse. With him had 
come a long tail of retainers: knights, squires, lesser lords and ladies, 
heralds, musicians, even a juggler, all aglitter with banners and surcoats in 
what seemed half a hundred colors. Bran had welcomed them to Winterfell from 
his father’s high stone seat with the direwolves carved into the arms, and 
afterward Ser Rodrik had said he’d done well. If that had been the end of it, 
he would not have minded. But it was only the beginning.
“The feast makes a pleasant pretext,” Ser Rodrik explained, “but a man does 
not cross a hundred leagues for a sliver of duck and a sip of wine. Only those 
who have matters of import to set before us are like to make the 
journey.”
Bran gazed up at the rough stone ceiling above his head. Robb would tell him 
not to play the boy, he knew. He could almost hear him, and their lord father 
as well. Winter is coming, and you are almost a man grown, Bran. You have 
a duty.
When Hodor came bustling in, smiling and humming tunelessly, he found the boy 
resigned to his fate. Together they got him washed and brushed. “The white 
wool doublet today,” Bran commanded. “And the silver brooch. Ser Rodrik will 
want me to look lordly.” As much as he could, Bran preferred to dress himself, 
but there were some tasks—pulling on breeches, lacing his 
boots—that vexed him. They went quicker with Hodor’s help. Once he had 
been taught to do something, he did it deftly. His

hands were always gentle, though his strength was astonishing. “You could have 
been a knight too, I bet,” Bran told him. “If the gods hadn’t taken your 
wits, you would have been a great knight.”
“Hodor?” Hodor blinked at him with guileless brown eyes, eyes innocent of 
understanding.
“Yes,” said Bran. “Hodor.” He pointed.
On the wall beside the door hung a basket, stoutly made of wicker and leather, 
with holes cut for Bran’s legs. Hodor slid his arms through the straps and 
cinched the wide belt tight around his chest, then knelt beside the bed. Bran 
used the bars sunk into the wall to support himself as he swung the dead weight 
of his legs into the basket and through the holes.
“Hodor,” Hodor said again, rising. The stableboy stood near seven feet tall 
all by himself; on his back Bran’s head almost brushed the ceiling. He ducked 
low as they passed through the door. One time Hodor smelled bread baking 
and ran to the kitchens, and Bran got such a crack that Maester Luwin 
had to sew up his scalp. Mikken had given him a rusty old visorless helm from 
the armory, but Bran seldom troubled to wear it. The Walders laughed whenever 
they saw it on his head.
He rested his hands on Hodor’s shoulders as they descended the winding stair. 
Outside, the sounds of sword and shield and horse already rang through the 
yard. It made a sweet music. I’ll just have a look, Bran thought, 
a quick look, that’s all.
The White Harbor lordlings would emerge later in the morning, with their 
knights and men-at-arms. Until then, the yard

belonged to their squires, who ranged in age from ten to forty. Bran wished he 
were one of them so badly that his stomach hurt with the wanting.
Two quintains had been erected in the courtyard, each a stout post supporting a 
spinning crossbeam with a shield at one end and a padded butt at the other. The 
shields had been painted red-and-gold, though the Lannister lions were lumpy 
and misshapen, and already well scarred by the first boys to take a tilt at 
them.
The sight of Bran in his basket drew stares from those who had not seen it 
before, but he had learned to ignore stares. At least he had a good view; on 
Hodor’s back, he towered over everyone. The Walders were mounting up, he saw. 
They’d brought fine armor up from the Twins, shining silver plate with enameled 
blue chasings. Big Walder’s crest was shaped like a castle, while Little Walder 
favored streamers of blue and grey silk. Their shields and surcoats also set 
them apart from each other. Little Walder quartered the twin towers of Frey 
with the brindled boar of his grandmother’s House and the plowman of his 
mother’s: Crakehall and Darry, respectively. Big Walder’s quarterings were the 
tree-and-ravens of House Blackwood and the twining snakes of the Paeges. 
They must be hungry for honor, Bran thought as he watched them take 
up their lances. A Stark needs only the direwolf.
Their dappled grey coursers were swift, strong, and beautifully trained. Side 
by side they charged the quintains. Both hit the shields cleanly and were well 
past before the padded butts came spinning around. Little Walder struck the 
harder blow,

but Bran thought Big Walder sat his horse better. He would have given both his 
useless legs for the chance to ride against either.
Little Walder cast his splintered lance aside, spied Bran, and reined up. “Now 
there’s an ugly horse,” he said of Hodor.
“Hodor’s no horse,” Bran said.
“Hodor,” said Hodor.
Big Walder trotted up to join his cousin. “Well, he’s not as smart 
as a horse, that’s for certain.” A few of the White Harbor lads poked each 
other and laughed.
“Hodor.” Beaming genially, Hodor looked from one Frey to the other, oblivious 
to their taunting. “Hodor hodor?”
Little Walder’s mount whickered. “See, they’re talking to each other. Maybe 
hodor means ‘I love you’ in horse.”
“You shut up, Frey.” Bran could feel his color rising.
Little Walder spurred his horse closer, giving Hodor a bump that pushed him 
backward. “What will you do if I don’t?”
“He’ll set his wolf on you, cousin,” warned Big Walder.
“Let him. I always wanted a wolfskin cloak.”
“Summer would tear your fat head off,” Bran said.
Little Walder banged a mailed fist against his breastplate. “Does your wolf 
have steel teeth, to bite through plate and mail?”
“Enough!” Maester Luwin’s voice cracked through the clangor of the 
yard as loud as a thunderclap. How much he had overheard, Bran could not 
say . . . but it was enough to anger him, clearly. “These 
threats are unseemly, and I’ll hear no more of them. Is this how you behave at 
the Twins, Walder Frey?”“If I want to.” Atop his courser, Little Walder gave Luwin a sullen 
glare, as if to say, You are only a maester, who are you to reproach a 
Frey of the Crossing?
“Well, it is not how Lady Stark’s wards ought behave at Winterfell. What’s at 
the root of this?” The maester looked at each boy in turn. “One of you will 
tell me, I swear, or—”
“We were having a jape with Hodor,” confessed Big Walder. “I am sorry if we 
offended Prince Bran. We only meant to be amusing.” He at least had the grace 
to look abashed.
Little Walder only looked peevish. “And me,” he said. “I was only being 
amusing too.”
The bald spot atop the maester’s head had turned red, Bran could see; if 
anything, Luwin was more angry than before. “A good lord comforts and protects 
the weak and helpless,” he told the Freys. “I will not have you making Hodor 
the butt of cruel jests, do you hear me? He’s a good-hearted lad, dutiful and 
obedient, which is more than I can say for either of you.” The maester wagged 
a finger at Little Walder. “And you will stay out of the godswood 
and away from those wolves, or answer for it.” Sleeves flapping, he turned on 
his heels, stalked off a few paces, and glanced back. “Bran. Come. Lord Wyman 
awaits.”
“Hodor, go with the maester,” Bran commanded.
“Hodor,” said Hodor. His long strides caught up with the maester’s furiously 
pumping legs on the steps of the Great Keep. Maester Luwin held the door open, 
and Bran hugged Hodor’s neck and ducked as they went through.
“The Walders—” he began.“I’ll hear no more of that, it’s done.” Maester Luwin looked worn-out 
and frayed. “You were right to defend Hodor, but you should never have been 
there. Ser Rodrik and Lord Wyman have broken their fast already while they 
waited for you. Must I come myself to fetch you, as if you were a little 
child?”
“No,” Bran said, ashamed. “I’m sorry. I only 
wanted . . .”
“I know what you wanted,” Maester Luwin said, more gently. “Would that it 
could be, Bran. Do you have any questions before we begin this 
audience?”
“Will we talk of the war?”
“You will talk of naught.” The sharpness was back in Luwin’s voice. 
“You are still a child of eight . . .”
“Almost nine!”
“Eight,” the maester repeated firmly. “Speak nothing but courtesies unless 
Ser Rodrik or Lord Wyman puts you a question.”
Bran nodded. “I’ll remember.”
“I will say nothing to Ser Rodrik of what passed between you and the Frey 
boys.”
“Thank you.”
They put Bran in his father’s oak chair with the grey velvet cushions, behind a 
long plank-and-trestle table. Ser Rodrik sat on his right hand and Maester 
Luwin to his left, armed with quills and inkpots and a sheaf of blank parchment 
to write down all that transpired. Bran ran a hand across the rough wood of the 
table and begged Lord Wyman’s pardons for being late.
“Why, no prince is ever late,” the Lord of White Harbor

responded amiably. “Those who arrive before him have come early, that’s all.” 
Wyman Manderly had a great booming laugh. It was small wonder he could not sit 
a saddle; he looked as if he outweighed most horses. As windy as he was vast, 
he began by asking Winterfell to confirm the new customs officers he had 
appointed for White Harbor. The old ones had been holding back silver for 
King’s Landing rather than paying it over to the new King in the North. “King 
Robb needs his own coinage as well,” he declared, “and White Harbor is the 
very place to mint it.” He offered to take charge of the matter, as it please 
the king, and went from that to speak of how he had strengthened the port’s 
defenses, detailing the cost of every improvement.
In addition to a mint, Lord Manderly also proposed to build Robb a warfleet. 
“We have had no strength at sea for hundreds of years, since Brandon the 
Burner put the torch to his father’s ships. Grant me the gold and within the 
year I will float you sufficient galleys to take Dragonstone and King’s Landing 
both.”
Bran’s interest pricked up at talk of warships. No one asked him, but he 
thought Lord Wyman’s notion a splendid one. In his mind’s eye he could see them 
already. He wondered if a cripple had ever commanded a warship. But Ser Rodrik 
promised only to send the proposal on to Robb for his consideration, while 
Maester Luwin scratched at the parchment.
Midday came and went. Maester Luwin sent Poxy Tym down to the kitchens, and 
they dined in the solar on cheese, capons, and brown oatbread. While tearing 
apart a bird with fat fingers, Lord

Wyman made polite inquiry after Lady Hornwood, who was a cousin of his. “She 
was born a Manderly, you know. Perhaps, when her grief has run its course, she 
would like to be a Manderly again, eh?” He took a bite from a wing, and smiled 
broadly. “As it happens, I am a widower these past eight years. Past time I 
took another wife, don’t you agree, my lords? A man does get lonely.” Tossing 
the bones aside, he reached for a leg. “Or if the lady fancies a younger lad, 
well, my son Wendel is unwed as well. He is off south guarding Lady Catelyn, 
but no doubt he will wish to take a bride on his return. A valiant boy, and 
jolly. Just the man to teach her to laugh again, eh?” He wiped a bit of grease 
off his chin with the sleeve of his tunic.
Bran could hear the distant clash of arms through the windows. He cared nothing 
about marriages. I wish I was down in the yard.
His lordship waited until the table had been cleared before he raised the 
matter of a letter he had received from Lord Tywin Lannister, who held his 
elder son, Ser Wylis, taken captive on the Green Fork. “He offers him back to 
me without ransom, provided I withdraw my levies from His Grace and vow to 
fight no more.”
“You will refuse him, of course,” said Ser Rodrik.
“Have no fear on that count,” the lord assured them. “King Robb has no more 
loyal servant than Wyman Manderly. I would be loath to see my son languish at 
Harrenhal any longer than he must, however. That is an ill place. Cursed, they 
say. Not that I am the sort to swallow such tales, but still, there it is. Look

at what’s befallen this Janos Slynt. Raised up to Lord of Harrenhal by the 
queen, and cast down by her brother. Shipped off to the Wall, they say. I pray 
some equitable exchange of captives can be arranged before too very long. I 
know Wylis would not want to sit out the rest of the war. Gallant, that son of 
mine, and fierce as a mastiff.”
Bran’s shoulders were stiff from sitting in the same chair by the time the 
audience drew to a close. And that night, as he sat to supper, a horn sounded 
to herald the arrival of another guest. Lady Donella Hornwood brought no tail 
of knights and retainers; only herself, and six tired men-at-arms with a 
moosehead badge on their dusty orange livery. “We are very sorry for all you 
have suffered, my lady,” Bran said when she came before him to speak her words 
of greetings. Lord Hornwood had been killed in the battle on the Green Fork, 
their only son cut down in the Whispering Wood. “Winterfell will 
remember.”
“That is good to know.” She was a pale husk of a woman, every line of her 
face etched with grief. “I am very weary, my lord. If I might have leave to 
rest, I should be thankful.”
“To be sure,” Ser Rodrik said. “There is time enough for talk on the 
morrow.”
When the morrow came, most of the morning was given over to talk of grains and 
greens and salting meat. Once the maesters in their Citadel had proclaimed the 
first of autumn, wise men put away a portion of each 
harvest . . . though how large a portion was a matter that 
seemed to require much talk. Lady Hornwood was

storing a fifth of her harvest. At Maester Luwin’s suggestion, she vowed to 
increase that to a quarter.
“Bolton’s bastard is massing men at the Dreadfort,” she warned them. “I hope 
he means to take them south to join his father at the Twins, but when I sent to 
ask his intent, he told me that no Bolton would be questioned by a woman. As if 
he were trueborn and had a right to that name.”
“Lord Bolton has never acknowledged the boy, so far as I know,” Ser Rodrik 
said. “I confess, I do not know him.”
“Few do,” she replied. “He lived with his mother until two years past, when 
young Domeric died and left Bolton without an heir. That was when he brought 
his bastard to the Dreadfort. The boy is a sly creature by all accounts, and he 
has a servant who is almost as cruel as he is. Reek, they call the man. It’s 
said he never bathes. They hunt together, the Bastard and this Reek, and not 
for deer. I’ve heard tales, things I can scarce believe, even of a Bolton. And 
now that my lord husband and my sweet son have gone to the gods, the Bastard 
looks at my lands hungrily.”
Bran wanted to give the lady a hundred men to defend her rights, but Ser Rodrik 
only said, “He may look, but should he do more I promise you there will be 
dire retribution. You will be safe enough, my lady . . . though 
perhaps in time, when your grief is passed, you may find it prudent to wed 
again.”
“I am past my childbearing years, what beauty I had long fled,” she replied 
with a tired half smile, “yet men come sniffing after me as they never did 
when I was a maid.”“You do not look favorably on these suitors?” asked Luwin.
“I shall wed again if His Grace commands it,” Lady Hornwood replied, “but 
Mors Crowfood is a drunken brute, and older than my father. As for my noble 
cousin of Manderly, my lord’s bed is not large enough to hold one of his 
majesty, and I am surely too small and frail to lie beneath him.”
Bran knew that men slept on top of women when they shared a bed. Sleeping under 
Lord Manderly would be like sleeping under a fallen horse, he imagined. Ser 
Rodrik gave the widow a sympathetic nod. “You will have other suitors, my 
lady. We shall try and find you a prospect more to your taste.”
“Perhaps you need not look very far, ser.”
After she had taken her leave, Maester Luwin smiled. “Ser Rodrik, I do believe 
my lady fancies you.”
Ser Rodrik cleared his throat and looked uncomfortable.
“She was very sad,” said Bran.
Ser Rodrik nodded. “Sad and gentle, and not at all uncomely for a woman of her 
years, for all her modesty. Yet a danger to the peace of your brother’s realm 
nonetheless.”
“Her?” Bran said, astonished.
Maester Luwin answered. “With no direct heir, there are sure to be many 
claimants contending for the Hornwood lands. The Tallharts, Flints, and 
Karstarks all have ties to House Hornwood through the female line, and the 
Glovers are fostering Lord Harys’s bastard at Deepwood Motte. The Dreadfort has 
no claim that I know, but the lands adjoin, and Roose Bolton is not one to

overlook such a chance.”
Ser Rodrik tugged at his whiskers. “In such cases, her liege lord must find 
her a suitable match.”
“Why can’t you marry her?” Bran asked. “You said she was comely, 
and Beth would have a mother.”
The old knight put a hand on Bran’s arm. “A kindly thought, my prince, but I 
am only a knight, and besides too old. I might hold her lands for a few years, 
but as soon as I died Lady Hornwood would find herself back in the same mire, 
and Beth’s prospects might be perilous as well.”
“Then let Lord Hornwood’s bastard be the heir,” Bran said, thinking of his 
half brother Jon.
Ser Rodrik said, “That would please the Glovers, and perhaps Lord Hornwood’s 
shade as well, but I do not think Lady Hornwood would love us. The boy is not 
of her blood.”
“Still,” said Maester Luwin, “it must be considered. Lady Donella is past 
her fertile years, as she said herself. If not the bastard, who?”
“May I be excused?” Bran could hear the squires at their swordplay in the 
yard below, the ring of steel on steel.
“As you will, my prince,” said Ser Rodrik. “You did well.” Bran flushed 
with pleasure. Being a lord was not so tedious as he had feared, and since Lady 
Hornwood had been so much briefer than Lord Manderly, he even had a few hours 
of daylight left to visit with Summer. He liked to spend time with his wolf 
every day, when Ser Rodrik and the maester allowed it.No sooner had Hodor entered the godswood than Summer emerged from under 
an oak, almost as if he had known they were coming. Bran glimpsed a lean black 
shape watching from the undergrowth as well. “Shaggy,” he called. “Here, 
Shaggydog. To me.” But Rickon’s wolf vanished as swiftly as he’d 
appeared.
Hodor knew Bran’s favorite place, so he took him to the edge of the pool 
beneath the great spread of the heart tree, where Lord Eddard used to kneel to 
pray. Ripples were running across the surface of the water when they arrived, 
making the reflection of the weirwood shimmer and dance. There was no wind, 
though. For an instant Bran was baffled.
And then Osha exploded up out of the pool with a great splash, so sudden that 
even Summer leapt back, snarling. Hodor jumped away, wailing “Hodor, 
Hodor” in dismay until Bran patted his shoulder to soothe his 
fears. “How can you swim in there?” he asked Osha. “Isn’t it 
cold?”
“As a babe I suckled on icicles, boy. I like the cold.” Osha swam to the 
rocks and rose dripping. She was naked, her skin bumpy with gooseprickles. 
Summer crept close and sniffed at her. “I wanted to touch the 
bottom.”
“I never knew there was a bottom.”
“Might be there isn’t.” She grinned. “What are you staring at, boy? Never 
seen a woman before?”
“I have so.” Bran had bathed with his sisters hundreds of times and he’d seen 
serving women in the hot pools too. Osha looked different, though, hard and 
sharp instead of soft and

curvy. Her legs were all sinew, her breasts flat as two empty purses. “You’ve 
got a lot of scars.”
“Every one hard earned.” She picked up her brown shift, shook some leaves off 
of it, and pulled it down over her head.
“Fighting giants?” Osha claimed there were still giants beyond the Wall. 
One day maybe I’ll even see one . . .
“Fighting men.” She belted herself with a length of rope. “Black crows, oft 
as not. Killed me one too,” she said, shaking out her hair. It had grown since 
she’d come to Winterfell, well down past her ears. She looked softer than the 
woman who had once tried to rob and kill him in the wolfswood. “Heard some 
yattering in the kitchen today about you and them Freys.”
“Who? What did they say?”
She gave him a sour grin. “That it’s a fool boy who mocks a giant, and a mad 
world when a cripple has to defend him.”
“Hodor never knew they were mocking him,” Bran said. “Anyhow he never 
fights.” He remembered once when he was little, going to the market square 
with his mother and Septa Mordane. They brought Hodor to carry for them, but he 
had wandered away, and when they found him some boys had him backed into an 
alley, poking him with sticks. “Hodor!” he kept shouting, cringing 
and covering himself, but he had never raised a hand against his tormentors. 
“Septon Chayle says he has a gentle spirit.”
“Aye,” she said, “and hands strong enough to twist a man’s head off his 
shoulders, if he takes a mind to. All the same, he better watch his back around 
that Walder. Him and you both. The

big one they call little, it comes to me he’s well named. Big outside, little 
inside, and mean down to the bones.”
“He’d never dare hurt me. He’s scared of Summer, no matter what he 
says.”
“Then might be he’s not so stupid as he seems.” Osha was always wary around 
the direwolves. The day she was taken, Summer and Grey Wind between them had 
torn three wildlings to bloody pieces. “Or might be he is. And that tastes of 
trouble too.” She tied up her hair. “You have more of them wolf 
dreams?”
“No.” He did not like to talk about the dreams.
“A prince should lie better than that.” Osha laughed. “Well, your dreams are 
your business. Mine’s in the kitchens, and I’d best be getting back before Gage 
starts to shouting and waving that big wooden spoon of his. By your leave, my 
prince.”
She should never have talked about the wolf dreams, Bran thought as 
Hodor carried him up the steps to his bedchamber. He fought against sleep as 
long as he could, but in the end it took him as it always did. On this night he 
dreamed of the weirwood. It was looking at him with its deep red eyes, calling 
to him with its twisted wooden mouth, and from its pale branches the three-eyed 
crow came flapping, pecking at his face and crying his name in a voice as sharp 
as swords.
The blast of horns woke him. Bran pushed himself onto his side, grateful for 
the reprieve. He heard horses and boisterous shouting. More guests have 
come, and half-drunk by the noise of them. Grasping his bars he pulled 
himself from the bed and over

to the window seat. On their banner was a giant in shattered chains that told 
him that these were Umber men, down from the northlands beyond the Last 
River.
The next day two of them came together to audience; the Greatjon’s uncles, 
blustery men in the winter of their days with beards as white as the bearskin 
cloaks they wore. A crow had once taken Mors for dead and pecked out his eye, 
so he wore a chunk of dragonglass in its stead. As Old Nan told the tale, he’d 
grabbed the crow in his fist and bitten its head off, so they named him 
Crowfood. She would never tell Bran why his gaunt brother Hother was called 
Whoresbane.
No sooner had they been seated than Mors asked for leave to wed Lady Hornwood. 
“The Greatjon’s the Young Wolf’s strong right hand, all know that to be true. 
Who better to protect the widow’s lands than an Umber, and what Umber better 
than me?”
“Lady Donella is still grieving,” Maester Luwin said.
“I have a cure for grief under my furs.” Mors laughed. Ser Rodrik thanked him 
courteously and promised to bring the matter before the lady and the 
king.
Hother wanted ships. “There’s wildlings stealing down from the north, more 
than I’ve ever seen before. They cross the Bay of Seals in little boats and 
wash up on our shores. The crows in Eastwatch are too few to stop them, and 
they go to ground quick as weasels. It’s longships we need, aye, and strong men 
to sail them. The Greatjon took too many. Half our harvest is gone to seed for 
want of arms to swing the scythes.”Ser Rodrik pulled at his whiskers. “You have forests of tall pine and 
old oak. Lord Manderly has shipwrights and sailors in plenty. Together you 
ought to be able to float enough longships to guard both your 
coasts.”
“Manderly?” Mors Umber snorted. “That great waddling sack of suet? His own 
people mock him as Lord Lamprey, I’ve heard. The man can scarce walk. If you 
stuck a sword in his belly, ten thousand eels would wriggle out.”
“He is fat,” Ser Rodrik admitted, “but he is not stupid. You will work with 
him, or the king will know the reason why.” And to Bran’s astonishment, the 
truculent Umbers agreed to do as he commanded, though not without 
grumbling.
While they were sitting at audience, the Glover men arrived from Deepwood 
Motte, and a large party of Tallharts from Torrhen’s Square. Galbart and Robett 
Glover had left Deepwood in the hands of Robett’s wife, but it was their 
steward who came to Winterfell. “My lady begs that you excuse her absence. Her 
babes are still too young for such a journey, and she was loath to leave 
them.” Bran soon realized that it was the steward, not Lady Glover, who truly 
ruled at Deepwood Motte. The man allowed that he was at present setting aside 
only a tenth of his harvest. A hedge wizard had told him there would be a 
bountiful spirit summer before the cold set in, he claimed. Maester Luwin had a 
number of choice things to say about hedge wizards. Ser Rodrik commanded the 
man to set aside a fifth, and questioned the steward closely about Lord 
Hornwood’s bastard, the boy Larence Snow. In the

north, all highborn bastards took the surname Snow. This lad was near 
twelve, and the steward praised his wits and courage.
“Your notion about the bastard may have merit, Bran,” Maester Luwin said 
after. “One day you will be a good lord for Winterfell, I think.”
“No I won’t.” Bran knew he would never be a lord, no more than he could be a 
knight. “Robb’s to marry some Frey girl, you told me so yourself, and the 
Walders say the same. He’ll have sons, and they’ll be the lords of Winterfell 
after him, not me.”
“It may be so, Bran,” Ser Rodrik said, “but I was wed three times and my 
wives gave me daughters. Now only Beth remains to me. My brother Martyn 
fathered four strong sons, yet only Jory lived to be a man. When he was slain, 
Martyn’s line died with him. When we speak of the morrow nothing is ever 
certain.”
Leobald Tallhart had his turn the following day. He spoke of weather portents 
and the slack wits of smallfolk, and told how his nephew itched for battle. 
“Benfred has raised his own company of lances. Boys, none older than nineteen 
years, but every one thinks he’s another young wolf. When I told them they were 
only young rabbits, they laughed at me. Now they call themselves the Wild Hares 
and gallop about the country with rabbitskins tied to the ends of their lances, 
singing songs of chivalry.”
Bran thought that sounded grand. He remembered Benfred Tallhart, a big bluff 
loud boy who had often visited Winterfell with his father, Ser Helman, and had 
been friendly with Robb and with Theon Greyjoy. But Ser Rodrik was clearly 
displeased by what

he heard. “If the king were in need of more men, he would send for them,” he 
said. “Instruct your nephew that he is to
remain at Torrhen’s Square, as his 
lord father commanded.”
“I will, ser,” said Leobald, and only then raised the matter of Lady 
Hornwood. Poor thing, with no husband to defend her lands nor son to inherit. 
His own lady wife was a Hornwood, sister to the late Lord Halys, doubtless they 
recalled. “An empty hall is a sad one. I had a thought to send my younger son 
to Lady Donella to foster as her own. Beren is near ten, a likely lad, and her 
own nephew. He would cheer her, I am certain, and perhaps he would even take 
the name Hornwood . . .”
“If he were named heir?” suggested Maester Luwin.
“. . . so the House might continue,” finished Leobald.
Bran knew what to say. “Thank you for the notion, my lord,” he blurted out 
before Ser Rodrik could speak. “We will bring the matter to my brother Robb. 
Oh, and Lady Hornwood.”
Leobald seemed surprised that he had spoken. “I’m grateful, my prince,” he 
said, but Bran saw pity in his pale blue eyes, mingled perhaps with a little 
gladness that the cripple was, after all, not his son. For a moment 
he hated the man.
Maester Luwin liked him better, though. “Beren Tallhart may well be our best 
answer,” he told them when Leobald had gone. “By blood he is half Hornwood. 
If he takes his uncle’s name . . .”
“. . . he will still be a boy,” said Ser Rodrik, “and 
hard-pressed to hold his lands against the likes of Mors Umber or this bastard 
of Roose Bolton’s. We must think on this carefully. Robb

should have our best counsel before he makes his decision.”
“It may come down to practicalities,” said Maester Luwin. “Which lord he 
most needs to court. The riverlands are part of his realm, he may wish to 
cement the alliance by wedding Lady Hornwood to one of the lords of the 
Trident. A Blackwood, perhaps, or a Frey—”
“Lady Hornwood can have one of our Freys,” said Bran. “She can have both of 
them if she likes.”
“You are not kind, my prince,” Ser Rodrik chided gently.
Neither are the Walders. Scowling, Bran stared down at the table and 
said nothing.
In the days that followed, ravens arrived from other lordly houses, bearing 
regrets. The bastard of the Dreadfort would not be joining them, the Mormonts 
and Karstarks had all gone south with Robb, Lord Locke was too old to dare the 
journey, Lady Flint was heavy with child, there was sickness at Widow’s Watch. 
Finally all of the principal vassals of House Stark had been heard from save 
for Howland Reed the crannogman, who had not set foot outside his swamps for 
many a year, and the Cerwyns whose castle lay a half day’s ride from 
Winterfell. Lord Cerwyn was a captive of the Lannisters, but his son, a lad of 
fourteen, arrived one bright, blustery morning at the head of two dozen lances. 
Bran was riding Dancer around the yard when they came through the gate. He 
trotted over to greet them. Cley Cerwyn had always been a friend to Bran and 
his brothers.
“Good morrow, Bran,” Cley called out cheerfully. “Or must I

call you Prince Bran now?”
“Only if you want.”
Cley laughed. “Why not? Everyone else is a king or prince these days. Did 
Stannis write Winterfell as well?”
“Stannis? I don’t know.”
“He’s a king now too,” Cley confided. “He says Queen Cersei bedded her 
brother, so Joffrey is a bastard.”
“Joffrey the Illborn,” one of the Cerwyn knights growled. “Small wonder he’s 
faithless, with the Kingslayer for a father.”
“Aye,” said another, “the gods hate incest. Look how they brought down the 
Targaryens.”
For a moment Bran felt as though he could not breathe. A giant hand was 
crushing his chest. He felt as though he was falling, and clutched desperately 
at Dancer’s reins.
His terror must have shown on his face. “Bran?” Cley Cerwyn said. “Are you 
unwell? It’s only another king.”
“Robb will beat him too.” He turned Dancer’s head toward the stables, 
oblivious to the puzzled stares the Cerwyns gave him. His blood was roaring in 
his ears, and had he not been strapped onto his saddle he might well have 
fallen.
That night Bran prayed to his father’s gods for dreamless sleep. If 
the gods heard, they mocked his hopes, for the nightmare they sent was worse 
than any wolf dream.
“Fly or die!” cried the three-eyed crow as it pecked at him. He 
wept and pleaded but the crow had no pity. It put out his left eye and then his 
right, and when he was blind in the dark it

pecked at his brow, driving its terrible sharp beak deep into his skull. He 
screamed until he was certain his lungs must burst. The pain was an axe 
splitting his head apart, but when the crow wrenched out its beak all slimy 
with bits of bone and brain, Bran could see again. What he saw made him gasp in 
fear. He was clinging to a tower miles high, and his fingers were slipping, 
nails scrabbling at the stone, his legs dragging him down, stupid useless dead 
legs. “Help me!” he cried. A golden man appeared in the sky above 
him and pulled him up. “The things I do for love,” he murmured softly as he 
tossed him out kicking into empty air.

Dancer was draped in bardings of snowy white wool emblazoned with the grey 
direwolf of House Stark, while Bran wore grey breeches and white doublet, his 
sleeves and collar trimmed with vair. Over his heart was his wolf’s-head brooch 
of silver and polished jet. He would sooner have had Summer than a silver wolf 
on his breast, but Ser Rodrik had been unyielding.
The low stone steps balked Dancer only for a moment. When Bran urged her
on, she 
took them easily. Beyond the wide oak-and-iron doors, eight long rows of 
trestle tables filled Winterfell’s Great Hall, four on each side of the center 
aisle. Men crowded shoulder to shoulder on the benches. “Stark!” they called 
as Bran trotted past, rising to their feet. “Winterfell! 
Winterfell!”
He was old enough to know that it was not truly him they shouted 
for—it was the harvest they cheered, it was Robb and his victories, it 
was his lord father and his grandfather and all the Starks going back eight 
thousand years. Still, it made him swell with pride. For so long as it took him 
to ride the length of that hall he forgot that he was broken. Yet when he 
reached the dais, with every eye upon him, Osha and Hodor undid his straps and 
buckles, lifted him off Dancer’s back, and carried him to the high seat of his 
fathers.
Ser Rodrik was seated to Bran’s left, his daughter Beth

beside him. Rickon was to his right, his mop of shaggy auburn hair grown so 
long that it brushed his ermine mantle. He had refused to let anyone cut it 
since their mother had gone. The last girl to try had been bitten for her 
efforts. “I wanted to ride too,” he said as Hodor led Dancer away. “I ride 
better than you.”
“You don’t, so hush up,” he told his brother. Ser Rodrik bellowed for quiet. 
Bran raised his voice. He bid them welcome in the name of his brother, the King 
in the North, and asked them to thank the gods old and new for Robb’s victories 
and the bounty of the harvest. “May there be a hundred more,” he finished, 
raising his father’s silver goblet.
“A hundred more!” Pewter tankards, clay cups, and iron-banded 
drinking horns clashed together. Bran’s wine was sweetened with honey and 
fragrant with cinnamon and cloves, but stronger than he was used to. He could 
feel its hot snaky fingers wriggling through his chest as he swallowed. By the 
time he set down the goblet, his head was swimming.
“You did well, Bran,” Ser Rodrik told him. “Lord Eddard would have been most 
proud.” Down the table, Maester Luwin nodded his agreement as the servers 
began to carry in the food.
Such food Bran had never seen; course after course after course, so much that 
he could not manage more than a bite or two of each dish. There were great 
joints of aurochs roasted with leeks, venison pies chunky with carrots, bacon, 
and mushrooms, mutton chops sauced in honey and cloves, savory duck, peppered

boar, goose, skewers of pigeon and capon, beef-and-barley stew, cold fruit 
soup. Lord Wyman had brought twenty casks of fish from White Harbor packed in 
salt and seaweed; whitefish and winkles, crabs and mussels, clams, herring, 
cod, salmon, lobster and lampreys. There was black bread and honeycakes and 
oaten biscuits; there were turnips and pease and beets, beans and squash and 
huge red onions; there were baked apples and berry tarts and pears poached in 
strongwine. Wheels of white cheese were set at every table, above and below the 
salt, and flagons of hot spice wine and chilled autumn ale were passed up and 
down the tables.
Lord Wyman’s musicians played bravely and well, but harp and fiddle and horn 
were soon drowned beneath a tide of talk and laughter, the clash of cup and 
plate, and the snarling of hounds fighting for table scraps. The singer sang 
good songs, “Iron Lances” and “The Burning of the Ships” and “The Bear and 
the Maiden Fair,” but only Hodor seemed to be listening. He stood beside the 
piper, hopping from one foot to the other.
The noise swelled to a steady rumbling roar, a great heady stew of sound. Ser 
Rodrik talked with Maester Luwin above Beth’s curly head, while Rickon screamed 
happily at the Walders. Bran had not wanted the Freys at the high table, but 
the maester reminded him that they would soon be kin. Robb was to marry one of 
their aunts, and Arya one of their uncles. “She never will,” Bran said, “not 
Arya,” but Maester Luwin was unyielding, so there they were beside 
Rickon.
The serving men brought every dish to Bran first, that he

might take the lord’s portion if he chose. By the time they reached the ducks, 
he could eat no more. After that he nodded approval at each course in turn, and 
waved it away. If the dish smelled especially choice, he would send it to one 
of the lords on the dais, a gesture of friendship and favor that Maester Luwin 
told him he must make. He sent some salmon down to poor sad Lady Hornwood, the 
boar to the boisterous Umbers, a dish of goose-in-berries to Cley Cerwyn, and a 
huge lobster to Joseth the master of horse, who was neither lord nor guest, but 
had seen to Dancer’s training and made it possible for Bran to ride. He sent 
sweets to Hodor and Old Nan as well, for no reason but he loved them. Ser 
Rodrik reminded him to send something to his foster brothers, so he sent Little 
Walder some boiled beets and Big Walder the buttered turnips.
On the benches below, Winterfell men mixed with smallfolk from the winter town, 
friends from the nearer holdfasts, and the escorts of their lordly guests. Some 
faces Bran had never seen before, others he knew as well as his own, yet they 
all seemed equally foreign to him. He watched them as from a distance, as if he 
still sat in the window of his bedchamber, looking down on the yard below, 
seeing everything yet a part of nothing.
Osha moved among the tables, pouring ale. One of Leobald Tallhart’s men slid a 
hand up under her skirts and she broke the flagon over his head, to roars of 
laughter. Yet Mikken had his hand down some woman’s bodice, and she seemed not 
to mind. Bran watched Farlen make his red bitch beg for bones and smiled at Old

Nan plucking at the crust of a hot pie with wrinkled fingers. On the dais, Lord 
Wyman attacked a steaming plate of lampreys as if they were an enemy host. He 
was so fat that Ser Rodrik had commanded that a special wide chair be built for 
him to sit in, but he laughed loud and often, and Bran thought he liked him. 
Poor wan Lady Hornwood sat beside him, her face a stony mask as she picked 
listlessly at her food. At the opposite end of the high table, Hothen and Mors 
were playing a drinking game, slamming their horns together as hard as knights 
meeting in joust.
It is too hot here, and too noisy, and they are all getting drunk. 
Bran itched under his grey and white woolens, and suddenly he wished he were 
anywhere but here. It is cool in the godswood now. Steam is rising off the 
hot pools, and the red leaves of the weirwood are rustling. The smells are 
richer than here, and before long the moon will rise and my brother will sing 
to it.
“Bran?” Ser Rodrik said. “You do not eat.”
The waking dream had been so vivid, for a moment Bran had not known where he 
was. “I’ll have more later,” he said. “My belly’s full to 
bursting.”
The old knight’s white mustache was pink with wine. “You have done well, Bran. 
Here, and at the audiences. You will be an especial fine lord one day, I 
think.”
I want to be a knight. Bran took another sip of the spiced honey wine 
from his father’s goblet, grateful for something to clutch. The lifelike head 
of a snarling direwolf was raised on the side of the cup. He felt the silver 
muzzle pressing against

his palm, and remembered the last time he had seen his lord father drink from 
this goblet.
It had been the night of the welcoming feast, when King Robert had brought his 
court to Winterfell. Summer still reigned then. His parents had shared the dais 
with Robert and his queen, with her brothers beside her. Uncle Benjen had been 
there too, all in black. Bran and his brothers and sisters sat with the king’s 
children, Joffrey and Tommen and Princess Myrcella, who’d spent the whole meal 
gazing at Robb with adoring eyes. Arya made faces across the table when no one 
was looking; Sansa listened raptly while the king’s high harper sang songs of 
chivalry, and Rickon kept asking why Jon wasn’t with them. “Because he’s a 
bastard,” Bran finally had to whisper to him.
And now they are all gone. It was as if some cruel god had reached 
down with a great hand and swept them all away, the girls to captivity, Jon to 
the Wall, Robb and Mother to war, King Robert and Father to their graves, and 
perhaps Uncle Benjen as well . . .
Even down on the benches, there were new men at the tables. Jory was dead, and 
Fat Tom, and Porther, Alyn, Desmond, Hullen who had been master of horse, 
Harwin his son . . . all those who had gone south with his 
father, even Septa Mordane and Vayon Poole. The rest had ridden to war with 
Robb, and might soon be dead as well for all Bran knew. He liked Hayhead and 
Poxy Tym and Skittrick and the other new men well enough, but he missed his old 
friends.
He looked up and down the benches at all the faces happy and sad, and wondered 
who would be missing next year and the year

after. He might have cried then, but he couldn’t. He was the Stark in 
Winterfell, his father’s son and his brother’s heir, and almost a man 
grown.
At the foot of the hall, the doors opened and a gust of cold air made the 
torches flame brighter for an instant. Alebelly led two new guests into the 
feast. “The Lady Meera of House Reed,” the rotund guardsman bellowed over the 
clamor. “With her brother, Jojen, of Greywater Watch.”
Men looked up from their cups and trenchers to eye the newcomers. Bran heard 
Little Walder mutter, “Frogeaters,” to Big Walder beside him. Ser Rodrik 
climbed to his feet. “Be welcome, friends, and share this harvest with us.” 
Serving men hurried to lengthen the table on the dais, fetching trestles and 
chairs.
“Who are they?” Rickon asked.
“Mudmen,” answered Little Walder disdainfully. “They’re thieves and cravens, 
and they have green teeth from eating frogs.”
Maester Luwin crouched beside Bran’s seat to whisper counsel in his ear. “You 
must greet these ones warmly. I had not thought to see them here, 
but . . . you know who they are?”
Bran nodded. “Crannogmen. From the Neck.”
“Howland Reed was a great friend to your father,” Ser Rodrik told him. 
“These two are his, it would seem.”
As the newcomers walked the length of the hall, Bran saw that one was indeed a 
girl, though he would never have known it by her dress. She wore lambskin 
breeches soft with long use, and a sleeveless jerkin armored in bronze scales. 
Though near Robb’s

age, she was slim as a boy, with long brown hair knotted behind her head and 
only the barest suggestion of breasts. A woven net hung from one slim hip, a 
long bronze knife from the other; under her arm she carried an old iron 
greathelm spotted with rust; a frog spear and round leathern shield were 
strapped to her back.
Her brother was several years younger and bore no weapons. All his garb was 
green, even to the leather of his boots, and when he came closer Bran saw that 
his eyes were the color of moss, though his teeth looked as white as anyone 
else’s. Both Reeds were slight of build, slender as swords and scarcely taller 
than Bran himself. They went to one knee before the dais.
“My lords of Stark,” the girl said. “The years have passed in their hundreds 
and their thousands since my folk first swore their fealty to the King in the 
North. My lord father has sent us here to say the words again, for all our 
people.”
She is looking at me, Bran realized. He had to make some answer. “My 
brother Robb is fighting in the south,” he said, “but you can say your words 
to me, if you like.”
“To Winterfell we pledge the faith of Greywater,” they said together. 
“Hearth and heart and harvest we yield up to you, my lord. Our swords and 
spears and arrows are yours to command. Grant mercy to our weak, help to our 
helpless, and justice to all, and we shall never fail you.”
“I swear it by earth and water,” said the boy in green.
“I swear it by bronze and iron,” his sister said.
“We swear it by ice and fire,” they finished together.Bran groped for words. Was he supposed to swear something back to them? 
Their oath was not one he had been taught. “May your winters be short and your 
summers bountiful,” he said. That was usually a good thing to say. “Rise. I’m 
Brandon Stark.”
The girl, Meera, got to her feet and helped her brother up. The boy stared at 
Bran all the while. “We bring you gifts of fish and frog and fowl,” he 
said.
“I thank you.” Bran wondered if he would have to eat a frog to be polite. “I 
offer you the meat and mead of Winterfell.” He tried to recall all he had been 
taught of the crannogmen, who dwelt amongst the bogs of the Neck and seldom left 
their wetlands. They were a poor folk, fishers and frog-hunters who lived in 
houses of thatch and woven reeds on floating islands hidden in the deeps of the 
swamp. It was said that they were a cowardly people who fought with poisoned 
weapons and preferred to hide from foes rather than face them in open battle. 
And yet Howland Reed had been one of Father’s staunchest companions during the 
war for King Robert’s crown, before Bran was born.
The boy, Jojen, looked about the hall curiously as he took his seat. “Where 
are the direwolves?”
“In the godswood,” Rickon answered. “Shaggy was bad.”
“My brother would like to see them,” the girl said.
Little Walder spoke up loudly. “He’d best watch they don’t see him, or they’ll 
take a bite out of him.”
“They won’t bite if I’m there.” Bran was pleased that they wanted to see the 
wolves. “Summer won’t anyway, and he’ll keep

Shaggydog away.” He was curious about these mudmen. He could not recall ever 
seeing one before. His father had sent letters to the Lord of Greywater over 
the years, but none of the crannogmen had ever called at Winterfell. He would 
have liked to talk to them more, but the Great Hall was so noisy that it was 
hard to hear anyone who wasn’t right beside you.
Ser Rodrik was right beside Bran. “Do they truly eat frogs?” he asked the old 
knight.
“Aye,” Ser Rodrik said. “Frogs and fish and lizard-lions, and all manner of 
birds.”
Maybe they don’t have sheep and cattle, Bran thought. He commanded 
the serving men to bring them mutton chops and a slice off the aurochs and fill 
their trenchers with beef-and-barley stew. They seemed to like that well 
enough. The girl caught him staring at her and smiled. Bran blushed and looked 
away.
Much later, after all the sweets had been served and washed down with gallons 
of summerwine, the food was cleared and the tables shoved back against the 
walls to make room for the dancing. The music grew wilder, the drummers joined 
in, and Hother Umber brought forth a huge curved warhorn banded in silver. When 
the singer reached the part in “The Night That Ended” where the Night’s Watch 
rode forth to meet the Others in the Battle for the Dawn, he blew a blast that 
set all the dogs to barking.
Two Glover men began a spinning skirl on bladder and woodharp. Mors Umber was 
the first on his feet. He seized a passing serving girl by the arm, knocking 
the flagon of wine out

of her hands to shatter on the floor. Amidst the rushes and bones and bits of 
bread that littered the stone, he whirled her and spun her and tossed her in 
the air. The girl squealed with laughter and turned red as her skirts swirled 
and lifted.
Others soon joined in. Hodor began to dance all by himself, while Lord Wyman 
asked little Beth Cassel to partner him. For all his size, he moved gracefully. 
When he tired, Cley Cerwyn danced with the child in his stead. Ser Rodrik 
approached Lady Hornwood, but she made her excuses and took her leave. Bran 
watched long enough to be polite, and then had Hodor summoned. He was hot and 
tired, flushed from the wine, and the dancing made him sad. It was something 
else he could never do. “I want to go.”
“Hodor,” Hodor shouted back, kneeling. Maester Luwin and Hayhead lifted him 
into his basket. The folk of Winterfell had seen this sight half a hundred 
times, but doubtless it looked queer to the guests, some of whom were more 
curious than polite. Bran felt the stares.
They went out the rear rather than walk the length of the hall, Bran ducking 
his head as they passed through the lord’s door. In the dim-lit gallery outside 
the Great Hall, they came upon Joseth the master of horse engaged in a 
different sort of riding. He had some woman Bran did not know shoved up against 
the wall, her skirts around her waist. She was giggling until Hodor stopped to 
watch. Then she screamed. “Leave them be, Hodor,” Bran had to tell him. 
“Take me to my bedchamber.”
Hodor carried him up the winding steps to his tower and

knelt beside one of the iron bars that Mikken had driven into the wall. Bran 
used the bars to move himself to the bed, and Hodor pulled off his boots and 
breeches. “You can go back to the feast now, but don’t go bothering Joseth and 
that woman,” Bran said.
“Hodor,” Hodor replied, bobbing his head.
When he blew out his bedside candle, darkness covered him like a soft, familiar 
blanket. The faint sound of music drifted through his shuttered 
window.
Something his father had told him once when he was little came back to him 
suddenly. He had asked Lord Eddard if the Kingsguard were truly the finest 
knights in the Seven Kingdoms. “No longer,” he answered, “but once they were 
a marvel, a shining lesson to the world.”
“Was there one who was best of all?”
“The finest knight I ever saw was Ser Arthur Dayne, who fought with a blade 
called Dawn, forged from the heart of a fallen star. They called him the Sword 
of the Morning, and he would have killed me but for Howland Reed.” Father had 
gotten sad then, and he would say no more. Bran wished he had asked him what he 
meant.
He went to sleep with his head full of knights in gleaming armor, fighting with 
swords that shone like starfire, but when the dream came he was in the
godswood 
again. The smells from the kitchen and the Great Hall were so strong that it 
was almost as if he had never left the feast. He prowled beneath the trees, his 
brother close behind him. This night was wildly alive, full of the howling of 
the man-pack at their play. The sounds made him

restless. He wanted to run, to hunt, he wanted to—
The rattle of iron made his ears prick up. His brother heard it too. They raced 
through the undergrowth toward the sound. Bounding across the still water at 
the foot of the old white one, he caught the scent of a stranger, the man-smell 
well mixed with leather and earth and iron.
The intruders had pushed a few yards into the wood when he came upon them; a 
female and a young male, with no taint of fear to them, even when he showed 
them the white of his teeth. His brother growled low in his throat, yet still 
they did not run.
“Here they come,” the female said. Meera, some part of him 
whispered, some wisp of the sleeping boy lost in the wolf dream. “Did you know 
they would be so big?”
“They will be bigger still before they are grown,” the young male said, 
watching them with eyes large, green, and unafraid. “The black one is full of 
fear and rage, but the grey is strong . . . stronger than he 
knows . . . can you feel him, sister?”
“No,” she said, moving a hand to the hilt of the long brown knife she wore. 
“Go careful, Jojen.”
“He won’t hurt me. This is not the day I die.” The male walked toward them, 
unafraid, and reached out for his muzzle, a touch as light as a summer breeze. 
Yet at the brush of those fingers the wood dissolved and the very ground turned 
to smoke beneath his feet and swirled away laughing, and then he was spinning 
and falling, falling, falling . . .

Meera moved in a wary circle, her net dangling loose in her left hand, 
the slender three-pronged frog spear poised in her right. Summer followed her 
with his golden eyes, turning, his tail held stiff and tall. Watching, 
watching . . .
“Yai!” the girl shouted, the spear darting out. The wolf slid to the left and 
leapt before she could draw back the spear. Meera cast her net, the tangles 
unfolding in the air before her. Summer’s leap carried him into it. He dragged 
it with him as he slammed into her chest and knocked her over backward. Her 
spear went spinning away. The damp grass cushioned her fall but the breath went 
out of her in an “Oof.” The wolf crouched atop her.Bran hooted. “You lose.”
“She wins,” her brother Jojen said. “Summer’s snared.”
He was right, Bran saw. Thrashing and growling at the net, trying to rip free, 
Summer was only ensnaring himself worse. Nor could he bite through. “Let him 
out.”
Laughing, the Reed girl threw her arms around the tangled wolf and rolled them 
both. Summer gave a piteous whine, his legs kicking against the cords that 
bound them. Meera knelt, undid a twist, pulled at a corner, tugged deftly here 
and there, and suddenly the direwolf was bounding free.
“Summer, to me.” Bran spread his arms. “Watch,” he said,

an instant before the wolf bowled into him. He clung with all his strength as 
the wolf dragged him bumping through the grass. They wrestled and rolled and 
clung to each other, one snarling and yapping, the other laughing. In the end 
it was Bran sprawled on top, the mud-spattered direwolf under him. “Good 
wolf,” he panted. Summer licked him across the ear.
Meera shook her head. “Does he never grow angry?”
“Not with me.” Bran grabbed the wolf by his ears and Summer snapped at him 
fiercely, but it was all in play. “Sometimes he tears my garb but he’s never 
drawn blood.”
“Your blood, you mean. If he’d gotten past my 
net . . .”
“He wouldn’t hurt you. He knows I like you.” All of the other lords and 
knights had departed within a day or two of the harvest feast, but the Reeds 
had stayed to become Bran’s constant companions. Jojen was so solemn that Old 
Nan called him “little grandfather,” but Meera reminded Bran of his sister 
Arya. She wasn’t scared to get dirty, and she could run and fight and throw as 
good as a boy. She was older than Arya, though; almost sixteen, a woman grown. 
They were both older than Bran, even though his ninth name day had finally come 
and gone, but they never treated him like a child.
“I wish you were our wards instead of the Walders.” He began to struggle 
toward the nearest tree. His dragging and wriggling was unseemly to watch, but 
when Meera moved to lift him he said, “No, don’t help me.” He rolled clumsily 
and pushed and squirmed backward, using the strength of his arms, until he was

sitting with his back to the trunk of a tall ash. “See, I told you.” Summer 
lay down with his head in Bran’s lap. “I never knew anyone who fought with a 
net before,” he told Meera while he scratched the direwolf between the ears. 
“Did your master-at-arms teach you net-fighting?”
“My father taught me. We have no knights at Greywater. No master-at-arms, and 
no maester.”
“Who keeps your ravens?”
She smiled. “Ravens can’t find Greywater Watch, no more than our enemies 
can.”
“Why not?”
“Because it moves,” she told him.
Bran had never heard of a moving castle before. He looked at her uncertainly, 
but he couldn’t tell whether she was teasing him or not. “I wish I could see 
it. Do you think your lord father would let me come visit when the war is 
over?”
“You would be most welcome, my prince. Then or now.”
“Now?” Bran had spent his whole life at Winterfell. He yearned to 
see far places. “I could ask Ser Rodrik when he returns.” The old knight was 
off east, trying to set to rights the trouble there. Roose Bolton’s bastard had 
started it by seizing Lady Hornwood as she returned from the harvest feast, 
marrying her that very night even though he was young enough to be her son. 
Then Lord Manderly had taken her castle. To protect the Hornwood holdings from 
the Boltons, he had written, but Ser Rodrik had been almost as angry with him 
as with the bastard. “Ser

Rodrik might let me go. Maester Luwin never would.”
Sitting cross-legged under the weirwood, Jojen Reed regarded him solemnly. “It 
would be good if you left Winterfell, Bran.”
“It would?”
“Yes. And sooner rather than later.”
“My brother has the greensight,” said Meera. “He dreams things that haven’t 
happened, but sometimes they do.”
“There is no sometimes, Meera.” A look passed between them; him 
sad, her defiant.
“Tell me what’s going to happen,” Bran said.
“I will,” said Jojen, “if you’ll tell me about your dreams.”
The godswood grew quiet. Bran could hear leaves rustling, and Hodor’s distant 
splashing from the hot pools. He thought of the golden man and the three-eyed 
crow, remembered the crunch of bones between his jaws and the coppery taste of 
blood. “I don’t have dreams. Maester Luwin gives me sleeping 
draughts.”
“Do they help?”
“Sometimes.”
Meera said, “All of Winterfell knows you wake at night shouting and sweating, 
Bran. The women talk of it at the well, and the guards in their 
hall.”
“Tell us what frightens you so much,” said Jojen.
“I don’t want to. Anyway, it’s only dreams. Maester Luwin says dreams might 
mean anything or nothing.”
“My brother dreams as other boys do, and those dreams might mean anything,” 
Meera said, “but the green dreams are different.”Jojen’s eyes were the color of moss, and sometimes when he looked at you 
he seemed to be seeing something else. Like now. “I dreamed of a winged wolf 
bound to earth with grey stone chains,” he said. “It was a green dream, so I 
knew it was true. A crow was trying to peck through the chains, but the stone 
was too hard and his beak could only chip at them.”
“Did the crow have three eyes?”
Jojen nodded.
Summer raised his head from Bran’s lap, and gazed at the mudman with his dark 
golden eyes.
“When I was little I almost died of greywater fever. That was when the crow 
came to me.”
“He came to me after I fell,” Bran blurted. “I was asleep for a long time. 
He said I had to fly or die, and I woke up, only I was broken and I couldn’t 
fly after all.”
“You can if you want to.” Picking up her net, Meera shook out the last 
tangles and began arranging it in loose folds.
“You are the winged wolf, Bran,” said Jojen. “I wasn’t sure when 
we first came, but now I am. The crow sent us here to break your 
chains.”
“Is the crow at Greywater?”
“No. The crow is in the north.”
“At the Wall?” Bran had always wanted to see the Wall. His bastard brother 
Jon was there now, a man of the Night’s Watch.
“Beyond the Wall.” Meera Reed hung the net from her belt. “When Jojen told 
our lord father what he’d dreamed, he sent us to

Winterfell.”
“How would I break the chains, Jojen?” Bran asked.
“Open your eye.”
“They are open Can’t you see?”
“Two are open.” Jojen pointed. “One, two.”
“I only have two.”
“You have three. The crow gave you the third, but you will not open it.” He 
had a slow soft way of speaking. “With two 
eyes you see my face. With three you could see my heart. With two you can see 
that oak tree there. With three you could see the acorn the oak grew from and 
the stump that it will one day become. With two you see no farther than your 
walls. With three you would gaze south to the Summer Sea and north beyond the 
Wall.”
Summer got to his feet. “I don’t need to see so far.” Bran made a nervous 
smile. “I’m tired of talking about crows. Let’s talk about wolves. Or 
lizard-lions. Have you ever hunted one, Meera? We don’t have them 
here.”
Meera plucked her frog spear out of the bushes. “They live in the water. In 
slow streams and deep swamps—”
Her brother interrupted. “Did you dream of a lizard-lion?”
“No,” said Bran. “I told you, I don’t want—”
“Did you dream of a wolf?”
He was making Bran angry. “I don’t have to tell you my dreams. I’m the prince. 
I’m the Stark in Winterfell.”
“Was it Summer?”“You be quiet.”
“The night of the harvest feast, you dreamed you were Summer in the godswood, 
didn’t you?”
“Stop it!” Bran shouted. Summer slid toward the weirwood, his white 
teeth bared.
Jojen Reed took no mind. “When I touched Summer, I felt you in him. Just as 
you are in him now.”
“You couldn’t have. I was in bed. I was sleeping.”
“You were in the godswood, all in grey.”
“It was only a bad dream . . .”Jojen stood. “I felt you. I felt you fall. Is that what scares you, the 
falling?”
The falling, Bran thought, and the golden man, the queen’s 
brother, he scares me too, but mostly the falling. He did not say it, 
though. How could he? He had not been able to tell Ser Rodrik or Maester Luwin, 
and he could not tell the Reeds either. If he didn’t talk about it, maybe he 
would forget. He had never wanted to remember. It might not even be a true 
remembering.
“Do you fall every night, Bran?” Jojen asked quietly.A low rumbling growl rose from Summer’s throat, and there was no play in 
it. He stalked forward, all teeth and hot eyes. Meera stepped between the wolf 
and her brother, spear in hand. “Keep him back, Bran.”
“Jojen is making him angry.”
Meera shook out her net.
“It’s your anger, Bran,” her brother said. “Your fear.”
“It isn’t. I’m not a wolf.” Yet he’d howled with them in the night, and 
tasted blood in his wolf dreams.
“Part of you is Summer, and part of Summer is you. You know that, 
Bran.”
Summer rushed forward, but Meera blocked him, jabbing with the three-pronged 
spear. The wolf twisted aside, circling, stalking. Meera turned to face him. 
“Call him back, Bran.”“Summer!” Bran shouted. “To me, Summer!” He slapped an open palm down 
on the meat of his thigh. His hand tingled, though his dead leg felt 
nothing.
The direwolf lunged again, and again Meera’s spear darted out. Summer dodged, 
circled back. The bushes rustled, and a lean black shape came padding from 
behind the weirwood, teeth bared. The scent was strong; his brother had smelled 
his rage. Bran felt hairs rise on the back of his neck. Meera stood beside her 
brother, with wolves to either side. “Bran, call them off.”
“I can’t!”
“Jojen, up the tree.”
“There’s no need. Today is not the day I die.”
“Do it!” she screamed, and her brother scrambled up the trunk of 
the weirwood, using the face for his handholds. The direwolves closed. Meera 
abandoned spear and net, jumped up, and grabbed the branch above her head. 
Shaggy’s jaws snapped shut beneath her ankle as she swung up and over the limb. 
Summer sat back on his haunches and howled, while Shaggydog worried the net, 
shaking it in his teeth.
Only then did Bran remember that they were not alone. He cupped hands around 
his mouth. “Hodor!” he shouted. “Hodor! Hodor!” He was badly 
frightened and somehow ashamed. “They won’t hurt Hodor,” he assured his treed 
friends.
A few moments passed before they heard a tuneless humming. Hodor arrived 
half-dressed and mud-spattered from his visit to the hot pools, but Bran had 
never been so glad to see him. “Hodor,

help me. Chase off the wolves. Chase them off.”
Hodor went to it gleefully, waving his arms and stamping his huge feet, 
shouting “Hodor, Hodor,” running first at one wolf and then the other. 
Shaggydog was the first to flee, slinking back into the foliage with a final 
snarl. When Summer had enough, he came back to Bran and lay down beside 
him.
No sooner did Meera touch ground than she snatched up her spear and net again. 
Jojen never took his eyes off Summer. “We will talk again,” he promised 
Bran.
It was the wolves, it wasn’t me. He did not understand why they’d 
gotten so wild. Maybe Maester Luwin was right to lock them in the 
godswood. “Hodor,” he said, “bring me to Maester Luwin.”
The maester’s turret below the rookery was one of Bran’s favorite places. Luwin 
was hopelessly untidy, but his clutter of books and scrolls and bottles was as 
familiar and comforting to Bran as his bald spot and the flapping sleeves of 
his loose grey robes. He liked the ravens too.
He found Luwin perched on a high stool, writing. With Ser Rodrik gone, all of 
the governance of the castle had fallen on his shoulders. “My prince,” he 
said when Hodor entered, “you’re early for lessons today.” The maester spent 
several hours every afternoon tutoring Bran, Rickon, and the Walder 
Freys.
“Hodor, stand still.” Bran grasped a wall sconce with both hands and used it 
to pull himself up and out of the basket. He hung for a moment by his arms 
until Hodor carried him to a chair. “Meera says her brother has the 
greensight.”Maester Luwin scratched at the side of his nose with his writing quill. 
“Does she now?”
He nodded. “You told me that the children of the forest had the greensight. I 
remember.”
“Some claimed to have that power. Their wise men were called 
greenseers.”
“Was it magic?”
“Call it that for want of a better word, if you must. At heart it was only a 
different sort of knowledge.”
“What was it?”
Luwin set down his quill. “No one truly knows, Bran. The children are gone 
from the world, and their wisdom with them. It had to do with the faces in the 
trees, we think. The First Men believed that the greenseers could see through 
the eyes of the weirwoods. That was why they cut down the trees whenever they 
warred upon the children. Supposedly the greenseers also had power over the 
beasts of the wood and the birds in the trees. Even fish. Does the Reed boy 
claim such powers?”
“No. I don’t think. But he has dreams that come true sometimes, Meera 
says.”
“All of us have dreams that come true sometimes. You dreamed of your lord 
father in the crypts before we knew he was dead, remember?”
“Rickon did too. We dreamed the same dream.”
“Call it greensight, if you wish . . . but remember as well 
all those tens of thousands of dreams that you and Rickon have dreamed

that did not come true. Do you perchance recall what I taught you 
about the chain collar that every maester wears?”
Bran thought for a moment, trying to remember. “A maester forges his chain in 
the Citadel of Oldtown. It’s a chain because you swear to serve, and it’s made 
of different metals because you serve the realm and the realm has different 
sorts of people. Every time you learn something you get another link. Black 
iron is for ravenry, silver for healing, gold for sums and numbers. I don’t 
remember them all.”
Luwin slid a finger up under his collar and began to turn it, inch by inch. He 
had a thick neck for a small man, and the chain was tight, but a few pulls had 
it all the way around. “This is Valyrian steel,” he said when the link of 
dark grey metal lay against the apple of his throat. “Only one maester in a 
hundred wears such a link. This signifies that I have studied what the Citadel 
calls the higher mysteries—magic, for want of a better word. A 
fascinating pursuit, but of small use, which is why so few maesters trouble themselves with it.
“All those who study the higher mysteries try their own hand at spells, soon 
or late. I yielded to the temptation too, I must confess it. Well, I was a boy, 
and what boy does not secretly wish to find hidden powers in himself? I got no 
more for my efforts than a thousand boys before me, and a thousand since. Sad 
to say, magic does not work.”
“Sometimes it does,” Bran protested. “I had that dream, and Rickon did too. 
And there are mages and warlocks in the east . . .”“There are men who call themselves mages and warlocks,” 
Maester Luwin said. “I had a friend at the Citadel who could pull a rose out 
of your ear, but he was no more magical than I was. Oh, to be sure, there is 
much we do not understand. The years pass in their hundreds and their 
thousands, and what does any man see of life but a few summers, a few winters? 
We look at mountains and call them eternal, and so they 
seem . . . but in the course of time, mountains rise and fall, 
rivers change their courses, stars fall from the sky, and great cities sink 
beneath the sea. Even gods die, we think. Everything changes.
“Perhaps magic was once a mighty force in the world, but no longer. What 
little remains is no more than the wisp of smoke that lingers in 
the air after a great fire has burned out, and even that is fading. Valyria was 
the last ember, and Valyria is gone. The dragons are no more, the giants are 
dead, the children of the forest forgotten with all their lore.
“No, my prince. Jojen Reed may have had a dream or two that he believes came 
true, but he does not have the greensight. No living man has that 
power.”
Bran said as much to Meera Reed when she came to him at dusk as he sat in his 
window seat watching the lights flicker to life. “I’m sorry for what happened 
with the wolves. Summer shouldn’t have tried to hurt Jojen, but Jojen shouldn’t 
have said all that about my dreams. The crow lied when he said I could fly, and 
your brother lied too.”
“Or perhaps your maester is wrong.”“He isn’t. Even my father relied on his counsel.”
“Your father listened, I have no doubt. But in the end, he decided for 
himself. Bran, will you let me tell you about a dream Jojen dreamed of you and 
your fosterling brothers?”
“The Walders aren’t my brothers.”
She paid that no heed. “You were sitting at supper, but instead of a servant, 
Maester Luwin brought you your food. He served you the king’s cut off the 
roast, the meat rare and bloody, but with a savory smell that made everyone’s 
mouth water. The meat he served the Freys was old and grey and dead. Yet they 
liked their supper better than you liked yours.”
“I don’t understand.”
“You will, my brother says. When you do, we’ll talk again.”
Bran was almost afraid to sit to supper that night, but when he did, it was 
pigeon pie they set before him. Everyone else was served the same, and he 
couldn’t see that anything was wrong with the food they served the Walders. 
Maester Luwin has the truth of it, he told himself. Nothing bad was 
coming to Winterfell, no matter what Jojen said. Bran was 
relieved . . . but disappointed too. So long as there was 
magic, anything could happen. Ghosts could walk, trees could talk, and broken 
boys could grow up to be knights. “But there isn’t,” he said aloud in the 
darkness of his bed. “There’s no magic, and the stories are just 
stories.”
And he would never walk, nor fly, nor be a knight.

Alebelly found him in the forge, working the bellows for Mikken. “Maester 
wants you in the turret, m’lord prince. There’s been a bird from the 
king.”
“From Robb?” Excited, Bran did not wait for Hodor, but let Alebelly carry him 
up the steps. He was a big man, though not so big as Hodor and nowhere near as 
strong. By the time they reached the maester’s turret he was red-faced and 
puffing. Rickon was there before them, and both Walder Freys as well.Maester Luwin sent Alebelly away and closed his door. “My lords,” he 
said gravely, “we have had a message from His Grace, with both good news and 
ill. He has won a great victory in the west, shattering a Lannister army at a 
place named Oxcross, and has taken several castles as well. He writes us from 
Ashemark, formerly the stronghold of House Marbrand.”
Rickon tugged at the maester’s robe. “Is Robb coming home?”
“Not just yet, I fear. There are battles yet to fight.”
“Was it Lord Tywin he defeated?” asked Bran.
“No,” said the maester. “Ser Stafford Lannister commanded the enemy host. He 
was slain in the battle.”
Bran had never even heard of Ser Stafford Lannister. He found himself agreeing 
with Big Walder when he said, “Lord Tywin is the only one who matters.”“Tell Robb I want him to come home,” said Rickon. “He can bring his 
wolf home too, and Mother and Father.” Though he knew Lord Eddard was dead, 
sometimes Rickon forgot . . . willfully, Bran suspected. His 
little brother was stubborn as only a boy of four can be.
Bran was glad for Robb’s victory, but disquieted as well. He remembered what 
Osha had said the day that his brother had led his army out of Winterfell. 
He’s marching the wrong way, the wildling woman had 
insisted.
“Sadly, no victory is without cost.” Maester Luwin turned to the Walders. 
“My lords, your uncle Ser Stevron Frey was among those who lost their lives at 
Oxcross. He took a wound in the battle, Robb writes. It was not thought to be 
serious, but three days later he died in his tent, asleep.”
Big Walder shrugged. “He was very old. Five-and-sixty, I think. Too old for 
battles. He was always saying he was tired.”
Little Walder hooted. “Tired of waiting for our grandfather to die, you mean. 
Does this mean Ser Emmon’s the heir now?”
“Don’t be stupid,” his cousin said. “The sons of the first son come before 
the second son. Ser Ryman is next in line, and then Edwyn and Black Walder and 
Petyr Pimple. And then Aegon and all his sons.”
“Ryman is old too,” said Little Walder. “Past forty, I bet. And he has a bad 
belly. Do you think he’ll be lord?”
“I’ll be lord. I don’t care if he is.”
Maester Luwin cut in sharply. “You ought to be ashamed of

such talk, my lords. Where is your grief? Your uncle is dead.”
“Yes,” said Little Walder. “We’re very sad.”
They weren’t, though. Bran got a sick feeling in his belly. They like the 
taste of this dish better than I do. He asked Maester Luwin to be 
excused.
“Very well.” The maester rang for help. Hodor must have been busy in the 
stables. It was Osha who came. She was stronger than Alebelly, though, and had 
no trouble lifting Bran in her arms and carrying him down the steps.
“Osha,” Bran asked as they crossed the yard. “Do you know the way north? To 
the Wall and . . . and even past?”
“The way’s easy. Look for the Ice Dragon, and chase the blue star in the 
rider’s eye.” She backed through a door and started up the winding 
steps.
“And there are still giants there, and . . . the 
rest . . . the Others, and the children of the forest 
too?”
“The giants I’ve seen, the children I’ve heard tell of, and the white 
walkers . . . why do you want to know?”
“Did you ever see a three-eyed crow?”
“No.” She laughed. “And I can’t say I’d want to.” Osha kicked open the door 
to his bedchamber and set him in his window seat, where he could watch the yard 
below.
It seemed only a few heartbeats after she took her leave that the door opened 
again, and Jojen Reed entered unbidden, with his sister Meera behind him. “You 
heard about the bird?” Bran asked. The other boy nodded. “It wasn’t a supper 
like you said.

It was a letter from Robb, and we didn’t eat it, 
but—”
“The green dreams take strange shapes sometimes,” Jojen admitted. “The truth 
of them is not always easy to understand.”
“Tell me the bad thing you dreamed,” Bran said. “The bad thing that is 
coming to Winterfell.”
“Does my lord prince believe me now? Will he trust my words, no matter how 
queer they sound in his ears?”
Bran nodded.
“It is the sea that comes.”
“The sea?”
“I dreamed that the sea was lapping all around Winterfell. I saw black waves 
crashing against the gates and towers, and then the salt water came flowing 
over the walls and filled the castle. Drowned men were floating in the yard. 
When I first dreamed the dream, back at Greywater, I didn’t know their faces, 
but now I do. That Alebelly is one, the guard who called our names at the 
feast. Your septon’s another. Your smith as well.”
“Mikken?” Bran was as confused as he was dismayed. “But the sea is hundreds 
and hundreds of leagues away, and Winterfell’s walls are so high the water 
couldn’t get in even if it did come.”
“In the dark of night the salt sea will flow over these walls,” said Jojen. 
“I saw the dead, bloated and drowned.”
“We have to tell them,” Bran said. “Alebelly and Mikken, and Septon Chayle. 
Tell them not to drown.”
“It will not save them,” replied the boy in green.
Meera came to the window seat and put a hand on his

shoulder. “They will not believe, Bran. No more than you did.”
Jojen sat on Bran’s bed. “Tell me what you dream.”
He was scared, even then, but he had sworn to trust them, and a Stark of 
Winterfell keeps his sworn word. “There’s different kinds,” he said slowly. 
“There’s the wolf dreams, those aren’t so bad as the others. I run and hunt 
and kill squirrels. And there’s dreams where the crow comes and tells me to 
fly. Sometimes the tree is in those dreams too, calling my name. That frightens 
me. But the worst dreams are when I fall.” He looked down into the yard, 
feeling miserable. “I never used to fall before. When I climbed. I went 
everyplace, up on the roofs and along the walls, I used to feed the crows in 
the Burned Tower. Mother was afraid that I would fall but I knew I never would. 
Only I did, and now when I sleep I fall all the time.”
Meera gave his shoulder a squeeze. “Is that all?”
“I guess.”
“Warg,” said Jojen Reed.
Bran looked at him, his eyes wide. “What?”
“Warg. Shapechanger. Beastling. That is what they will call you, if they 
should ever hear of your wolf dreams.”
The names made him afraid again. “Who will call me?”
“Your own folk. In fear. Some will hate you if they know what you are. Some 
will even try to kill you.”
Old Nan told scary stories of beastlings and shapechangers sometimes. In the 
stories they were always evil. “I’m not like that,” Bran said. “I’m 
not. It’s only dreams.”“The wolf dreams are no true dreams. You have your eye closed tight 
whenever you’re awake, but as you drift off it flutters open and your soul 
seeks out its other half. The power is strong in you.”
“I don’t want it. I want to be a knight.”
“A knight is what you want. A warg is what you are. You can’t change that, 
Bran, you can’t deny it or push it away. You are the winged wolf, but you will 
never fly.” Jojen got up and walked to the window. “Unless you open your 
eye.” He put two fingers together and poked Bran in the forehead, 
hard.
When he raised his hand to the spot, Bran felt only the smooth unbroken skin. 
There was no eye, not even a closed one. “How can I open it if it’s not 
there?”
“You will never find the eye with your fingers, Bran. You must search with 
your heart.” Jojen studied Bran’s face with those strange green eyes. “Or are 
you afraid?”
“Maester Luwin says there’s nothing in dreams that a man 
need fear.”
“There is,” said Jojen.
“What?”
“The past. The future. The truth.”
They left him more muddled than ever. When he was alone, Bran tried to open his 
third eye, but he didn’t know how. No matter how he wrinkled his forehead and 
poked at it, he couldn’t see any different than he’d done before. In the days 
that followed, he tried to warn others about what Jojen had seen, but

it didn’t go as he wanted. Mikken thought it was funny. “The sea, is it? 
Happens I always wanted to see the sea. Never got where I could go to it, 
though. So now it’s coming to me, is it? The gods are good, to take such 
trouble for a poor smith.”
“The gods will take me when they see fit,” Septon Chayle said quietly, 
“though I scarcely think it likely that I’ll drown, Bran. I grew up on the 
banks of the White Knife, you know. I’m quite the strong swimmer.”
Alebelly was the only one who paid the warning any heed. He went to talk to 
Jojen himself, and afterward stopped bathing and refused to go near the well. 
Finally he stank so bad that six of the other guards threw him into a tub of 
scalding water and scrubbed him raw while he screamed that they were going to 
drown him like the frogboy had said. Thereafter he scowled whenever he saw Bran 
or Jojen about the castle, and muttered under his breath.
It was a few days after Alebelly’s bath that Ser Rodrik returned to Winterfell 
with his prisoner, a fleshy young man with fat moist lips and long hair
who smelled like a privy, even worse than Alebelly had. “Reek, he’s called,” 
Hayhead said when Bran asked who it was. “I never heard his true name. He 
served the Bastard of Bolton and helped him murder Lady Hornwood, they 
say.”
The Bastard himself was dead, Bran learned that evening over supper. Ser 
Rodrik’s men had caught him on Hornwood land doing something horrible (Bran 
wasn’t quite sure what, but it seemed to be something you did without your 
clothes) and shot him down with

arrows as he tried to ride away. They came too late for poor Lady Hornwood, 
though. After their wedding, the Bastard had locked her in a tower and 
neglected to feed her. Bran had heard men saying that when Ser Rodrik had 
smashed down the door he found her with her mouth all bloody and her fingers 
chewed off.
“The monster has tied us a thorny knot,” the old knight told Maester Luwin. 
“Like it or no, Lady Hornwood was his wife. He made her say the vows before 
both septon and heart tree, and bedded her that very night before witnesses. 
She signed a will naming him as heir and fixed her seal to it.”
“Vows made at sword point are not valid,” the maester argued.
“Roose Bolton may not agree. Not with land at issue.” Ser Rodrik looked 
unhappy. “Would that I could take this serving man’s head off as well, he’s as 
bad as his master. But I fear I must keep him alive until Robb returns from his 
wars. He is the only witness to the worst of the Bastard’s crimes. Perhaps when 
Lord Bolton hears his tale, he will abandon his claim, but meantime we have 
Manderly knights and Dreadfort men killing one another in Hornwood forests, and 
I lack the strength to stop them.” The old knight turned in his seat and gave 
Bran a stern look. “And what have you been about while I’ve been away, my lord 
prince? Commanding our guardsmen not to wash? Do you want them smelling like 
this Reek, is that it?”
“The sea is coming here,” Bran said. “Jojen saw it in a green dream. 
Alebelly is going to drown.”
Maester Luwin tugged at his chain collar. “The Reed boy

believes he sees the future in his dreams, Ser Rodrik. I’ve spoken to Bran 
about the uncertainty of such prophecies, but if truth be told, there 
is trouble along the Stony Shore. Raiders in longships, plundering 
fishing villages. Raping and burning. Leobald Tallhart has sent his nephew 
Benfred to deal with them, but I expect they’ll take to their ships and flee at 
the first sight of armed men.”
“Aye, and strike somewhere else. The Others take all such cowards. They would 
never dare, no more than the Bastard of Bolton, if our main strength were not a 
thousand leagues south.” Ser Rodrik looked at Bran. “What else did the lad 
tell you?”
“He said the water would flow over our walls. He saw Alebelly drowned, and 
Mikken and Septon Chayle too.”
Ser Rodrik frowned. “Well, should it happen that I need to ride against these 
raiders myself, I shan’t take Alebelly, then. He didn’t see me 
drowned, did he? No? Good.”
It heartened Bran to hear that. Maybe they won’t drown, then, he 
thought. If they stay away from the sea.
Meera thought so too, later that night when she and Jojen met Bran in his room 
to play a three-sided game of tiles, but her brother shook his head. “The 
things I see in green dreams can’t be changed.”
That made his sister angry. “Why would the gods send a warning if we can’t 
heed it and change what’s to come?”
“I don’t know,” Jojen said sadly.
“If you were Alebelly, you’d probably jump into the well to

have done with it! He should fight, and Bran should too.”
“Me?” Bran felt suddenly afraid. “What should I fight? Am I going to drown 
too?”
Meera looked at him guiltily. “I shouldn’t have 
said . . .”
He could tell that she was hiding something. “Did you see me in a green 
dream?” he asked Jojen nervously. “Was I drowned?”
“Not drowned.” Jojen spoke as if every word pained him. “I dreamed of the 
man who came today, the one they call Reek. You and your brother lay dead at 
his feet, and he was skinning off your faces with a long red blade.”
Meera rose to her feet. “If I went to the dungeon, I could drive a spear right 
through his heart. How could he murder Bran if he was dead?”
“The gaolers will stop you,” Jojen said. “The guards. And if you tell them 
why you want him dead, they’ll never believe.”
“I have guards too,” Bran reminded them. “Alebelly and Poxy Tym and Hayhead 
and the rest.”
Jojen’s mossy eyes were full of pity. “They won’t be able to stop him, Bran. I 
couldn’t see why, but I saw the end of it. I saw you and Rickon in your crypts, 
down in the dark with all the dead kings and their stone wolves.”
No, Bran thought. No. “If I went 
away . . . to Greywater, or to the crow, someplace far where 
they couldn’t find me . . .”
“It will not matter. The dream was green, Bran, and the green dreams do not 
lie.”

The sound was the faintest of clinks, a scraping of steel over 
stone. He lifted his head from his paws, listening, sniffing at the 
night.
The evening’s rain had woken a hundred sleeping smells and made them ripe and 
strong again. Grass and thorns, blackberries broken on the ground, mud, worms, 
rotting leaves, a rat creeping through the bush. He caught the shaggy black 
scent of his brother’s coat and the sharp coppery tang of blood from the 
squirrel he’d killed. Other squirrels moved through the branches above, 
smelling of wet fur and fear, their little claws scratching at the bark. The 
noise had sounded something like that.And he heard it again, clink and scrape. It brought him to his 
feet. His ears pricked and his tail rose. He howled, a long deep shivery cry, a 
howl to wake the sleepers, but the piles of man-rock were dark and dead. A 
still wet night, a night to drive men into their holes. The rain had stopped, 
but the men still hid from the damp, huddled by the fires in their caves of 
piled stone.
His brother came sliding through the trees, moving almost as quiet as another 
brother he remembered dimly from long ago, the white one with the eyes of 
blood. This brother’s eyes were pools of shadow, but the fur on the 
back of his neck was bristling. He had heard the sounds as well, and known they 
meant danger.This time the clink and scrape were followed by a slithering 
and the soft swift patter of skinfeet on stone. The wind brought the faintest 
whiff of a man-smell he did not know. Stranger. Danger. 
Death.
He ran toward the sound, his brother racing beside him. The stone dens rose 
before them, walls slick and wet. He bared his teeth, but the man-rock took no 
notice. A gate loomed up, a black iron snake coiled tight about bar and post. 
When he crashed against it, the gate shuddered and the snake clanked and 
slithered and held. Through the bars he could look down the long stone burrow 
that ran between the walls to the stony field beyond, but there was no way 
through. He could force his muzzle between the bars, but no more. Many a time 
his brother had tried to crack the black bones of the gate between his teeth, 
but they would not break. They had tried to dig under, but there were great 
flat stones beneath, half-covered by earth and blown leaves.
Snarling, he paced back and forth in front of the gate, then threw himself at 
it once more. It moved a little and slammed him back. Locked, 
something whispered. Chained. The voice he did not hear, the scent 
without a smell. The other ways were closed as well. Where doors opened in the 
walls of man-rock, the wood was thick and strong. There was no way 
out.
There is, the whisper came, and it seemed as if he could see the 
shadow of a great tree covered in needles, slanting up out of the black earth 
to ten times the height of a man. Yet when he looked about, it was not there. 
The other side of the godswood,

the sentinel, hurry, hurry . . .
Through the gloom of night came a muffled shout, cut short.
Swiftly, swiftly, he whirled and bounded back into the trees, wet leaves 
rustling beneath his paws, branches whipping at him as he rushed past. He could 
hear his brother following close. They plunged under the heart tree and around 
the cold pool, through the blackberry bushes, under a tangle of oaks and ash 
and hawthorn scrub, to the far side of the wood . . . and there 
it was, the shadow he’d glimpsed without seeing, the slanting tree pointing at 
the rooftops. Sentinel, came the thought.
He remembered how it was to climb it then. The needles everywhere, scratching 
at his bare face and falling down the back of his neck, the sticky sap on his 
hands, the sharp piney smell of it. It was an easy tree for a boy to climb, 
leaning as it did, crooked, the branches so close together they almost made a 
ladder, slanting right up to the roof.
Growling, he sniffed around the base of the tree, lifted a leg and marked it 
with a stream of urine. A low branch brushed his face, and he snapped at it, 
twisting and pulling until the wood cracked and tore. His mouth was full of 
needles and the bitter taste of the sap. He shook his head and 
snarled.
His brother sat back on his haunches and lifted his voice in a ululating howl, 
his song black with mourning. The way was no way. They were not squirrels, nor 
the cubs of men, they could not wriggle up the trunks of trees, clinging with 
soft pink paws and clumsy feet. They were runners, hunters, prowlers.Off across the night, beyond the stone that hemmed them close, the dogs 
woke and began to bark. One and then another and then all of them, a great 
clamor. They smelled it too; the scent of foes and fear.
A desperate fury filled him, hot as hunger. He sprang away from the wall, loped 
off beneath the trees, the shadows of branch and leaf dappling his grey 
fur . . . and then he turned and raced back in a rush. His feet 
flew, kicking up wet leaves and pine needles, and for a little time he was a 
hunter and an antlered stag was fleeing before him and he could see it, smell 
it, and he ran full out in pursuit. The smell of fear made his heart thunder 
and slaver ran from his jaws, and he reached the falling tree in stride and 
threw himself up the trunk, claws scrabbling at the bark for purchase. Upward 
he bounded, up, two bounds, three, hardly slowing, until he was among 
the lower limbs. Branches tangled his feet and whipped at his eyes, grey-green 
needles scattered as he shouldered through them, snapping. He had to slow. 
Something snagged at his foot and he wrenched it free, snarling. The trunk 
narrowed under him, the slope steeper, almost straight up, and wet. The bark 
tore like skin when he tried to claw at it. He was a third of the way up, 
halfway, more, the roof was almost within reach . . . and then 
he put down a foot and felt it slip off the curve of wet wood, and suddenly he 
was sliding, stumbling. He yowled in fear and fury, falling, falling, 
and twisted around while the ground rushed up to break 
him . . .
And then Bran was back abed in his lonely tower room,

tangled in his blankets, his breath coming hard. “Summer,” he cried aloud. 
“Summer.” His shoulder seemed to ache, as if he had fallen on it, but he knew 
it was only the ghost of what the wolf was feeling. Jojen told it true. I 
am a beastling. Outside he could hear the faint barking of dogs. The 
sea has come. It’s flowing over the walls, just as Jojen saw. Bran grabbed 
the bar overhead and pulled himself up, shouting for help. No one came, and 
after a moment he remembered that no one would. They had taken the guard off 
his door. Ser Rodrik had needed every man of fighting age he could lay his 
hands on, so Winterfell had been left with only a token garrison.
The rest had left eight days past, six hundred men from Winterfell and the 
nearest holdfasts. Cley Cerwyn was bringing three hundred more to join them on 
the march, and Maester Luwin had sent ravens before them, summoning levies from 
White Harbor and the barrowlands and even the deep places inside the wolfswood. 
Torrhen’s Square was under attack by some monstrous war chief named Dagmer 
Cleftjaw. Old Nan said he couldn’t be killed, that once a foe had cut his head 
in two with an axe, but Dagmer was so fierce he’d just pushed the two halves 
back together and held them until they healed up. Could Dagmer have 
won? Torrhen’s Square was many days from Winterfell, yet 
still . . .
Bran pulled himself from the bed, moving bar to bar until he reached the 
windows. His fingers fumbled a little as he swung back the shutters. The yard 
was empty, and all the windows he could see were black. Winterfell slept. 
“Hodor!” he shouted

down, as loud as he could. Hodor would be asleep above the stables, but maybe 
if he yelled loud enough he’d hear, or somebody would. “Hodor, 
come fast! Osha! Meera, Jojen, anyone!” Bran cupped his hands around his 
mouth. “HOOOOODOOOOOR!”
But when the door crashed open behind him, the man who stepped through was no 
one Bran knew. He wore a leather jerkin sewn with overlapping iron disks, and 
carried a dirk in one hand and an axe strapped to his back. “What do you 
want?” Bran demanded, afraid. “This is my room. You get out of 
here.”
Theon Greyjoy followed him into the bedchamber. “We’re not here to harm you, 
Bran.”
“Theon?” Bran felt dizzy with relief. “Did Robb send you? Is he here 
too?”
“Robb’s far away. He can’t help you now.”
“Help me?” He was confused. “Don’t scare me, Theon.”
“I’m Prince Theon now. We’re both princes, Bran. Who would have 
dreamed it? But I’ve taken your castle, my prince.”
“Winterfell?” Bran shook his head. “No, you couldn’t.”
“Leave us, Werlag.” The man with the dirk withdrew. Theon seated himself on 
the bed. “I sent four men over the walls with grappling claws and ropes, and 
they opened a postern gate for the rest of us. My men are dealing with yours 
even now. I promise you, Winterfell is mine.”
Bran did not understand. “But you’re Father’s ward.”
“And now you and your brother are my wards. As soon as the 
fighting’s done, my men will be bringing the rest of your people

together in the Great Hall. You and I are going to speak to them. You’ll tell 
them how you’ve yielded Winterfell to me, and command them to serve and obey 
their new lord as they did the old.”
“I won’t,” said Bran. “We’ll fight you and throw you out. I never 
yielded, you can’t make me say I did.”
“This is no game, Bran, so don’t play the boy with me, I won’t stand for it. 
The castle is mine, but these people are still yours. If the prince would keep 
them safe, he’d best do as he’s told.” He rose and went to the door. “Someone 
will come dress you and carry you to the Great Hall. Think carefully on what 
you want to say.”
The waiting made Bran feel even more helpless than before. He sat in the window 
seat, staring out at dark towers and walls black as shadow. Once he thought he 
heard shouting beyond the Guards Hall, and something that might have been the 
clash of swords, but he did not have Summer’s ears to hear, nor his nose to 
smell. Awake, I am still broken, but when I sleep, when I’m Summer, I can 
run and fight and hear and smell.
He had expected that Hodor would come for him, or maybe one of the serving 
girls, but when the door next opened it was Maester Luwin, carrying a candle. 
“Bran,” he said, “you . . . know what has happened? You have 
been told?” The skin was broken above his left eye, and blood ran down that 
side of his face.
“Theon came. He said Winterfell was his now.”
The maester set down the candle and wiped the blood off his cheek. “They swam 
the moat. Climbed the walls with hook and

rope. Came over wet and dripping, steel in hand.” He sat on the chair by the 
door, as fresh blood flowed. “Alebelly was on the gate, they surprised him in 
the turret and killed him. Hayhead’s wounded as well. I had time to send off 
two ravens before they burst in. The bird to White Harbor got away, but they 
brought down the other with an arrow.” The maester stared at the rushes. “Ser 
Rodrik took too many of our men, but I am to blame as much as he is. I never 
saw this danger, I never . . .”
Jojen saw it, Bran thought. “You better help me dress.”
“Yes, that’s so.” In the heavy ironbound chest at the foot of Bran’s bed the 
maester found smallclothes, breeches, and tunic. “You are the Stark in 
Winterfell, and Robb’s heir. You must look princely.” Together they garbed him 
as befit a lord.
“Theon wants me to yield the castle,” Bran said as the maester was fastening 
the cloak with his favorite wolf’s-head clasp of silver and jet.
“There is no shame in that. A lord must protect his smallfolk. Cruel places 
breed cruel peoples, Bran, remember that as you deal with these ironmen. Your 
lord father did what he could to gentle Theon, but I fear it was too little and 
too late.”
The ironman who came for them was a squat thick-bodied man with a coal-black 
beard that covered half his chest. He bore the boy easily enough, though he 
looked none too happy with the task. Rickon’s bedchamber was a half turn down 
the steps. The four-year-old was cranky at being woken. “I want Mother,” he 
said. “I want her. And Shaggydog too.”“Your mother is far away, my prince.” Maester Luwin pulled a bedrobe 
over the child’s head. “But I’m here, and Bran.” He took Rickon by the hand 
and led him out.
Below, they came on Meera and Jojen being herded from their room by a bald man 
whose spear was three feet taller than he was. When Jojen looked at Bran, his 
eyes were green pools full of sorrow. Other ironmen had rousted the Freys. 
“Your brother’s lost his kingdom,” Little Walder told Bran. “You’re no 
prince now, just a hostage.”
“So are you,” Jojen said, “and me, and all of us.”
“No one was talking to you, frogeater.”
One of the ironmen went before them carrying a torch, but the rain had started 
again and soon drowned it out. As they hurried across the yard they could hear 
the direwolves howling in the godswood. I hope Summer wasn’t hurt falling 
from the tree.
Theon Greyjoy was seated in the high seat of the Starks. He had taken off his 
cloak. Over a shirt of fine mail he wore a black surcoat emblazoned with the 
golden kraken of his House. His hands rested on the wolves’ heads carved at the 
ends of the wide stone arms. “Theon’s sitting in Robb’s chair,” Rickon 
said.
“Hush, Rickon.” Bran could feel the menace around them, but his brother was 
too young. A few torches had been lit, and a fire kindled in the great hearth, 
but most of the hall remained in darkness. There was no place to sit with the 
benches stacked against the walls, so the castle folk stood in small groups, 
not daring to speak. He saw Old Nan, her toothless mouth opening and

closing. Hayhead was carried in between two of the other guards, a bloodstained 
bandage wrapped about his bare chest. Poxy Tym wept inconsolably, and Beth 
Cassel cried with fear.
“What have we here?” Theon asked of the Reeds and Freys.
“These are Lady Catelyn’s wards, both named Walder Frey,” Maester Luwin 
explained. “And this is Jojen Reed and his sister Meera, son and daughter to 
Howland Reed of Greywater Watch, who came to renew their oaths of fealty to 
Winterfell.”
“Some might call that ill-timed,” said Theon, “though not for me. Here you 
are and here you’ll stay.” He vacated the high seat. “Bring the prince here, 
Lorren.” The black-bearded man dumped Bran onto the stone as if he were a sack 
of oats.
People were still being driven into the Great Hall, prodded along with shouts 
and the butts of the spears. Gage and Osha arrived from the kitchens, spotted 
with flour from making the morning bread. Mikken they dragged in cursing. 
Farlen entered limping, struggling to support Palla. Her dress had been ripped 
in two; she held it up with a clenched fist and walked as if every step were 
agony. Septon Chayle rushed to lend a hand, but one of the ironmen knocked him 
to the floor.
The last man marched through the doors was the prisoner Reek, whose stench 
preceded him, ripe and pungent. Bran felt his stomach twist at the smell of 
him. “We found this one locked in a tower cell,” announced his escort, a 
beardless youth with ginger-colored hair and sodden clothing, doubtless one of 
those who’d swum the moat. “He says they call him Reek.”“Can’t think why,” Theon said, smiling. “Do you always smell so bad, 
or did you just finish fucking a pig?”
“Haven’t fucked no one since they took me, m’lord. Heke’s me true name. I was 
in service to the Bastard o’ the Dreadfort till the Starks give him an arrow in 
the back for a wedding gift.”
Theon found that amusing. “Who did he marry?”
“The widow o’ Hornwood, m’lord.”
“That crone? Was he blind? She has teats like empty wineskins, dry and 
withered.”
“It wasn’t her teats he wed her for, m’lord.”
The ironmen slammed shut the tall doors at the foot of the hall. From the high 
seat, Bran could see about twenty of them. He probably left some guards on 
the gates and the armory. Even so, there couldn’t be more than 
thirty.
Theon raised his hands for quiet. “You all know me—”
“Aye, we know you for a sack of steaming dung!” shouted Mikken, before the 
bald man drove the butt of his spear into his gut, then smashed him across the 
face with the shaft. The smith stumbled to his knees and spat out a 
tooth.
“Mikken, you be silent.” Bran tried to sound stern and lordly, the way Robb 
did when he made a command, but his voice betrayed him and the words came out 
in a shrill squeak.
“Listen to your little lordling, Mikken,” said Theon. “He has more sense 
than you do.”
A good lord protects his people, he reminded himself. “I’ve yielded 
Winterfell to Theon.”“Louder, Bran. And call me prince.”
He raised his voice. “I have yielded Winterfell to Prince Theon. All of you 
should do as he commands you.”
“Damned if I will!” bellowed Mikken.
Theon ignored the outburst. “My father has donned the ancient crown of salt 
and rock, and declared himself King of the Iron Islands. He claims the north as 
well, by right of conquest. You are all his subjects.”
“Bugger that.” Mikken wiped the blood from his mouth. “I serve the 
Starks, not some treasonous squid of—aah.” The butt of the 
spear smashed him face first into the stone floor.
“Smiths have strong arms and weak heads,” observed Theon. “But if the rest 
of you serve me as loyally as you served Ned Stark, you’ll find me as generous 
a lord as you could want.”
On his hands and knees, Mikken spat blood. Please don’t, Bran wished 
at him, but the blacksmith shouted, “If you think you can hold the north with 
this sorry lot o’—”
The bald man drove the point of his spear into the back of Mikken’s neck. Steel 
slid through flesh and came out his throat in a welter of blood. A woman 
screamed, and Meera wrapped her arms around Rickon. It’s blood he drowned 
on, Bran thought numbly. His own blood.
“Who else has something to say?” asked Theon Greyjoy.
“Hodor hodor hodor hodor,” shouted Hodor, eyes wide.
“Someone kindly shut that halfwit up.”
Two ironmen began to beat Hodor with the butts of their

spears. The stableboy dropped to the floor, trying to shield himself with his 
hands.
“I will be as good a lord to you as Eddard Stark ever was.” Theon raised his 
voice to be heard above the smack of wood on flesh. “Betray me, though, and 
you’ll wish you hadn’t. And don’t think the men you see here are the whole of 
my power. Torrhen’s Square and Deepwood Motte will soon be ours as well, and my 
uncle is sailing up the Saltspear to seize Moat Cailin. If Robb Stark can stave 
off the Lannisters, he may reign as King of the Trident hereafter, but House 
Greyjoy holds the north now.”
“Stark’s lords will fight you,” the man Reek called out. “That bloated pig 
at White Harbor for one, and them Umbers and Karstarks too. You’ll need men. 
Free me and I’m yours.”
Theon weighed him a moment. “You’re cleverer than you smell, but I could not 
suffer that stench.”
“Well,” said Reek, “I could wash some. If I was free.”
“A man of rare good sense.” Theon smiled. “Bend the knee.”
One of the ironmen handed Reek a sword, and he laid it at Theon’s feet and 
swore obedience to House Greyjoy and King Balon. Bran could not look. The green 
dream was coming true.
“M’lord Greyjoy!” Osha stepped past Mikken’s body. “I was brought here 
captive too. You were there the day I was taken.”
I thought you were a friend, Bran thought, hurt.
“I need fighters,” Theon declared, “not kitchen sluts.”
“It was Robb Stark put me in the kitchens. For the best part of a year, I’ve 
been left to scour kettles, scrape grease,

and warm the straw for this one.” She threw a look at Gage. “I’ve had a 
bellyful of it. Put a spear in my hand again.”
“I got a spear for you right here,” said the bald man who’d killed Mikken. He 
grabbed his crotch, grinning.
Osha drove her bony knee up between his legs. “You keep that soft pink 
thing.” She wrested the spear from him and used the butt to knock him off his 
feet. “I’ll have me the wood and iron.” The bald man writhed on the floor 
while the other reavers sent up gales of laughter.
Theon laughed with the rest. “You’ll do,” he said. “Keep the spear; Stygg 
can find another. Now bend the knee and swear.”
When no one else rushed forward to pledge service, they were dismissed with a 
warning to do their work and make no trouble. Hodor was given the task of 
bearing Bran back to his bed. His face was all ugly from the beating, his nose 
swollen and one eye closed. “Hodor,” he sobbed between cracked lips as 
he lifted Bran in huge strong arms and bloody hands and carried him back out 
into the rain.

The ashes fell like a soft grey snow.
He padded over dry needles and brown leaves, to the edge of the wood where the 
pines grew thin. Beyond the open fields he could see the great piles of 
man-rock stark against the swirling flames. The wind blew hot and rich with the 
smell of blood and burnt meat, so strong he began to slaver.Yet as one smell drew them onward, others warned them back. He sniffed at 
the drifting smoke. Men, many men, many horses, and fire, fire, fire. 
No smell was more dangerous, not even the hard cold smell of iron, the stuff of 
man-claws and hardskin. The smoke and ash clouded his eyes, and in the sky he 
saw a great winged snake whose roar was a river of flame. He bared his teeth, 
but then the snake was gone. Behind the cliffs tall fires were eating up the 
stars.
All through the night the fires crackled, and once there was a great roar and a 
crash that made the earth jump under his feet. Dogs barked and whined and 
horses screamed in terror. Howls shuddered through the night; the howls of the 
man-pack, wails of fear and wild shouts, laughter and screams. No beast was as 
noisy as man. He pricked up his ears and listened, and his brother growled at 
every sound. They prowled under the trees as a piney wind blew ashes and embers 
through the sky. In time the flames

began to dwindle, and then they were gone. The sun rose grey and smoky that 
morning.
Only then did he leave the trees, stalking slow across the fields. His brother 
ran with him, drawn to the smell of blood and death. They padded silent through 
the dens the men had built of wood and grass and mud. Many and more were burned 
and many and more were collapsed; others stood as they had before. Yet nowhere 
did they see or scent a living man. Crows blanketed the bodies and leapt into 
the air screeching when his brother and he came near. The wild dogs slunk away 
before them.
Beneath the great grey cliffs a horse was dying noisily, struggling to rise on 
a broken leg and screaming when he fell. His brother circled round him, then 
tore out his throat while the horse kicked feebly and rolled his eyes. When he 
approached the carcass his brother snapped at him and laid back his ears, and 
he cuffed him with a forepaw and bit his leg. They fought amidst the grass and 
dirt and falling ashes beside the dead horse, until his brother rolled on his 
back in submission, tail tucked low. One more bite at his upturned throat; then 
he fed, and let his brother feed, and licked the blood off his black 
fur.
The dark place was pulling at him by then, the house of whispers where all men 
were blind. He could feel its cold fingers on him. The stony smell of it was a 
whisper up the nose. He struggled against the pull. He did not like the 
darkness. He was wolf. He was hunter and stalker and slayer, and he belonged 
with his brothers and sisters in the deep woods, running free beneath a

starry sky. He sat on his haunches, raised his head, and howled. I will 
not go, he cried. I am wolf, I will not go. Yet even so the 
darkness thickened, until it covered his eyes and filled his nose and stopped 
his ears, so he could not see or smell or hear or run, and the grey cliffs were 
gone and the dead horse was gone and his brother was gone and all was black and 
still and black and cold and black and dead and 
black . . .
“Bran,” a voice was whispering softly. “Bran, come back. Come 
back now, Bran. Bran . . .”
He closed his third eye and opened the other two, the old two, the blind two. 
In the dark place all men were blind. But someone was holding him. He could 
feel arms around him, the warmth of a body snuggled close. He could hear Hodor 
singing “Hodor, hodor, hodor,” quietly to himself.
“Bran?” It was Meera’s voice. “You were thrashing, making terrible noises. 
What did you see?”
“Winterfell.” His tongue felt strange and thick in his mouth. One day 
when I come back I won’t know how to talk anymore. “It was Winterfell. It 
was all on fire. There were horse smells, and steel, and blood. They killed 
everyone, Meera.”
He felt her hand on his face, stroking back his hair. “You’re all sweaty,” 
she said. “Do you need a drink?”
“A drink,” he agreed. She held a skin to his lips, and Bran swallowed so fast 
the water ran out of the corner of his mouth. He was always weak and thirsty 
when he came back. And hungry too. He remembered the dying horse, the taste of 
blood in his

mouth, the smell of burnt flesh in the morning air. “How long?”
“Three days,” said Jojen. The boy had come up softfoot, or perhaps he had 
been there all along; in this blind black world, Bran could not have said. “We 
were afraid for you.”
“I was with Summer,” Bran said.
“Too long. You’ll starve yourself. Meera dribbled a little water down your 
throat, and we smeared honey on your mouth, but it is not enough.”
“I ate,” said Bran. “We ran down an elk and had to drive off a treecat that 
tried to steal him.” The cat had been tan-and-brown, only half the size of the 
direwolves, but fierce. He remembered the musky smell of him, and the way he 
had snarled down at them from the limb of the oak.
“The wolf ate,” Jojen said. “Not you. Take care, Bran. Remember who you 
are.”
He remembered who he was all too well; Bran the boy, Bran the broken. 
Better Bran the beastling. Was it any wonder he would sooner dream 
his Summer dreams, his wolf dreams? Here in the chill damp darkness of the tomb 
his third eye had finally opened. He could reach Summer whenever he wanted, and 
once he had even touched Ghost and talked to Jon. Though maybe he had only 
dreamed that. He could not understand why Jojen was always trying to pull him 
back now. Bran used the strength of his arms to squirm to a sitting position. 
“I have to tell Osha what I saw. Is she here? Where did she go?”
The wildling woman herself gave answer. “Nowhere, m’lord.

I’ve had my fill o’ blundering in the black.” He heard the scrape of a heel on 
stone, turned his head toward the sound, but saw nothing. He thought he could 
smell her, but he wasn’t sure. All of them stank alike, and he did not have 
Summer’s nose to tell one from the other. “Last night I pissed on a king’s 
foot,” Osha went on. “Might be it was morning, who can say? I was sleeping, 
but now I’m not.” They all slept a lot, not only Bran. There was nothing else 
to do. Sleep and eat and sleep again, and sometimes talk a 
little . . . but not too much, and only in whispers, just to be 
safe. Osha might have liked it better if they had never talked at all, but 
there was no way to quiet Rickon, or to stop Hodor from muttering, “Hodor, 
hodor, hodor,” endlessly to himself.
“Osha,” Bran said, “I saw Winterfell burning.” Off to his left, he could 
hear the soft sound of Rickon’s breathing.
“A dream,” said Osha.
“A wolf dream,” said Bran. “I smelled it too. Nothing smells like 
fire, or blood.”
“Whose blood?”
“Men, horses, dogs, everyone. We have to go see.”
“This scrawny skin of mine’s the only one I got,” said Osha. “That squid 
prince catches hold o’ me, they’ll strip it off my back with a 
whip.”
Meera’s hand found Bran’s in the darkness and gave his fingers a squeeze. 
“I’ll go if you’re afraid.”
Bran heard fingers fumbling at leather, followed by the sound of steel on 
flint. Then again. A spark flew, caught. Osha

blew softly. A long pale flame awoke, stretching upward like a girl on her 
toes. Osha’s face floated above it. She touched the flame with the head of a 
torch. Bran had to squint as the pitch began to burn, filling the world with 
orange glare. The light woke Rickon, who sat up yawning.
When the shadows moved, it looked for an instant as if the dead were rising as 
well. Lyanna and Brandon, Lord Rickard Stark their father, Lord Edwyle his 
father, Lord Willam and his brother Artos the Implacable, Lord Donnor and Lord 
Beron and Lord Rodwell, one-eyed Lord Jonnel, Lord Barth and Lord Brandon and 
Lord Cregan who had fought the Dragonknight. On their stone chairs they sat 
with stone wolves at their feet. This was where they came when the warmth had 
seeped out of their bodies; this was the dark hall of the dead, where the 
living feared to tread.
And in the mouth of the empty tomb that waited for Lord Eddard Stark, beneath 
his stately granite likeness, the six fugitives huddled round their little 
cache of bread and water and dried meat. “Little enough left,” Osha muttered 
as she blinked down on their stores. “I’d need to go up soon to steal food in 
any case, or we’d be down to eating Hodor.”
“Hodor,” Hodor said, grinning at her.
“Is it day or night up there?” Osha wondered. “I’ve lost all count o’ 
such.”
“Day,” Bran told her, “but it’s dark from all the smoke.”
“M’lord is certain?”
Never moving his broken body, he reached out all the same,

and for an instant he was seeing double. There stood Osha holding the torch, 
and Meera and Jojen and Hodor, and the double row of tall granite pillars and 
long dead lords behind them stretching away into 
darkness . . . but there was Winterfell as well, grey with 
drifting smoke, the massive oak-and-iron gates charred and askew, the 
drawbridge down in a tangle of broken chains and missing planks. Bodies floated 
in the moat, islands for the crows.
“Certain,” he declared.
Osha chewed on that a moment. “I’ll risk a look then. I want the lot o’ you 
close behind. Meera, get Bran’s basket.”
“Are we going home?” Rickon asked excitedly. “I want my horse. And I want 
applecakes and butter and honey, and Shaggy. Are we going where Shaggydog 
is?”
“Yes,” Bran promised, “but you have to be quiet.”
Meera strapped the wicker basket to Hodor’s back and helped lift Bran into it, 
easing his useless legs through the holes. He had a queer flutter in his belly. 
He knew what awaited them above, but that did not make it any less fearful. As 
they set off, he turned to give his father one last look, and it seemed to Bran 
that there was a sadness in Lord Eddard’s eyes, as if he did not want them to 
go. We have to, he thought. It’s time.
Osha carried her long oaken spear in one hand and the torch in the other. A 
naked sword hung down her back, one of the last to bear Mikken’s mark. He had 
forged it for Lord Eddard’s tomb, to keep his ghost at rest. But with Mikken 
slain and the ironmen guarding the armory, good steel had been hard to resist, 
even if

it meant grave-robbing. Meera had claimed Lord Rickard’s blade, though she 
complained that it was too heavy. Brandon took his namesake’s, the sword made 
for the uncle he had never known. He knew he would not be much use in a fight, 
but even so the blade felt good in his hand.
But it was only a game, and Bran knew it.
Their footsteps echoed through the cavernous crypts. The shadows behind them 
swallowed his father as the shadows ahead retreated to unveil other statues; no 
mere lords, these, but the old Kings in the North. On their brows they wore 
stone crowns. Torrhen Stark, the King Who Knelt. Edwyn the Spring King. Theon 
Stark, the Hungry Wolf. Brandon the Burner and Brandon the Shipwright. Jorah 
and Jonos, Brandon the Bad, Walton the Moon King, Edderion the Bridegroom, 
Eyron, Benjen the Sweet and Benjen the Bitter, King Edrick Snowbeard. Their 
faces were stern and strong, and some of them had done terrible things, but 
they were Starks every one, and Bran knew all their tales. He had never feared 
the crypts; they were part of his home and who he was, and he had always known 
that one day he would lie here too.
But now he was not so certain. If I go up, will I ever come back down? 
Where will I go when I die?
“Wait,” Osha said when they reached the twisting stone stairs that led up to 
the surface, and down to the deeper levels where kings more ancient still sat 
their dark thrones. She handed Meera the torch. “I’ll grope my way up.” For a 
time they could hear the sound of her footfalls, but they grew softer and 
softer until

they faded away entirely. “Hodor,” said Hodor nervously.
Bran had told himself a hundred times how much he hated hiding down here in the 
dark, how much he wanted to see the sun again, to ride his horse through wind 
and rain. But now that the moment was upon him, he was afraid. He’d felt safe 
in the darkness; when you could not even find your own hand in front of your 
face, it was easy to believe that no enemies could ever find you either. And 
the stone lords had given him courage. Even when he could not see them, he had 
known they were there.
It seemed a long while before they heard anything again. Bran had begun to fear 
that something had happened to Osha. His brother was squirming restlessly. “I 
want to go home!” he said loudly. Hodor bobbed his head and said, 
“Hodor.” Then they heard the footsteps again, growing louder, and after a few 
minutes Osha emerged into the light, looking grim. “Something is blocking the 
door. I can’t move it.”
“Hodor can move anything,” said Bran.
Osha gave the huge stableboy an appraising look. “Might be he can. Come on, 
then.”
The steps were narrow, so they had to climb in single file. Osha led. Behind 
came Hodor, with Bran crouched low on his back so his head wouldn’t hit the 
ceiling. Meera followed with the torch, and Jojen brought up the rear, leading 
Rickon by the hand. Around and around they went, and up and up. Bran thought he 
could smell smoke now, but perhaps that was only the torch.
The door to the crypts was made of ironwood. It was old and

heavy, and lay at a slant to the ground. Only one person could approach it at a 
time. Osha tried once more when she reached it, but Bran could see that it was 
not budging. “Let Hodor try.”
They had to pull Bran from his basket first, so he would not get squished. 
Meera squatted beside him on the steps, one arm thrown protectively across his 
shoulders, as Osha and Hodor traded places. “Open the door, Hodor,” Bran 
said.
The huge stableboy put both hands flat on the door, pushed, and grunted. 
“Hodor?” He slammed a fist against the wood, and it did not so much as jump. 
“Hodor.”
“Use your back,” urged Bran. “And your legs.”
Turning, Hodor put his back to the wood and shoved. Again. Again. “Hodor!” He 
put one foot on a higher step so he was bent under the slant of the door and 
tried to rise. This time the wood groaned and creaked. “Hodor!” The 
other foot came up a step, and Hodor spread his legs apart, braced, and 
straightened. His face turned red, and Bran could see cords in his neck bulging 
as he strained against the weight above him. “Hodor hodor hodor hodor 
hodor HODOR!” From above came a dull rumble. Then suddenly the door 
jerked upward and a shaft of daylight fell across Bran’s face, blinding him for 
a moment. Another shove brought the sound of shifting stone, and then the way 
was open. Osha poked her spear through and slid out after it, and Rickon 
squirmed through Meera’s legs to follow. Hodor shoved the door 
open all the way and stepped to the surface. The Reeds had to carry Bran up the 
last few steps.The sky was a pale grey, and smoke eddied all around them. They stood in 
the shadow of the First Keep, or what remained of it. One whole side of the 
building had torn loose and fallen away. Stone and shattered gargoyles lay 
strewn across the yard. They fell just where I did, Bran thought when 
he saw them. Some of the gargoyles had broken into so many pieces it made him 
wonder how he was alive at all. Nearby some crows were pecking at a body 
crushed beneath the tumbled stone, but he lay facedown and Bran could not say 
who he was.
The First Keep had not been used for many hundreds of years, but now it was 
more of a shell than ever. The floors had burned inside it, and all the beams. 
Where the wall had fallen away, they could see right into the rooms, even into 
the privy. Yet behind, the broken tower still stood, no more burned than 
before. Jojen Reed was coughing from the smoke. “Take me home!” Rickon 
demanded. “I want to be home!” Hodor stomped in a circle. 
“Hodor,” he whimpered in a small voice. They stood huddled together with ruin 
and death all around them.
“We made noise enough to wake a dragon,” Osha said, “but there’s no one 
come. The castle’s dead and burned, just as Bran dreamed, but we had 
best—” She broke off suddenly at a noise behind them, and whirled with 
her spear at the ready.
Two lean dark shapes emerged from behind the broken tower, padding slowly 
through the rubble. Rickon gave a happy shout of “Shaggy!” and the 
black direwolf came bounding toward him. Summer advanced more slowly, rubbed 
his head up against Bran’s arm, and

licked his face.
“We should go,” said Jojen. “So much death will bring other wolves besides
Summer and Shaggydog, and not all on four feet.”
“Aye, soon enough,” Osha agreed, “but we need food, and there may be some 
survived this. Stay together. Meera, keep your shield up and guard our 
backs.”
It took the rest of the morning to make a slow circuit of the castle. The great 
granite walls remained, blackened here and there by fire but otherwise 
untouched. But within, all was death and destruction. The doors of the Great 
Hall were charred and smoldering, and inside the rafters had given way and the 
whole roof had crashed down onto the floor. The green and yellow panes of the 
glass gardens were all in shards, the trees and fruits and flowers torn up or 
left exposed to die. Of the stables, made of wood and thatch, nothing remained 
but ashes, embers, and dead horses. Bran thought of his Dancer, and wanted to 
weep. There was a shallow steaming lake beneath the Library Tower, and hot 
water gushing from a crack in its side. The bridge between the Bell Tower and 
the rookery had collapsed into the yard below, and Maester Luwin’s turret was 
gone. They saw a dull red glow shining up through the narrow cellar windows 
beneath the Great Keep, and a second fire still burning in one of the 
storehouses.
Osha called softly through the blowing smoke as they went, but no one answered. 
They saw one dog worrying at a corpse, but he ran when he caught the scents of 
the direwolves; the rest had been slain in the kennels.
The maester’s ravens 
were paying court

to some of the corpses, while the crows from the broken tower attended others. 
Bran recognized Poxy Tym, even though someone had taken an axe to his face. One 
charred corpse, outside the ashen shell of Mother’s sept, sat with his arms 
drawn up and his hands balled into hard black fists, as if to punch anyone who 
dared approach him. “If the gods are good,” Osha said in a low angry voice, 
“the Others will take them that did this work.”
“It was Theon,” Bran said blackly.
“No. Look.” She pointed across the yard with her spear. “That’s one of his 
ironmen. And there. And that’s Greyjoy’s warhorse, see? The black one with the 
arrows in him.” She moved among the dead, frowning. “And here’s Black 
Lorren.” He had been hacked and cut so badly that his beard looked a 
reddish-brown now. “Took a few with him, he did.” Osha turned over one of the 
other corpses with her foot. “There’s a badge. A little man, all 
red.”
“The flayed man of the Dreadfort,” said Bran.
Summer howled, and darted away.
“The godswood.” Meera Reed ran after the direwolf, her shield and frog spear 
to hand. The rest of them trailed after, threading their way through smoke and 
fallen stones. The air was sweeter under the trees. A few pines along the edge 
of the wood had been scorched, but deeper in the damp soil and green wood had 
defeated the flames. “There is a power in living wood,” said Jojen Reed, 
almost as if he knew what Bran was thinking, “a power strong as 
fire.”
On the edge of the black pool, beneath the shelter of the

heart tree, Maester Luwin lay on his belly in the dirt. A trail of blood 
twisted back through damp leaves where he had crawled. Summer stood 
over him, and Bran thought he was dead at first, but when Meera touched his 
throat, the maester moaned. “Hodor?” Hodor said mournfully. 
“Hodor?”
Gently, they eased Luwin onto his back. He had grey eyes and grey hair, and 
once his robes had been grey as well, but they were darker now where the blood 
had soaked through. “Bran,” he said softly when he saw him sitting tall on 
Hodor’s back. “And Rickon too.” He smiled. “The gods are good. I 
knew . . .”
“Knew?” said Bran uncertainly.
“The legs, I could tell . . . the clothes fit, but the muscles 
in his legs . . . poor lad . . .” He coughed, and 
blood came up from inside him. “You vanished . . . in the 
woods . . . how, though?”
“We never went,” said Bran. “Well, only to the edge, and then doubled back. 
I sent the wolves on to make a trail, but we hid in Father’s tomb.”
“The crypts.” Luwin chuckled, a froth of blood on his lips. When the maester 
tried to move, he gave a sharp gasp of pain.
Tears filled Bran’s eyes. When a man was hurt you took him to the maester, but 
what could you do when your maester was hurt?
“We’ll need to make a litter to carry him,” said Osha.
“No use,” said Luwin. “I’m dying, woman.”
“You can’t,” said Rickon angrily. “No you can’t.” Beside him, 
Shaggydog bared his teeth and growled.
The maester smiled. “Hush now, child, I’m much older than

you. I can . . . die as I please.”
“Hodor, down,” said Bran. Hodor went to his knees beside the 
maester.
“Listen,” Luwin said to Osha, “the princes . . . Robb’s 
heirs. Not . . . not together . . . do you 
hear?”
The wildling woman leaned on her spear. “Aye. Safer apart. But where to take 
them? I’d thought, might be these Cerwyns . . .”
Maester Luwin shook his head, though it was plain to see what the effort cost 
him. “Cerwyn boy’s dead. Ser Rodrik, Leobald Tallhart, Lady 
Hornwood . . . all slain. Deepwood fallen, Moat Cailin, soon 
Torrhen’s Square. Ironmen on the Stony Shore. And east, the Bastard of 
Bolton.”
“Then where?” asked Osha.
“White Harbor . . . the Umbers . . . I do not 
know . . . war everywhere . . . each man 
against his neighbor, and winter coming . . . such folly, such 
black mad folly . . .” Maester Luwin reached up and grasped Bran’s 
forearm, his fingers closing with a desperate strength. “You must be strong 
now. Strong.”
“I will be,” Bran said, though it was hard. Ser Rodrik killed and 
Maester Luwin, everyone, everyone . . .
“Good,” the maester said. “A good boy. Your . . . your 
father’s son, Bran. Now go.”
Osha gazed up at the weirwood, at the red face carved in the pale trunk. “And 
leave you for the gods?”
“I beg . . .” The maester swallowed. 
“. . . a . . . a drink of water, 
and . . . another boon. If you would . . .”“Aye.” She turned to Meera. “Take the boys.”
Jojen and Meera led Rickon out between them. Hodor followed. Low branches 
whipped at Bran’s face as they pushed between the trees, and the leaves brushed 
away his tears. Osha joined them in the yard a few moments later. She said no 
word of Maester Luwin. “Hodor must stay with Bran, to be his legs,” the 
wildling woman said briskly. “I will take 
Rickon with me.”
“We’ll go with Bran,” said Jojen Reed.
“Aye, I thought you might,” said Osha. “Believe I’ll try the East Gate, and 
follow the kingsroad a ways.”
“We’ll take the Hunter’s Gate,” said Meera.
“Hodor,” said Hodor.
They stopped at the kitchens first. Osha found some loaves of burned bread that 
were still edible, and even a cold roast fowl that she ripped in half. Meera 
unearthed a crock of honey and a big sack of apples. Outside, they made their 
farewells. Rickon sobbed and clung to Hodor’s leg until Osha gave him a smack 
with the butt end of her spear. Then he followed her quick enough. Shaggydog 
stalked after them. The last Bran saw of them was the direwolf’s tail as it 
vanished behind the broken tower.
The iron portcullis that closed the Hunter’s Gate had been warped so badly by 
heat it could not be raised more than a foot. They had to squeeze beneath its 
spikes, one by one.
“Will we go to your lord father?” Bran asked as they crossed the drawbridge 
between the walls. “To Greywater Watch?”Meera looked to her brother for the answer. “Our road is north,” Jojen 
announced.
At the edge of the wolfswood, Bran turned in his basket for one last glimpse of 
the castle that had been his life. Wisps of smoke still rose into the grey sky, 
but no more than might have risen from Winterfell’s chimneys on a cold autumn 
afternoon. Soot stains marked some of the arrow loops, and here and there a 
crack or a missing merlon could be seen in the curtain wall, but it seemed 
little enough from this distance. Beyond, the tops of the keeps and towers 
still stood as they had for hundreds of years, and it was hard to tell that the 
castle had been sacked and burned at all. The stone is strong, Bran 
told himself, the roots of the trees go deep, and under the ground the 
Kings of Winter sit their thrones. So long as those remained, Winterfell 
remained. It was not dead, just broken. Like me, he thought. I’m 
not dead either.

The ridge slanted sharply from the earth, a long fold of stone and soil shaped like a claw. Trees clung to its lower slopes, pines and hawthorn and ash, but higher up the ground was bare, the ridgeline stark against the cloudy sky.
He could feel the high stone calling him. Up he went, loping easy at first, then faster and higher, his strong legs eating up the incline. Birds burst from the branches overhead as he raced by, clawing and flapping their way into the sky. He could hear the wind sighing up amongst the leaves, the squirrels chittering to one another, even the sound a pinecone made as it tumbled to the forest floor. The smells were a song around him, a song that filled the good green world.
Gravel flew from beneath his paws as he gained the last few feet to stand upon the crest. The sun hung above the tall pines huge and red, and below him the trees and hills went on and on as far as he could see or smell. A kite was circling far above, dark against the pink sky.
Prince. The man-sound came into his head suddenly, yet he could feel the rightness of it. Prince of the green, prince of the wolfswood. He was strong and swift and fierce, and all that lived in the good green world went in fear of him.
Far below, at the base of the woods, something moved amongst the trees. A flash of grey, quick-glimpsed and gone again, but it was enough to make his ears prick up. Down there beside a swift green brook, another form slipped by, running. Wolves, he knew. His little cousins, chasing down some prey. Now the prince could see more of them, shadows on fleet grey paws. A pack.
He had a pack as well, once. Five they had been, and a sixth who stood aside. Somewhere down inside him were the sounds the men had given them to tell one from the other, but it was not by their sounds he knew them. He remembered their scents, his brothers and his sisters. They all had smelled alike, had smelled of pack, but each was different too.
His angry brother with the hot green eyes was near, the prince felt, though he had not seen him for many hunts. Yet with every sun that set he grew more distant, and he had been the last. The others were far scattered, like leaves blown by the wild wind.
Sometimes he could sense them, though, as if they were still with him, only hidden from his sight by a boulder or a stand of trees. He could not smell them, nor hear their howls by night, yet he felt their presence at his back . . . all but the sister they had lost. His tail drooped when he remembered her. Four now, not five. Four and one more, the white who has no voice.
These woods belonged to them, the snowy slopes and stony hills, the great green pines and the golden leaf oaks, the rushing streams and blue lakes fringed with fingers of white frost. But his sister had left the wilds, to walk in the halls of man-rock where other hunters ruled, and once within those halls it was hard to find the path back out. The wolf prince remembered.
The wind shifted suddenly.
Deer, and fear, and blood. The scent of prey woke the hunger in him. The prince sniffed the air again, turning, and then he was off, bounding along the ridgetop with jaws half-parted. The far side of the ridge was steeper than the one he’d come up, but he flew surefoot over stones and roots and rotting leaves, down the slope and through the trees, long strides eating up the ground. The scent pulled him onward, ever faster.
The deer was down and dying when he reached her, ringed by eight of his small grey cousins. The heads of the pack had begun to feed, the male first and then his female, taking turns tearing flesh from the red underbelly of their prey. The others waited patiently, all but the tail, who paced in a wary circle a few strides from the rest, his own tail tucked low. He would eat the last of all, whatever his brothers left him.
The prince was downwind, so they did not sense him until he leapt up upon a fallen log six strides from where they fed. The tail saw him first, gave a piteous whine, and slunk away. His pack brothers turned at the sound and bared their teeth, snarling, all but the head male and female.
The direwolf answered the snarls with a low warning growl and showed them his own teeth. He was bigger than his cousins, twice the size of the scrawny tail, half again as large as the two pack heads. He leapt down into their midst, and three of them broke, melting away into the brush. Another came at him, teeth snapping. He met the attack head on, caught the wolf’s leg in his jaws when they met, and flung him aside yelping and limping.
And then there was only the head wolf to face, the great grey male with his bloody muzzle fresh from the prey’s soft belly. There was white on his muzzle as well, to mark him as an old wolf, but when his mouth opened, red slaver ran from his teeth.
He has no fear, the prince thought, no more than me. It would be a good fight. They went for each other.
Long they fought, rolling together over roots and stones and fallen leaves and the scattered entrails of the prey, tearing at each other with tooth and claw, breaking apart, circling each round the other, and bolting in to fight again. The prince was larger, and much the stronger, but his cousin had a pack. The female prowled around them closely, snuffing and snarling, and would interpose herself whenever her mate broke off bloodied. From time to time the other wolves would dart in as well, to snap at a leg or an ear when the prince was turned the other way. One angered him so much that he whirled in a black fury and tore out the attacker’s throat. After that the others kept their distance.
And as the last red light was filtering through green boughs and golden, the old wolf lay down weary in the dirt, and rolled over to expose his throat and belly. It was submission.
The prince sniffed at him and licked the blood from fur and torn flesh. When the old wolf gave a soft whimper, the direwolf turned away. He was very hungry now, and the prey was his.
“Hodor.”
The sudden sound made him stop and snarl. The wolves regarded him with green and yellow eyes, bright with the last light of day. None of them had heard it. It was a queer wind that blew only in his ears. He buried his jaws in the deer’s belly and tore off a mouthful of flesh.
“Hodor, hodor.”
No, he thought. No, I won’t. It was a boy’s thought, not a direwolf’s. The woods were darkening all about him, until only the shadows of the trees remained, and the glow of his cousins’ eyes. And through those and behind those eyes, he saw a big man’s grinning face, and a stone vault whose walls were spotted with niter. The rich warm taste of blood faded on his tongue. No, don’t, don’t, I want to eat, I want to, I want . . . 
“Hodor, hodor, hodor, hodor, hodor,” Hodor chanted as he shook him softly by the shoulders, back and forth and back and forth. He was trying to be gentle, he always tried, but Hodor was seven feet tall and stronger than he knew, and his huge hands rattled Bran’s teeth together. “NO!” he shouted angrily. “Hodor, leave off, I’m here, I’m here.”
Hodor stopped, looking abashed. “Hodor?”
The woods and wolves were gone. Bran was back again, down in the damp vault of some ancient watchtower that must have been abandoned thousands of years before. It wasn’t much of a tower now. Even the tumbled stones were so overgrown with moss and ivy that you could hardly see them until you were right on top of them. “Tumbledown Tower,” Bran had named the place; it was Meera who found the way down into the vault, however.
“You were gone too long.” Jojen Reed was thirteen, only four years older than Bran. Jojen wasn’t much bigger either, no more than two inches or maybe three, but he had a solemn way of talking that made him seem older and wiser than he really was. At Winterfell, Old Nan had dubbed him “little grandfather.”
Bran frowned at him. “I wanted to eat.”
“Meera will be back soon with supper.”
“I’m sick of frogs.” Meera was a frogeater from the Neck, so Bran couldn’t really blame her for catching so many frogs, he supposed, but even so . . . “I wanted to eat the deer.” For a moment he remembered the taste of it, the blood and the raw rich meat, and his mouth watered. I won the fight for it. I won.
“Did you mark the trees?”
Bran flushed. Jojen was always telling him to do things when he opened his third eye and put on Summer’s skin. To claw the bark of a tree, to catch a rabbit and bring it back in his jaws uneaten, to push some rocks in a line. Stupid things. “I forgot,” he said.
“You always forget.”
It was true. He meant to do the things that Jojen asked, but once he was a wolf they never seemed important. There were always things to see and things to smell, a whole green world to hunt. And he could run! There was nothing better than running, unless it was running after prey. “I was a prince, Jojen,” he told the older boy. “I was the prince of the woods.”
“You are a prince,” Jojen reminded him softly. “You remember, don’t you? Tell me who you are.”
“You know.” Jojen was his friend and his teacher, but sometimes Bran just wanted to hit him.
“I want you to say the words. Tell me who you are.”
“Bran,” he said sullenly. Bran the Broken. “Brandon Stark.” The cripple boy. “The Prince of Winterfell.” Of Winterfell burned and tumbled, its people scattered and slain. The glass gardens were smashed, and hot water gushed from the cracked walls to steam beneath the sun. How can you be the prince of someplace you might never see again?
“And who is Summer?” Jojen prompted.
“My direwolf.” He smiled. “Prince of the green.”
“Bran the boy and Summer the wolf. You are two, then?”
“Two,” he sighed, “and one.” He hated Jojen when he got stupid like this. At Winterfell he wanted me to dream my wolf dreams, and now that I know how he’s always calling me back.
“Remember that, Bran. Remember yourself, or the wolf will consume you. When you join, it is not enough to run and hunt and howl in Summer’s skin.”
It is for me, Bran thought. He liked Summer’s skin better than his own. What good is it to be a skinchanger if you can’t wear the skin you like?
“Will you remember? And next time, mark the tree. Any tree, it doesn’t matter, so long as you do it.”
“I will. I’ll remember. I could go back and do it now, if you like. I won’t forget this time.” But I’ll eat my deer first, and fight with those little wolves some more.
Jojen shook his head. “No. Best stay, and eat. With your own mouth. A warg cannot live on what his beast consumes.”
How would you know? Bran thought resentfully. You’ve never been a warg, you don’t know what it’s like.
Hodor jerked suddenly to his feet, almost hitting his head on the barrel-vaulted ceiling. “HODOR!” he shouted, rushing to the door. Meera pushed it open just before he reached it, and stepped through into their refuge. “Hodor, hodor,” the huge stableboy said, grinning.
Meera Reed was sixteen, a woman grown, but she stood no higher than her brother. All the crannogmen were small, she told Bran once when he asked why she wasn’t taller. Brown-haired, green-eyed, and flat as a boy, she walked with a supple grace that Bran could only watch and envy. Meera wore a long sharp dagger, but her favorite way to fight was with a slender three-pronged frog spear in one hand and a woven net in the other.
“Who’s hungry?” she asked, holding up her catch: two small silvery trout and six fat green frogs.
“I am,” said Bran. But not for frogs. Back at Winterfell before all the bad things had happened, the Walders used to say that eating frogs would turn your teeth green and make moss grow under your arms. He wondered if the Walders were dead. He hadn’t seen their corpses at Winterfell . . . but there had been a lot of corpses, and they hadn’t looked inside the buildings.
“We’ll just have to feed you, then. Will you help me clean the catch, Bran?”
He nodded. It was hard to sulk with Meera. She was much more cheerful than her brother, and always seemed to know how to make him smile. Nothing ever scared her or made her angry. Well, except Jojen, sometimes . . . Jojen Reed could scare most anyone. He dressed all in green, his eyes were murky as moss, and he had green dreams. What Jojen dreamed came true. Except he dreamed me dead, and I’m not. Only he was, in a way.
Jojen sent Hodor out for wood and built them a small fire while Bran and Meera were cleaning the fish and frogs. They used Meera’s helm for a cooking pot, chopping up the catch into little cubes and tossing in some water and some wild onions Hodor had found to make a froggy stew. It wasn’t as good as deer, but it wasn’t bad either, Bran decided as he ate. “Thank you, Meera,” he said. “My lady.”
“You are most welcome, Your Grace.”
“Come the morrow,” Jojen announced, “we had best move on.”
Bran could see Meera tense. “Have you had a green dream?”
“No,” he admitted.
“Why leave, then?” his sister demanded. “Tumbledown Tower’s a good place for us. No villages near, the woods are full of game, there’s fish and frogs in the streams and lakes . . . and who is ever going to find us here?”
“This is not the place we are meant to be.”
“It is safe, though.”
“It seems safe, I know,” said Jojen, “but for how long? There was a battle at Winterfell, we saw the dead. Battles mean wars. If some army should take us unawares . . .”
“It might be Robb’s army,” said Bran. “Robb will come back from the south soon, I know he will. He’ll come back with all his banners and chase the ironmen away.”
“Your maester said naught of Robb when he lay dying,” Jojen reminded him. “Ironmen on the Stony Shore, he said, and, east, the Bastard of Bolton. Moat Cailin and Deepwood Motte fallen, the heir to Cerwyn dead, and the castellan of Torrhen’s Square. War everywhere, he said, each man against his neighbor.”
“We have plowed this field before,” his sister said. “You want to make for the Wall, and your three-eyed crow. That’s well and good, but the Wall is a very long way and Bran has no legs but Hodor. If we were mounted . . .”
“If we were eagles we might fly,” said Jojen sharply, “but we have no wings, no more than we have horses.”
“There are horses to be had,” said Meera. “Even in the deep of the wolfswood there are foresters, crofters, hunters. Some will have horses.”
“And if they do, should we steal them? Are we thieves? The last thing we need is men hunting us.”
“We could buy them,” she said. “Trade for them.”
“Look at us, Meera. A crippled boy with a direwolf, a simpleminded giant, and two crannogmen a thousand leagues from the Neck. We will be known. And word will spread. So long as Bran remains dead, he is safe. Alive, he becomes prey for those who want him dead for good and true.” Jojen went to the fire to prod the embers with a stick. “Somewhere to the north, the three-eyed crow awaits us. Bran has need of a teacher wiser than me.”
“How, Jojen?” his sister asked. “How?”
“Afoot,” he answered. “A step at a time.”
“The road from Greywater to Winterfell went on forever, and we were mounted then. You want us to travel a longer road on foot, without even knowing where it ends. Beyond the Wall, you say. I haven’t been there, no more than you, but I know that Beyond the Wall’s a big place, Jojen. Are there many three-eyed crows, or only one? How do we find him?”
“Perhaps he will find us.”
Before Meera could find a reply to that, they heard the sound; the distant howl of a wolf, drifting through the night. “Summer?” asked Jojen, listening.
“No.” Bran knew the voice of his direwolf.
“Are you certain?” said the little grandfather.
“Certain.” Summer had wandered far afield today, and would not be back till dawn. Maybe Jojen dreams green, but he can’t tell a wolf from a direwolf. He wondered why they all listened to Jojen so much. He was not a prince like Bran, nor big and strong like Hodor, nor as good a hunter as Meera, yet somehow it was always Jojen telling them what to do. “We should steal horses like Meera wants,” Bran said, “and ride to the Umbers up at Last Hearth.” He thought a moment. “Or we could steal a boat and sail down the White Knife to White Harbor town. That fat Lord Manderly rules there, he was friendly at the harvest feast. He wanted to build ships. Maybe he built some, and we could sail to Riverrun and bring Robb home with all his army. Then it wouldn’t matter who knew I was alive. Robb wouldn’t let anyone hurt us.”
“Hodor!” burped Hodor. “Hodor, hodor.”
He was the only one who liked Bran’s plan, though. Meera just smiled at him and Jojen frowned. They never listened to what he wanted, even though Bran was a Stark and a prince besides, and the Reeds of the Neck were Stark bannermen.
“Hoooodor,” said Hodor, swaying. “Hooooooodor, hoooooodor, hoDOR, hoDOR, hoDOR.” Sometimes he liked to do this, just saying his name different ways, over and over and over. Other times, he would stay so quiet you forgot he was there. There was never any knowing with Hodor. “HODOR, HODOR, HODOR!” he shouted.
He is not going to stop, Bran realized. “Hodor,” he said, “why don’t you go outside and train with your sword?”
The stableboy had forgotten about his sword, but now he remembered. “Hodor!” he burped. He went for his blade. They had three tomb swords taken from the crypts of Winterfell where Bran and his brother Rickon had hidden from Theon Greyjoy’s ironmen. Bran claimed his uncle Brandon’s sword, Meera the one she found upon the knees of his grandfather Lord Rickard. Hodor’s blade was much older, a huge heavy piece of iron, dull from centuries of neglect and well spotted with rust. He could swing it for hours at a time. There was a rotted tree near the tumbled stones that he had hacked half to pieces.
Even when he went outside they could hear him through the walls, bellowing “HODOR!” as he cut and slashed at his tree. Thankfully the wolfswood was huge, and there was not like to be anyone else around to hear.
“Jojen, what did you mean about a teacher?” Bran asked. “You’re my teacher. I know I never marked the tree, but I will the next time. My third eye is open like you wanted . . .”
“So wide open that I fear you may fall through it, and live all the rest of your days as a wolf of the woods.”
“I won’t, I promise.”
“The boy promises. Will the wolf remember? You run with Summer, you hunt with him, kill with him . . . but you bend to his will more than him to yours.”
“I just forget,” Bran complained. “I’m only nine. I’ll be better when I’m older. Even Florian the Fool and Prince Aemon the Dragonknight weren’t great knights when they were nine.”
“That is true,” said Jojen, “and a wise thing to say, if the days were still growing longer . . . but they aren’t. You are a summer child, I know. Tell me the words of House Stark.”
“Winter is coming.” Just saying it made Bran feel cold.
Jojen gave a solemn nod. “I dreamed of a winged wolf bound to earth by chains of stone, and came to Winterfell to free him. The chains are off you now, yet still you do not fly.”
“Then you teach me.” Bran still feared the three-eyed crow who haunted his dreams sometimes, pecking endlessly at the skin between his eyes and telling him to fly. “You’re a greenseer.”
“No,” said Jojen, “only a boy who dreams. The greenseers were more than that. They were wargs as well, as you are, and the greatest of them could wear the skins of any beast that flies or swims or crawls, and could look through the eyes of the weirwoods as well, and see the truth that lies beneath the world.
“The gods give many gifts, Bran. My sister is a hunter. It is given to her to run swiftly, and stand so still she seems to vanish. She has sharp ears, keen eyes, a steady hand with net and spear. She can breathe mud and fly through trees. I could not do these things, no more than you could. To me the gods gave the green dreams, and to you . . . you could be more than me, Bran. You are the winged wolf, and there is no saying how far and high you might fly . . . if you had someone to teach you. How can I help you master a gift I do not understand? We remember the First Men in the Neck, and the children of the forest who were their friends . . . but so much is forgotten, and so much we never knew.”
Meera took Bran by the hand. “If we stay here, troubling no one, you’ll be safe until the war ends. You will not learn, though, except what my brother can teach you, and you’ve heard what he says. If we leave this place to seek refuge at Last Hearth or beyond the Wall, we risk being taken. You are only a boy, I know, but you are our prince as well, our lord’s son and our king’s true heir. We have sworn you our faith by earth and water, bronze and iron, ice and fire. The risk is yours, Bran, as is the gift. The choice should be yours too, I think. We are your servants to command.” She grinned. “At least in this.”
“You mean,” Bran said, “you’ll do what I say? Truly?”
“Truly, my prince,” the girl replied, “so consider well.”
Bran tried to think it through, the way his father might have. The Greatjon’s uncles Hother Whoresbane and Mors Crowfood were fierce men, but he thought they would be loyal. And the Karstarks, them too. Karhold was a strong castle, Father always said. We would be safe with the Umbers or the Karstarks.
Or they could go south to fat Lord Manderly. At Winterfell, he’d laughed a lot, and never seemed to look at Bran with so much pity as the other lords. Castle Cerwyn was closer than White Harbor, but Maester Luwin had said that Cley Cerwyn was dead. The Umbers and the Karstarks and the Manderlys may all be dead as well, he realized. As he would be, if he was caught by the ironmen or the Bastard of Bolton.
If they stayed here, hidden down beneath Tumbledown Tower, no one would find them. He would stay alive. And crippled.
Bran realized he was crying. Stupid baby, he thought at himself. No matter where he went, to Karhold or White Harbor or Greywater Watch, he’d be a cripple when he got there. He balled his hands into fists. “I want to fly,” he told them. “Please. Take me to the crow.”

No roads ran through the twisted mountain valleys where they walked now. Between the grey stone peaks lay still blue lakes, long and deep and narrow, and the green gloom of endless piney woods. The russet and gold of autumn leaves grew less common when they left the wolfswood to climb amongst the old flint hills, and vanished by the time those hills had turned to mountains. Giant grey-green sentinels loomed above them now, and spruce and fir and soldier pines in endless profusion. The undergrowth was sparse beneath them, the forest floor carpeted in dark green needles.
When they lost their way, as happened once or twice, they need only wait for a clear cold night when the clouds did not intrude, and look up in the sky for the Ice Dragon. The blue star in the dragon’s eye pointed the way north, as Osha told him once. Thinking of Osha made Bran wonder where she was. He pictured her safe in White Harbor with Rickon and Shaggydog, eating eels and fish and hot crab pie with fat Lord Manderly. Or maybe they were warming themselves at the Last Hearth before the Greatjon’s fires. But Bran’s life had turned into endless chilly days on Hodor’s back, riding his basket up and down the slopes of mountains.
“Up and down,” Meera would sigh sometimes as they walked, “then down and up. Then up and down again. I hate these stupid mountains of yours, Prince Bran.”
“Yesterday you said you loved them.”
“Oh, I do. My lord father told me about mountains, but I never saw one till now. I love them more than I can say.”
Bran made a face at her. “But you just said you hated them.”
“Why can’t it be both?” Meera reached up to pinch his nose.
“Because they’re different,” he insisted. “Like night and day, or ice and fire.”
“If ice can burn,” said Jojen in his solemn voice, “then love and hate can mate. Mountain or marsh, it makes no matter. The land is one.”
“One,” his sister agreed, “but over wrinkled.”
The high glens seldom did them the courtesy of running north and south, so often they found themselves going long leagues in the wrong direction, and sometimes they were forced to double back the way they’d come. “If we took the kingsroad we could be at the Wall by now,” Bran would remind the Reeds. He wanted to find the three-eyed crow, so he could learn to fly. Half a hundred times he said it if he said it once, until Meera started teasing by saying it along with him.
“If we took the kingsroad we wouldn’t be so hungry either,” he started saying then. Down in the hills they’d had no lack of food. Meera was a fine huntress, and even better at taking fish from streams with her three-pronged frog spear. Bran liked to watch her, admiring her quickness, the way she sent the spear lancing down and pulled it back with a silvery trout wriggling on the end of it. And they had Summer hunting for them as well. The direwolf vanished most every night as the sun went down, but he was always back again before dawn, most often with something in his jaws, a squirrel or a hare.
But here in the mountains, the streams were smaller and more icy, and the game scarcer. Meera still hunted and fished when she could, but it was harder, and some nights even Summer found no prey. Often they went to sleep with empty bellies.
But Jojen remained stubbornly determined to stay well away from roads. “Where you find roads you find travelers,” he said in that way he had, “and travelers have eyes to see, and mouths to spread tales of the crippled boy, his giant, and the wolf that walks beside them.” No one could get as stubborn as Jojen, so they struggled on through the wild, and every day climbed a little higher, and moved a little farther north.
Some days it rained, some days were windy, and once they were caught in a sleet storm so fierce that even Hodor bellowed in dismay. On the clear days, it often seemed as if they were the only living things in all the world. “Does no one live up here?” Meera Reed asked once, as they made their way around a granite upthrust as large as Winterfell.
“There’s people,” Bran told her. “The Umbers are mostly east of the kingsroad, but they graze their sheep in the high meadows in summer. There are Wulls west of the mountains along the Bay of Ice, Harclays back behind us in the hills, and Knotts and Liddles and Norreys and even some Flints up here in the high places.” His father’s mother’s mother had been a Flint of the mountains. Old Nan once said that it was her blood in him that made Bran such a fool for climbing before his fall. She had died years and years and years before he was born, though, even before his father had been born.
“Wull?” said Meera. “Jojen, wasn’t there a Wull who rode with Father during the war?”
“Theo Wull.” Jojen was breathing hard from the climb. “Buckets, they used to call him.”
“That’s their sigil,” said Bran. “Three brown buckets on a blue field, with a border of white and grey checks. Lord Wull came to Winterfell once, to do his fealty and talk with Father, and he had the buckets on his shield. He’s no true lord, though. Well, he is, but they call him just the Wull, and there’s the Knott and the Norrey and the Liddle too. At Winterfell we called them lords, but their own folk don’t.”
Jojen Reed stopped to catch his breath. “Do you think these mountain folk know we’re here?”
“They know.” Bran had seen them watching; not with his own eyes, but with Summer’s sharper ones, that missed so little. “They won’t bother us so long as we don’t try and make off with their goats or horses.”
Nor did they. Only once did they encounter any of the mountain people, when a sudden burst of freezing rain sent them looking for shelter. Summer found it for them, sniffing out a shallow cave behind the grey-green branches of a towering sentinel tree, but when Hodor ducked beneath the stony overhang, Bran saw the orange glow of fire farther back and realized they were not alone. “Come in and warm yourselves,” a man’s voice called out. “There’s stone enough to keep the rain off all our heads.”
He offered them oatcakes and blood sausage and a swallow of ale from a skin he carried, but never his name; nor did he ask theirs. Bran figured him for a Liddle. The clasp that fastened his squirrelskin cloak was gold and bronze and wrought in the shape of a pinecone, and the Liddles bore pinecones on the white half of their green-and-white shields.
“Is it far to the Wall?” Bran asked him as they waited for the rain to stop.
“Not so far as the raven flies,” said the Liddle, if that was who he was. “Farther, for them as lacks wings.”
Bran started, “I’d bet we’d be there if . . .”
“. . . we took the kingsroad,” Meera finished with him.
The Liddle took out a knife and whittled at a stick. “When there was a Stark in Winterfell, a maiden girl could walk the kingsroad in her name-day gown and still go unmolested, and travelers could find fire, bread, and salt at many an inn and holdfast. But the nights are colder now, and doors are closed. There’s squids in the wolfswood, and flayed men ride the kingsroad asking after strangers.”
The Reeds exchanged a look. “Flayed men?” said Jojen.
“The Bastard’s boys, aye. He was dead, but now he’s not. And paying good silver for wolfskins, a man hears, and maybe gold for word of certain other walking dead.” He looked at Bran when he said that, and at Summer stretched out beside him. “As to that Wall,” the man went on, “it’s not a place that I’d be going. The Old Bear took the Watch into the haunted woods, and all that come back was his ravens, with hardly a message between them. Dark wings, dark words, me mother used to say, but when the birds fly silent, seems to me that’s even darker.” He poked at the fire with his stick. “It was different when there was a Stark in Winterfell. But the old wolf’s dead and young one’s gone south to play the game of thrones, and all that’s left us is the ghosts.”
“The wolves will come again,” said Jojen solemnly.
“And how would you be knowing, boy?”
“I dreamed it.”
“Some nights I dream of me mother that I buried nine years past,” the man said, “but when I wake, she’s not come back to us.”
“There are dreams and dreams, my lord.”
“Hodor,” said Hodor.
They spent that night together, for the rain did not let up till well past dark, and only Summer seemed to want to leave the cave. When the fire had burned down to embers, Bran let him go. The direwolf did not feel the damp as people did, and the night was calling him. Moonlight painted the wet woods in shades of silver and turned the grey peaks white. Owls hooted through the dark and flew silently between the pines, while pale goats moved along the mountainsides. Bran closed his eyes and gave himself up to the wolf dream, to the smells and sounds of midnight.
When they woke the next morning, the fire had gone out and the Liddle was gone, but he’d left a sausage for them, and a dozen oatcakes folded up neatly in a green and white cloth. Some of the cakes had pinenuts baked in them and some had blackberries. Bran ate one of each, and still did not know which sort he liked the best. One day there would be Starks in Winterfell again, he told himself, and then he’d send for the Liddles and pay them back a hundredfold for every nut and berry.
The trail they followed was a little easier that day, and by noon the sun came breaking through the clouds. Bran sat in his basket up on Hodor’s back and felt almost content. He dozed off once, lulled to sleep by the smooth swing of the big stableboy’s stride and the soft humming sound he made sometimes when he walked. Meera woke him up with a light touch on his arm. “Look,” she said, pointing at the sky with her frog spear, “an eagle.”
Bran lifted his head and saw it, its grey wings spread and still as it floated on the wind. He followed it with his eyes as it circled higher, wondering what it would be like to soar about the world so effortless. Better than climbing, even. He tried to reach the eagle, to leave his stupid crippled body and rise into the sky to join it, the way he joined with Summer. The greenseers could do it. I should be able to do it too. He tried and tried, until the eagle vanished in the golden haze of the afternoon. “It’s gone,” he said, disappointed.
“We’ll see others,” said Meera. “They live up here.”
“I suppose.”
“Hodor,” said Hodor.
“Hodor,” Bran agreed.
Jojen kicked a pinecone. “Hodor likes it when you say his name, I think.”
“Hodor’s not his true name,” Bran explained. “It’s just some word he says. His real name is Walder, Old Nan told me. She was his grandmother’s grandmother or something.” Talking about Old Nan made him sad. “Do you think the ironmen killed her?” They hadn’t seen her body at Winterfell. He didn’t remember seeing any women dead, now that he thought back. “She never hurt no one, not even Theon. She just told stories. Theon wouldn’t hurt someone like that. Would he?”
“Some people hurt others just because they can,” said Jojen.
“And it wasn’t Theon who did the killing at Winterfell,” said Meera. “Too many of the dead were ironmen.” She shifted her frog spear to her other hand. “Remember Old Nan’s stories, Bran. Remember the way she told them, the sound of her voice. So long as you do that, part of her will always be alive in you.”
“I’ll remember,” he promised. They climbed without speaking for a long time, following a crooked game trail over the high saddle between two stony peaks. Scrawny soldier pines clung to the slopes around them. Far ahead Bran could see the icy glitter of a stream where it tumbled down a mountainside. He found himself listening to Jojen’s breathing and the crunch of pine needles under Hodor’s feet. “Do you know any stories?” he asked the Reeds all of a sudden.
Meera laughed. “Oh, a few.”
“A few,” her brother admitted.
“Hodor,” said Hodor, humming.
“You could tell one,” said Bran. “While we walked. Hodor likes stories about knights. I do, too.”
“There are no knights in the Neck,” said Jojen.
“Above the water,” his sister corrected. “The bogs are full of dead ones, though.”
“That’s true,” said Jojen. “Andals and ironmen, Freys and other fools, all those proud warriors who set out to conquer Greywater. Not one of them could find it. They ride into the Neck, but not back out. And sooner or later they blunder into the bogs and sink beneath the weight of all that steel and drown there in their armor.”
The thought of drowned knights under the water gave Bran the shivers. He didn’t object, though; he liked the shivers.
“There was one knight,” said Meera, “in the year of the false spring. The Knight of the Laughing Tree, they called him. He might have been a crannogman, that one.”
“Or not.” Jojen’s face was dappled with green shadows. “Prince Bran has heard that tale a hundred times, I’m sure.”
“No,” said Bran. “I haven’t. And if I have it doesn’t matter. Sometimes Old Nan would tell the same story she’d told before, but we never minded, if it was a good story. Old stories are like old friends, she used to say. You have to visit them from time to time.”
“That’s true.” Meera walked with her shield on her back, pushing an occasional branch out of the way with her frog spear. Just when Bran began to think that she wasn’t going to tell the story after all, she began, “Once there was a curious lad who lived in the Neck. He was small like all crannogmen, but brave and smart and strong as well. He grew up hunting and fishing and climbing trees, and learned all the magics of my people.”
Bran was almost certain he had never heard this story. “Did he have green dreams like Jojen?”
“No,” said Meera, “but he could breathe mud and run on leaves, and change earth to water and water to earth with no more than a whispered word. He could talk to trees and weave words and make castles appear and disappear.”
“I wish I could,” Bran said plaintively. “When does he meet the tree knight?”
Meera made a face at him. “Sooner if a certain prince would be quiet.”
“I was just asking.”
“The lad knew the magics of the crannogs,” she continued, “but he wanted more. Our people seldom travel far from home, you know. We’re a small folk, and our ways seem queer to some, so the big people do not always treat us kindly. But this lad was bolder than most, and one day when he had grown to manhood he decided he would leave the crannogs and visit the Isle of Faces.”
“No one visits the Isle of Faces,” objected Bran. “That’s where the green men live.”
“It was the green men he meant to find. So he donned a shirt sewn with bronze scales, like mine, took up a leathern shield and a three-pronged spear, like mine, and paddled a little skin boat down the Green Fork.”
Bran closed his eyes to try and see the man in his little skin boat. In his head, the crannogman looked like Jojen, only older and stronger and dressed like Meera.
“He passed beneath the Twins by night so the Freys would not attack him, and when he reached the Trident he climbed from the river and put his boat on his head and began to walk. It took him many a day, but finally he reached the Gods Eye, threw his boat in the lake, and paddled out to the Isle of Faces.”
“Did he meet the green men?”
“Yes,” said Meera, “but that’s another story, and not for me to tell. My prince asked for knights.”
“Green men are good too.”
“They are,” she agreed, but said no more about them. “All that winter the crannogman stayed on the isle, but when the spring broke he heard the wide world calling and knew the time had come to leave. His skin boat was just where he’d left it, so he said his farewells and paddled off toward shore. He rowed and rowed, and finally saw the distant towers of a castle rising beside the lake. The towers reached ever higher as he neared shore, until he realized that this must be the greatest castle in all the world.”
“Harrenhal!” Bran knew at once. “It was Harrenhal!”
Meera smiled. “Was it? Beneath its walls he saw tents of many colors, bright banners cracking in the wind, and knights in mail and plate on barded horses. He smelled roasting meats, and heard the sound of laughter and the blare of heralds’ trumpets. A great tourney was about to commence, and champions from all over the land had come to contest it. The king himself was there, with his son the dragon prince. The White Swords had come, to welcome a new brother to their ranks. The storm lord was on hand, and the rose lord as well. The great lion of the rock had quarreled with the king and stayed away, but many of his bannermen and knights attended all the same. The crannogman had never seen such pageantry, and knew he might never see the like again. Part of him wanted nothing so much as to be part of it.”
Bran knew that feeling well enough. When he’d been little, all he had ever dreamed of was being a knight. But that had been before he fell and lost his legs.
“The daughter of the great castle reigned as queen of love and beauty when the tourney opened. Five champions had sworn to defend her crown; her four brothers of Harrenhal, and her famous uncle, a white knight of the Kingsguard.”
“Was she a fair maid?”
“She was,” said Meera, hopping over a stone, “but there were others fairer still. One was the wife of the dragon prince, who’d brought a dozen lady companions to attend her. The knights all begged them for favors to tie about their lances.”
“This isn’t going to be one of those love stories, is it?” Bran asked suspiciously. “Hodor doesn’t like those so much.”
“Hodor,” said Hodor agreeably.
“He likes the stories where the knights fight monsters.”
“Sometimes the knights are the monsters, Bran. The little crannogman was walking across the field, enjoying the warm spring day and harming none, when he was set upon by three squires. They were none older than fifteen, yet even so they were bigger than him, all three. This was their world, as they saw it, and he had no right to be there. They snatched away his spear and knocked him to the ground, cursing him for a frogeater.”
“Were they Walders?” It sounded like something Little Walder Frey might have done.
“None offered a name, but he marked their faces well so he could revenge himself upon them later. They shoved him down every time he tried to rise, and kicked him when he curled up on the ground. But then they heard a roar. ‘That’s my father’s man you’re kicking,’ howled the she-wolf.”
“A wolf on four legs, or two?”
“Two,” said Meera. “The she-wolf laid into the squires with a tourney sword, scattering them all. The crannogman was bruised and bloodied, so she took him back to her lair to clean his cuts and bind them up with linen. There he met her pack brothers: the wild wolf who led them, the quiet wolf beside him, and the pup who was youngest of the four.
“That evening there was to be a feast in Harrenhal, to mark the opening of the tourney, and the she-wolf insisted that the lad attend. He was of high birth, with as much a right to a place on the bench as any other man. She was not easy to refuse, this wolf maid, so he let the young pup find him garb suitable to a king’s feast, and went up to the great castle.
“Under Harren’s roof he ate and drank with the wolves, and many of their sworn swords besides, barrowdown men and moose and bears and mermen. The dragon prince sang a song so sad it made the wolf maid sniffle, but when her pup brother teased her for crying she poured wine over his head. A black brother spoke, asking the knights to join the Night’s Watch. The storm lord drank down the knight of skulls and kisses in a wine-cup war. The crannogman saw a maid with laughing purple eyes dance with a white sword, a red snake, and the lord of griffins, and lastly with the quiet wolf . . . but only after the wild wolf spoke to her on behalf of a brother too shy to leave his bench.
“Amidst all this merriment, the little crannogman spied the three squires who’d attacked him. One served a pitchfork knight, one a porcupine, while the last attended a knight with two towers on his surcoat, a sigil all crannogmen know well.”
“The Freys,” said Bran. “The Freys of the Crossing.”
“Then, as now,” she agreed. “The wolf maid saw them too, and pointed them out to her brothers. ‘I could find you a horse, and some armor that might fit,’ the pup offered. The little crannogman thanked him, but gave no answer. His heart was torn. Crannogmen are smaller than most, but just as proud. The lad was no knight, no more than any of his people. We sit a boat more often than a horse, and our hands are made for oars, not lances. Much as he wished to have his vengeance, he feared he would only make a fool of himself and shame his people. The quiet wolf had offered the little crannogman a place in his tent that night, but before he slept he knelt on the lakeshore, looking across the water to where the Isle of Faces would be, and said a prayer to the old gods of north and Neck . . .”
“You never heard this tale from your father?” asked Jojen.
“It was Old Nan who told the stories. Meera, go on, you can’t stop there.”
Hodor must have felt the same. “Hodor,” he said, and then, “Hodor hodor hodor hodor.”
“Well,” said Meera, “if you would hear the rest . . .”
“Yes. Tell it.”
“Five days of jousting were planned,” she said. “There was a great seven-sided mêlée as well, and archery and axe-throwing, a horse race and tourney of singers . . .”
“Never mind about all that.” Bran squirmed impatiently in his basket on Hodor’s back. “Tell about the jousting.”
“As my prince commands. The daughter of the castle was the queen of love and beauty, with four brothers and an uncle to defend her, but all four sons of Harrenhal were defeated on the first day. Their conquerors reigned briefly as champions, until they were vanquished in turn. As it happened, the end of the first day saw the porcupine knight win a place among the champions, and on the morning of the second day the pitchfork knight and the knight of the two towers were victorious as well. But late on the afternoon of that second day, as the shadows grew long, a mystery knight appeared in the lists.”
Bran nodded sagely. Mystery knights would oft appear at tourneys, with helms concealing their faces, and shields that were either blank or bore some strange device. Sometimes they were famous champions in disguise. The Dragonknight once won a tourney as the Knight of Tears, so he could name his sister the queen of love and beauty in place of the king’s mistress. And Barristan the Bold twice donned a mystery knight’s armor, the first time when he was only ten. “It was the little crannogman, I bet.”
“No one knew,” said Meera, “but the mystery knight was short of stature, and clad in ill-fitting armor made up of bits and pieces. The device upon his shield was a heart tree of the old gods, a white weirwood with a laughing red face.”
“Maybe he came from the Isle of Faces,” said Bran. “Was he green?” In Old Nan’s stories, the guardians had dark green skin and leaves instead of hair. Sometimes they had antlers too, but Bran didn’t see how the mystery knight could have worn a helm if he had antlers. “I bet the old gods sent him.”
“Perhaps they did. The mystery knight dipped his lance before the king and rode to the end of the lists, where the five champions had their pavilions. You know the three he challenged.”
“The porcupine knight, the pitchfork knight, and the knight of the twin towers.” Bran had heard enough stories to know that. “He was the little crannogman, I told you.”
“Whoever he was, the old gods gave strength to his arm. The porcupine knight fell first, then the pitchfork knight, and lastly the knight of the two towers. None were well loved, so the common folk cheered lustily for the Knight of the Laughing Tree, as the new champion soon was called. When his fallen foes sought to ransom horse and armor, the Knight of the Laughing Tree spoke in a booming voice through his helm, saying, ‘Teach your squires honor, that shall be ransom enough.’ Once the defeated knights chastised their squires sharply, their horses and armor were returned. And so the little crannogman’s prayer was answered . . . by the green men, or the old gods, or the children of the forest, who can say?”
It was a good story, Bran decided after thinking about it a moment or two. “Then what happened? Did the Knight of the Laughing Tree win the tourney and marry a princess?”
“No,” said Meera. “That night at the great castle, the storm lord and the knight of skulls and kisses each swore they would unmask him, and the king himself urged men to challenge him, declaring that the face behind that helm was no friend of his. But the next morning, when the heralds blew their trumpets and the king took his seat, only two champions appeared. The Knight of the Laughing Tree had vanished. The king was wroth, and even sent his son the dragon prince to seek the man, but all they ever found was his painted shield, hanging abandoned in a tree. It was the dragon prince who won that tourney in the end.”
“Oh.” Bran thought about the tale awhile. “That was a good story. But it should have been the three bad knights who hurt him, not their squires. Then the little crannogman could have killed them all. The part about the ransoms was stupid. And the mystery knight should win the tourney, defeating every challenger, and name the wolf maid the queen of love and beauty.”
“She was,” said Meera, “but that’s a sadder story.”
“Are you certain you never heard this tale before, Bran?” asked Jojen. “Your lord father never told it to you?”
Bran shook his head. The day was growing old by then, and long shadows were creeping down the mountainsides to send black fingers through the pines. If the little crannogman could visit the Isle of Faces, maybe I could too. All the tales agreed that the green men had strange magic powers. Maybe they could help him walk again, even turn him into a knight. They turned the little crannogman into a knight, even if it was only for a day, he thought. A day would be enough.

The tower stood upon an island, its twin reflected on the still blue waters. When the wind blew, ripples moved across the surface of the lake, chasing one another like boys at play. Oak trees grew thick along the lakeshore, a dense stand of them with a litter of fallen acorns on the ground beneath. Beyond them was the village, or what remained of it.
It was the first village they had seen since leaving the foothills. Meera had scouted ahead to make certain there was no one lurking amongst the ruins. Sliding in and amongst oaks and apple trees with her net and spear in hand, she startled three red deer and sent them bounding away through the brush. Summer saw the flash of motion and was after them at once. Bran watched the direwolf lope off, and for a moment wanted nothing so much as to slip his skin and run with him, but Meera was waving for them to come ahead. Reluctantly, he turned away from Summer and urged Hodor on, into the village. Jojen walked with them.
The ground from here to the Wall was grasslands, Bran knew; fallow fields and low rolling hills, high meadows and lowland bogs. It would be much easier going than the mountains behind, but so much open space made Meera uneasy. “I feel naked,” she confessed. “There’s no place to hide.”
“Who holds this land?” Jojen asked Bran.
“The Night’s Watch,” he answered. “This is the Gift. The New Gift, and north of that Brandon’s Gift.” Maester Luwin had taught him the history. “Brandon the Builder gave all the land south of the Wall to the black brothers, to a distance of twenty-five leagues. For their . . . for their sustenance and support.” He was proud that he still remembered that part. “Some maesters say it was some other Brandon, not the Builder, but it’s still Brandon’s Gift. Thousands of years later, Good Queen Alysanne visited the Wall on her dragon Silverwing, and she thought the Night’s Watch was so brave that she had the Old King double the size of their lands, to fifty leagues. So that was the New Gift.” He waved a hand. “Here. All this.”
No one had lived in the village for long years, Bran could see. All the houses were falling down. Even the inn. It had never been much of an inn, to look at it, but now all that remained was a stone chimney and two cracked walls, set amongst a dozen apple trees. One was growing up through the common room, where a layer of wet brown leaves and rotting apples carpeted the floor. The air was thick with the smell of them, a cloying cidery scent that was almost overwhelming. Meera stabbed a few apples with her frog spear, trying to find some still good enough to eat, but they were all too brown and wormy.
It was a peaceful spot, still and tranquil and lovely to behold, but Bran thought there was something sad about an empty inn, and Hodor seemed to feel it too. “Hodor?” he said in a confused sort of way. “Hodor? Hodor?”
“This is good land.” Jojen picked up a handful of dirt, rubbing it between his fingers. “A village, an inn, a stout holdfast in the lake, all these apple trees . . . but where are the people, Bran? Why would they leave such a place?”
“They were afraid of the wildlings,” said Bran. “Wildlings come over the Wall or through the mountains, to raid and steal and carry off women. If they catch you, they make your skull into a cup to drink blood, Old Nan used to say. The Night’s Watch isn’t so strong as it was in Brandon’s day or Queen Alysanne’s, so more get through. The places nearest the Wall got raided so much the smallfolk moved south, into the mountains or onto the Umber lands east of the kingsroad. The Greatjon’s people get raided too, but not so much as the people who used to live in the Gift.”
Jojen Reed turned his head slowly, listening to music only he could hear. “We need to shelter here. There’s a storm coming. A bad one.”
Bran looked up at the sky. It had been a beautiful crisp clear autumn day, sunny and almost warm, but there were dark clouds off to the west now, that was true, and the wind seemed to be picking up. “There’s no roof on the inn and only the two walls,” he pointed out. “We should go out to the holdfast.”
“Hodor,” said Hodor. Maybe he agreed.
“We have no boat, Bran.” Meera poked through the leaves idly with her frog spear.
“There’s a causeway. A stone causeway, hidden under the water. We could walk out.” They could, anyway; he would have to ride on Hodor’s back, but at least he’d stay dry that way.
The Reeds exchanged a look. “How do you know that?” asked Jojen. “Have you been here before, my prince?”
“No. Old Nan told me. The holdfast has a golden crown, see?” He pointed across the lake. You could see patches of flaking gold paint up around the crenellations. “Queen Alysanne slept there, so they painted the merlons gold in her honor.”
“A causeway?” Jojen studied the lake. “You are certain?”
“Certain,” said Bran.
Meera found the foot of it easily enough, once she knew to look; a stone pathway three feet wide, leading right out into the lake. She took them out step by careful step, probing ahead with her frog spear. They could see where the path emerged again, climbing from the water onto the island and turning into a short flight of stone steps that led to the holdfast door.
Path, steps, and door were in a straight line, which made you think the causeway ran straight, but that wasn’t so. Under the lake it zigged and zagged, going a third of a way around the island before jagging back. The turns were treacherous, and the long path meant that anyone approaching would be exposed to arrow fire from the tower for a long time. The hidden stones were slimy and slippery too; twice Hodor almost lost his footing and shouted “HODOR!” in alarm before regaining his balance. The second time scared Bran badly. If Hodor fell into the lake with him in his basket, he could well drown, especially if the huge stableboy panicked and forgot that Bran was there, the way he did sometimes. Maybe we should have stayed at the inn, under the apple tree, he thought, but by then it was too late.
Thankfully there was no third time, and the water never got up past Hodor’s waist, though the Reeds were in it up to their chests. And before long they were on the island, climbing the steps to the holdfast. The door was still stout, though its heavy oak planks had warped over the years and it could no longer be closed completely. Meera shoved it open all the way, the rusted iron hinges screaming. The lintel was low. “Duck down, Hodor,” Bran said, and he did, but not enough to keep Bran from hitting his head. “That hurt,” he complained.
“Hodor,” said Hodor, straightening.
They found themselves in a gloomy strongroom, barely large enough to hold the four of them. Steps built into the inner wall of the tower curved away upward to their left, downward to their right, behind iron grates. Bran looked up and saw another grate just above his head. A murder hole. He was glad there was no one up there now to pour boiling oil down on them.
The grates were locked, but the iron bars were red with rust. Hodor grabbed hold of the lefthand door and gave it a pull, grunting with effort. Nothing happened. He tried pushing with no more success. He shook the bars, kicked, shoved against them and rattled them and punched the hinges with a huge hand until the air was filled with flakes of rust, but the iron door would not budge. The one down to the undervault was no more accommodating. “No way in,” said Meera, shrugging.
The murder hole was just above Bran’s head, as he sat in his basket on Hodor’s back. He reached up and grabbed the bars to give them a try. When he pulled down the grating came out of the ceiling in a cascade of rust and crumbling stone. “HODOR!” Hodor shouted. The heavy iron grate gave Bran another bang in the head, and crashed down near Jojen’s feet when he shoved it off of him. Meera laughed. “Look at that, my prince,” she said, “you’re stronger than Hodor.” Bran blushed.
With the grate gone, Hodor was able to boost Meera and Jojen up through the gaping murder hole. The crannogmen took Bran by the arms and drew him up after them. Getting Hodor inside was the hard part. He was too heavy for the Reeds to lift the way they’d lifted Bran. Finally Bran told him to go look for some big rocks. The island had no lack of those, and Hodor was able to pile them high enough to grab the crumbling edges of the hole and climb through. “Hodor,” he panted happily, grinning at all of them.
They found themselves in a maze of small cells, dark and empty, but Meera explored until she found the way back to the steps. The higher they climbed, the better the light; on the third story the thick outer wall was pierced by arrow slits, the fourth had actual windows, and the fifth and highest was one big round chamber with arched doors on three sides opening onto small stone balconies. On the fourth side was a privy chamber perched above a sewer chute that dropped straight down into the lake.
By the time they reached the roof the sky was completely overcast, and the clouds to the west were black. The wind was blowing so strong it lifted up Bran’s cloak and made it flap and snap. “Hodor,” Hodor said at the noise.
Meera spun in a circle. “I feel almost a giant, standing high above the world.”
“There are trees in the Neck that stand twice as tall as this,” her brother reminded her.
“Aye, but they have other trees around them just as high,” said Meera. “The world presses close in the Neck, and the sky is so much smaller. Here . . . feel that wind, Brother? And look how large the world has grown.”
It was true, you could see a long ways from up here. To the south the foothills rose, with the mountains grey and green beyond them. The rolling plains of the New Gift stretched away to all the other directions, as far as the eye could see. “I was hoping we could see the Wall from here,” said Bran, disappointed. “That was stupid, we must still be fifty leagues away.” Just speaking of it made him feel tired, and cold as well. “Jojen, what will we do when we reach the Wall? My uncle always said how big it was. Seven hundred feet high, and so thick at the base that the gates are more like tunnels through the ice. How are we going to get past to find the three-eyed crow?”
“There are abandoned castles along the Wall, I’ve heard,” Jojen answered. “Fortresses built by the Night’s Watch but now left empty. One of them may give us our way through.”
The ghost castles, Old Nan had called them. Maester Luwin had once made Bran learn the names of every one of the forts along the Wall. That had been hard; there were nineteen of them all told, though no more than seventeen had ever been manned at any one time. At the feast in honor of King Robert’s visit to Winterfell, Bran had recited the names for his uncle Benjen, east to west and then west to east. Benjen Stark had laughed and said, “You know them better than I do, Bran. Perhaps you should be First Ranger. I’ll stay here in your place.” That was before Bran fell, though. Before he was broken. By the time he’d woken crippled from his sleep, his uncle had gone back to Castle Black.
“My uncle said the gates were sealed with ice and stone whenever a castle had to be abandoned,” said Bran.
“Then we’ll have to open them again,” said Meera.
That made him uneasy. “We shouldn’t do that. Bad things might come through from the other side. We should just go to Castle Black and tell the Lord Commander to let us pass.”
“Your Grace,” said Jojen, “we must avoid Castle Black, just as we avoided the kingsroad. There are hundreds of men there.”
“Men of the Night’s Watch,” said Bran. “They say vows, to take no part in wars and stuff.”
“Aye,” said Jojen, “but one man willing to forswear himself would be enough to sell your secret to the ironmen or the Bastard of Bolton. And we cannot be certain that the Watch would agree to let us pass. They might decide to hold us or send us back.”
“But my father was a friend of the Night’s Watch, and my uncle is First Ranger. He might know where the three-eyed crow lives. And Jon’s at Castle Black too.” Bran had been hoping to see Jon again, and their uncle too. The last black brothers to visit Winterfell said that Benjen Stark had vanished on a ranging, but surely he would have made his way back by now. “I bet the Watch would even give us horses,” he went on.
“Quiet.” Jojen shaded his eyes with a hand and gazed off toward the setting sun. “Look. There’s something . . . a rider, I think. Do you see him?”
Bran shaded his eyes as well, and even so he had to squint. He saw nothing at first, till some movement made him turn. At first he thought it might be Summer, but no. A man on a horse. He was too far away to see much else.
“Hodor?” Hodor had put a hand over his eyes as well, only he was looking the wrong way. “Hodor?”
“He is in no haste,” said Meera, “but he’s making for this village, it seems to me.”
“We had best go inside, before we’re seen,” said Jojen.
“Summer’s near the village,” Bran objected.
“Summer will be fine,” Meera promised. “It’s only one man on a tired horse.”
A few fat wet drops began to patter against the stone as they retreated to the floor below. That was well timed; the rain began to fall in earnest a short time later. Even through the thick walls they could hear it lashing against the surface of the lake. They sat on the floor in the round empty room, amidst gathering gloom. The north-facing balcony looked out toward the abandoned village. Meera crept out on her belly to peer across the lake and see what had become of the horseman. “He’s taken shelter in the ruins of the inn,” she told them when she came back. “It looks as though he’s making a fire in the hearth.”
“I wish we could have a fire,” Bran said. “I’m cold. There’s broken furniture down the stairs, I saw it. We could have Hodor chop it up and get warm.”
Hodor liked that idea. “Hodor,” he said hopefully.
Jojen shook his head. “Fire means smoke. Smoke from this tower could be seen a long way off.”
“If there were anyone to see,” his sister argued.
“There’s a man in the village.”
“One man.”
“One man would be enough to betray Bran to his enemies, if he’s the wrong man. We still have half a duck from yesterday. We should eat and rest. Come morning the man will go on his way, and we will do the same.”
Jojen had his way; he always did. Meera divided the duck between the four of them. She’d caught it in her net the day before, as it tried to rise from the marsh where she’d surprised it. It wasn’t as tasty cold as it had been hot and crisp from the spit, but at least they did not go hungry. Bran and Meera shared the breast while Jojen ate the thigh. Hodor devoured the wing and leg, muttering “Hodor” and licking the grease off his fingers after every bite. It was Bran’s turn to tell a story, so he told them about another Brandon Stark, the one called Brandon the Shipwright, who had sailed off beyond the Sunset Sea.
Dusk was settling by the time duck and tale were done, and the rain still fell. Bran wondered how far Summer had roamed and whether he had caught one of the deer.
Grey gloom filled the tower, and slowly changed to darkness. Hodor grew restless and walked awhile, striding round and round the walls and stopping to peer into the privy on every circuit, as if he had forgotten what was in there. Jojen stood by the north balcony, hidden by the shadows, looking out at the night and the rain. Somewhere to the north a lightning bolt crackled across the sky, brightening the inside of the tower for an instant. Hodor jumped and made a frightened noise. Bran counted to eight, waiting for the thunder. When it came, Hodor shouted, “Hodor!”
I hope Summer isn’t scared too, Bran thought. The dogs in Winterfell’s kennels had always been spooked by thunderstorms, just like Hodor. I should go see, to calm him . . . 
The lightning flashed again, and this time the thunder came at six. “Hodor!” Hodor yelled again. “HODOR! HODOR!” He snatched up his sword, as if to fight the storm.
Jojen said, “Be quiet, Hodor. Bran, tell him not to shout. Can you get the sword away from him, Meera?”
“I can try.”
“Hodor, hush,” said Bran. “Be quiet now. No more stupid hodoring. Sit down.”
“Hodor?” He gave the longsword to Meera meekly enough, but his face was a mask of confusion.
Jojen turned back to the darkness, and they all heard him suck in his breath. “What is it?” Meera asked.
“Men in the village.”
“The man we saw before?”
“Other men. Armed. I saw an axe, and spears as well.” Jojen had never sounded so much like the boy he was. “I saw them when the lightning flashed, moving under the trees.”
“How many?”
“Many and more. Too many to count.”
“Mounted?”
“No.”
“Hodor.” Hodor sounded frightened. “Hodor. Hodor.”
Bran felt a little scared himself, though he didn’t want to say so in front of Meera. “What if they come out here?”
“They won’t.” She sat down beside him. “Why should they?”
“For shelter.” Jojen’s voice was grim. “Unless the storm lets up. Meera, could you go down and bar the door?”
“I couldn’t even close it. The wood’s too warped. They won’t get past those iron gates, though.”
“They might. They could break the lock, or the hinges. Or climb up through the murder hole as we did.”
Lightning slashed the sky, and Hodor whimpered. Then a clap of thunder rolled across the lake. “HODOR!” he roared, clapping his hands over his ears and stumbling in a circle through the darkness. “HODOR! HODOR! HODOR!”
“NO!” Bran shouted back. “NO HODORING!”
It did no good. “HOOOODOR!” moaned Hodor. Meera tried to catch him and calm him, but he was too strong. He flung her aside with no more than a shrug. “HOOOOOODOOOOOOOR!” the stableboy screamed as lightning filled the sky again, and even Jojen was shouting now, shouting at Bran and Meera to shut him up.
“Be quiet!” Bran said in a shrill scared voice, reaching up uselessly for Hodor’s leg as he crashed past, reaching, reaching.
Hodor staggered, and closed his mouth. He shook his head slowly from side to side, sank back to the floor, and sat crosslegged. When the thunder boomed, he scarcely seemed to hear it. The four of them sat in the dark tower, scarce daring to breathe.
“Bran, what did you do?” Meera whispered.
“Nothing.” Bran shook his head. “I don’t know.” But he did. I reached for him, the way I reach for Summer. He had been Hodor for half a heartbeat. It scared him.
“Something is happening across the lake,” said Jojen. “I thought I saw a man pointing at the tower.”
I won’t be afraid. He was the Prince of Winterfell, Eddard Stark’s son, almost a man grown and a warg too, not some little baby boy like Rickon. Summer would not be afraid. “Most like they’re just some Umbers,” he said. “Or they could be Knotts or Norreys or Flints come down from the mountains, or even brothers from the Night’s Watch. Were they wearing black cloaks, Jojen?”
“By night all cloaks are black, Your Grace. And the flash came and went too fast for me to tell what they were wearing.”
Meera was wary. “If they were black brothers, they’d be mounted, wouldn’t they?”
Bran had thought of something else. “It doesn’t matter,” he said confidently. “They couldn’t get out to us even if they wanted. Not unless they had a boat, or knew about the causeway.”
“The causeway!” Meera mussed Bran’s hair and kissed him on the forehead. “Our sweet prince! He’s right, Jojen, they won’t know about the causeway. Even if they did they could never find the way across at night in the rain.”
“The night will end, though. If they stay till morning . . .” Jojen left the rest unsaid. After a few moments he said, “They are feeding the fire the first man started.” Lightning crashed through the sky, and light filled the tower and etched them all in shadow. Hodor rocked back and forth, humming.
Bran could feel Summer’s fear in that bright instant. He closed two eyes and opened a third, and his boy’s skin slipped off him like a cloak as he left the tower behind . . . 
 . . . and found himself out in the rain, his belly full of deer, cringing in the brush as the sky broke and boomed above him. The smell of rotten apples and wet leaves almost drowned the scent of man, but it was there. He heard the clink and slither of hardskin, saw men moving under the trees. A man with a stick blundered by, a skin pulled up over his head to make him blind and deaf. The wolf went wide around him, behind a dripping thornbush and beneath the bare branches of an apple tree. He could hear them talking, and there beneath the scents of rain and leaves and horse came the sharp red stench of fear . . .

It is only another empty castle,” Meera Reed said as she gazed across the desolation of rubble, ruins, and weeds.
No, thought Bran, it is the Nightfort, and this is the end of the world. In the mountains, all he could think of was reaching the Wall and finding the three-eyed crow, but now that they were here he was filled with fears. The dream he’d had . . . the dream Summer had had . . . No, I mustn’t think about that dream. He had not even told the Reeds, though Meera at least seemed to sense that something was wrong. If he never talked of it maybe he could forget he ever dreamed it, and then it wouldn’t have happened and Robb and Grey Wind would still be . . . 
“Hodor.” Hodor shifted his weight, and Bran with it. He was tired. They had been walking for hours. At least he’s not afraid. Bran was scared of this place, and almost as scared of admitting it to the Reeds. I’m a prince of the north, a Stark of Winterfell, almost a man grown, I have to be as brave as Robb.
Jojen gazed up at him with his dark green eyes. “There’s nothing here to hurt us, Your Grace.”
Bran wasn’t so certain. The Nightfort had figured in some of Old Nan’s scariest stories. It was here that Night’s King had reigned, before his name was wiped from the memory of man. This was where the Rat Cook had served the Andal king his prince-and-bacon pie, where the seventy-nine sentinels stood their watch, where brave young Danny Flint had been raped and murdered. This was the castle where King Sherrit had called down his curse on the Andals of old, where the ’prentice boys had faced the thing that came in the night, where blind Symeon Star-Eyes had seen the hellhounds fighting. Mad Axe had once walked these yards and climbed these towers, butchering his brothers in the dark.
All that had happened hundreds and thousands of years ago, to be sure, and some maybe never happened at all. Maester Luwin always said that Old Nan’s stories shouldn’t be swallowed whole. But once his uncle came to see Father, and Bran asked about the Nightfort. Benjen Stark never said the tales were true, but he never said they weren’t; he only shrugged and said, “We left the Nightfort two hundred years ago,” as if that was an answer.
Bran forced himself to look around. The morning was cold but bright, the sun shining down from a hard blue sky, but he did not like the noises. The wind made a nervous whistling sound as it shivered through the broken towers, the keeps groaned and settled, and he could hear rats scrabbling under the floor of the great hall. The Rat Cook’s children running from their father. The yards were small forests where spindly trees rubbed their bare branches together and dead leaves scuttled like roaches across patches of old snow. There were trees growing where the stables had been, and a twisted white weirwood pushing up through the gaping hole in the roof of the domed kitchen. Even Summer was not at ease here. Bran slipped inside his skin, just for an instant, to get the smell of the place. He did not like that either.
And there was no way through.
Bran had told them there wouldn’t be. He had told them and told them, but Jojen Reed had insisted on seeing for himself. He had had a green dream, he said, and his green dreams did not lie. They don’t open any gates either, thought Bran.
The gate the Nightfort guarded had been sealed since the day the black brothers had loaded up their mules and garrons and departed for Deep Lake; its iron portcullis lowered, the chains that raised it carried off, the tunnel packed with stone and rubble all frozen together until they were as impenetrable as the Wall itself. “We should have followed Jon,” Bran said when he saw it. He thought of his bastard brother often, since the night that Summer had watched him ride off through the storm. “We should have found the kingsroad and gone to Castle Black.”
“We dare not, my prince,” Jojen said. “I’ve told you why.”
“But there are wildlings. They killed some man and they wanted to kill Jon too. Jojen, there were a hundred of them.”
“So you said. We are four. You helped your brother, if that was him in truth, but it almost cost you Summer.”
“I know,” said Bran miserably. The direwolf had killed three of them, maybe more, but there had been too many. When they formed a tight ring around the tall earless man, he had tried to slip away through the rain, but one of their arrows had come flashing after him, and the sudden stab of pain had driven Bran out of the wolf’s skin and back into his own. After the storm finally died, they had huddled in the dark without a fire, talking in whispers if they talked at all, listening to Hodor’s heavy breathing and wondering if the wildlings might try and cross the lake in the morning. Bran had reached out for Summer time and time again, but the pain he found drove him back, the way a red-hot kettle makes you pull your hand back even when you mean to grab it. Only Hodor slept that night, muttering “Hodor, hodor,” as he tossed and turned. Bran was terrified that Summer was off dying in the darkness. Please, you old gods, he prayed, you took Winterfell, and my father, and my legs, please don’t take Summer too. And watch over Jon Snow too, and make the wildlings go away.
No weirwoods grew on that stony island in the lake, yet somehow the old gods must have heard. The wildlings took their sweet time about departing the next morning, stripping the bodies of their dead and the old man they’d killed, even pulling a few fish from the lake, and there was a scary moment when three of them found the causeway and started to walk out . . . but the path turned and they didn’t, and two of them nearly drowned before the others pulled them out. The tall bald man yelled at them, his words echoing across the water in some tongue that even Jojen did not know, and a little while later they gathered up their shields and spears and marched off north by east, the same way Jon had gone. Bran wanted to leave too, to look for Summer, but the Reeds said no. “We will stay another night,” said Jojen, “put some leagues between us and the wildlings. You don’t want to meet them again, do you?” Late that afternoon Summer returned from wherever he’d been hiding, dragging his back leg. He ate parts of the bodies in the inn, driving off the crows, then swam out to the island. Meera had drawn the broken arrow from his leg and rubbed the wound with the juice of some plants she found growing around the base of the tower. The direwolf was still limping, but a little less each day, it seemed to Bran. The gods had heard.
“Maybe we should try another castle,” Meera said to her brother. “Maybe we could get through the gate somewhere else. I could go scout if you wanted, I’d make better time by myself.”
Bran shook his head. “If you go east there’s Deep Lake, then Queensgate. West is Icemark. But they’ll be the same, only smaller. All the gates are sealed except the ones at Castle Black, Eastwatch, and the Shadow Tower.”
Hodor said, “Hodor,” to that, and the Reeds exchanged a look. “At least I should climb to the top of the Wall,” Meera decided. “Maybe I’ll see something up there.”
“What could you hope to see?” Jojen asked.
“Something,” said Meera, and for once she was adamant.
It should be me. Bran raised his head to look up at the Wall, and imagined himself climbing inch by inch, squirming his fingers into cracks in the ice and kicking footholds with his toes. That made him smile in spite of everything, the dreams and the wildlings and Jon and everything. He had climbed the walls of Winterfell when he was little, and all the towers too, but none of them had been so high, and they were only stone. The Wall could look like stone, all grey and pitted, but then the clouds would break and the sun would hit it differently, and all at once it would transform, and stand there white and blue and glittering. It was the end of the world, Old Nan always said. On the other side were monsters and giants and ghouls, but they could not pass so long as the Wall stood strong. I want to stand on top with Meera, Bran thought. I want to stand on top and see.
But he was a broken boy with useless legs, so all he could do was watch from below as Meera went up in his stead.
She wasn’t really climbing, the way he used to climb. She was only walking up some steps that the Night’s Watch had hewn hundreds and thousands of years ago. He remembered Maester Luwin saying the Nightfort was the only castle where the steps had been cut from the ice of the Wall itself. Or maybe it had been Uncle Benjen. The newer castles had wooden steps, or stone ones, or long ramps of earth and gravel. Ice is too treacherous. It was his uncle who’d told him that. He said that the outer surface of the Wall wept icy tears sometimes, though the core inside stayed frozen hard as rock. The steps must have melted and refrozen a thousand times since the last black brothers left the castle, and every time they did they shrunk a little and got smoother and rounder and more treacherous.
And smaller. It’s almost like the Wall was swallowing them back into itself. Meera Reed was very surefooted, but even so she was going slowly, moving from nub to nub. In two places where the steps were hardly there at all she got down on all fours. It will be worse when she comes down, Bran thought, watching. Even so, he wished it was him up there. When she reached the top, crawling up the icy knobs that were all that remained of the highest steps, Meera vanished from his sight.
“When will she come down?” Bran asked Jojen.
“When she is ready. She will want to have a good look . . . at the Wall and what’s beyond. We should do the same down here.”
“Hodor?” said Hodor, doubtfully.
“We might find something,” Jojen insisted.
Or something might find us. Bran couldn’t say it, though; he did not want Jojen to think he was craven.
So they went exploring, Jojen Reed leading, Bran in his basket on Hodor’s back, Summer padding by their side. Once the direwolf bolted through a dark door and returned a moment later with a grey rat between his teeth. The Rat Cook, Bran thought, but it was the wrong color, and only as big as a cat. The Rat Cook was white, and almost as huge as a sow . . . 
There were a lot of dark doors in the Nightfort, and a lot of rats. Bran could hear them scurrying through the vaults and cellars, and the maze of pitch-black tunnels that connected them. Jojen wanted to go poking around down there, but Hodor said “Hodor” to that, and Bran said “No.” There were worse things than rats down in the dark beneath the Nightfort.
“This seems an old place,” Jojen said as they walked down a gallery where the sunlight fell in dusty shafts through empty windows.
“Twice as old as Castle Black,” Bran said, remembering. “It was the first castle on the Wall, and the largest.” But it had also been the first abandoned, all the way back in the time of the Old King. Even then it had been three-quarters empty and too costly to maintain. Good Queen Alysanne had suggested that the Watch replace it with a smaller, newer castle at a spot only seven miles east, where the Wall curved along the shore of a beautiful green lake. Deep Lake had been paid for by the queen’s jewels and built by the men the Old King had sent north, and the black brothers had abandoned the Nightfort to the rats.
That was two centuries past, though. Now Deep Lake stood as empty as the castle it had replaced, and the Nightfort . . . 
“There are ghosts here,” Bran said. Hodor had heard all the stories before, but Jojen might not have. “Old ghosts, from before the Old King, even before Aegon the Dragon, seventy-nine deserters who went south to be outlaws. One was Lord Ryswell’s youngest son, so when they reached the barrowlands they sought shelter at his castle, but Lord Ryswell took them captive and returned them to the Nightfort. The Lord Commander had holes hewn in the top of the Wall and he put the deserters in them and sealed them up alive in the ice. They have spears and horns and they all face north. The seventy-nine sentinels, they’re called. They left their posts in life, so in death their watch goes on forever. Years later, when Lord Ryswell was old and dying, he had himself carried to the Nightfort so he could take the black and stand beside his son. He’d sent him back to the Wall for honor’s sake, but he loved him still, so he came to share his watch.”
They spent half the day poking through the castle. Some of the towers had fallen down and others looked unsafe, but they climbed the bell tower (the bells were gone) and the rookery (the birds were gone). Beneath the brewhouse they found a vault of huge oaken casks that boomed hollowly when Hodor knocked on them. They found a library (the shelves and bins had collapsed, the books were gone, and rats were everywhere). They found a dank and dim-lit dungeon with cells enough to hold five hundred captives, but when Bran grabbed hold of one of the rusted bars it broke off in his hand. Only one crumbling wall remained of the great hall, the bathhouse seemed to be sinking into the ground, and a huge thornbush had conquered the practice yard outside the armory where black brothers had once labored with spear and shield and sword. The armory and the forge still stood, however, though cobwebs, rats, and dust had taken the places of blades, bellows, and anvil. Sometimes Summer would hear sounds that Bran seemed deaf to, or bare his teeth at nothing, the fur on the back of his neck bristling . . . but the Rat Cook never put in an appearance, nor the seventy-nine sentinels, nor Mad Axe. Bran was much relieved. Maybe it is only a ruined empty castle.
By the time Meera returned, the sun was only a sword’s breath above the western hills. “What did you see?” her brother Jojen asked her.
“I saw the haunted forest,” she said in a wistful tone. “Hills rising wild as far as the eye can see, covered with trees that no axe has ever touched. I saw the sunlight glinting off a lake, and clouds sweeping in from the west. I saw patches of old snow, and icicles long as pikes. I even saw an eagle circling. I think he saw me too. I waved at him.”
“Did you see a way down?” asked Jojen.
She shook her head. “No. It’s a sheer drop, and the ice is so smooth . . . I might be able to make the descent if I had a good rope and an axe to chop out handholds, but . . .”
“. . . but not us,” Jojen finished.
“No,” his sister agreed. “Are you sure this is the place you saw in your dream? Maybe we have the wrong castle.”
“No. This is the castle. There is a gate here.”
Yes, thought Bran, but it’s blocked by stone and ice.
As the sun began to set the shadows of the towers lengthened and the wind blew harder, sending gusts of dry dead leaves rattling through the yards. The gathering gloom put Bran in mind of another of Old Nan’s stories, the tale of Night’s King. He had been the thirteenth man to lead the Night’s Watch, she said; a warrior who knew no fear. “And that was the fault in him,” she would add, “for all men must know fear.” A woman was his downfall; a woman glimpsed from atop the Wall, with skin as white as the moon and eyes like blue stars. Fearing nothing, he chased her and caught her and loved her, though her skin was cold as ice, and when he gave his seed to her he gave his soul as well.
He brought her back to the Nightfort and proclaimed her a queen and himself her king, and with strange sorceries he bound his Sworn Brothers to his will. For thirteen years they had ruled, Night’s King and his corpse queen, till finally the Stark of Winterfell and Joramun of the wildlings had joined to free the Watch from bondage. After his fall, when it was found he had been sacrificing to the Others, all records of Night’s King had been destroyed, his very name forbidden.
“Some say he was a Bolton,” Old Nan would always end. “Some say a Magnar out of Skagos, some say Umber, Flint, or Norrey. Some would have you think he was a Woodfoot, from them who ruled Bear Island before the ironmen came. He never was. He was a Stark, the brother of the man who brought him down.” She always pinched Bran on the nose then, he would never forget it. “He was a Stark of Winterfell, and who can say? Mayhaps his name was Brandon. Mayhaps he slept in this very bed in this very room.”
No, Bran thought, but he walked in this castle, where we’ll sleep tonight. He did not like that notion very much at all. Night’s King was only a man by light of day, Old Nan would always say, but the night was his to rule. And it’s getting dark.
The Reeds decided that they would sleep in the kitchens, a stone octagon with a broken dome. It looked to offer better shelter than most of the other buildings, even though a crooked weirwood had burst up through the slate floor beside the huge central well, stretching slantwise toward the hole in the roof, its bone-white branches reaching for the sun. It was a queer kind of tree, skinnier than any other weirwood that Bran had ever seen and faceless as well, but it made him feel as if the old gods were with him here, at least.
That was the only thing he liked about the kitchens, though. The roof was mostly there, so they’d be dry if it rained again, but he didn’t think they would ever get warm here. You could feel the cold seeping up through the slate floor. Bran did not like the shadows either, or the huge brick ovens that surrounded them like open mouths, or the rusted meat hooks, or the scars and stains he saw in the butcher’s block along one wall. That was where the Rat Cook chopped the prince to pieces, he knew, and he baked the pie in one of these ovens.
The well was the thing he liked the least, though. It was a good twelve feet across, all stone, with steps built into its side, circling down and down into darkness. The walls were damp and covered with niter, but none of them could see the water at the bottom, not even Meera with her sharp hunter’s eyes. “Maybe it doesn’t have a bottom,” Bran said uncertainly.
Hodor peered over the knee-high lip of the well and said, “HODOR!” The word echoed down the well, “Hodorhodorhodorhodor,” fainter and fainter, “hodorhodorhodorhodor,” until it was less than a whisper. Hodor looked startled. Then he laughed, and bent to scoop a broken piece of slate off the floor.
“Hodor, don’t!” said Bran, but too late. Hodor tossed the slate over the edge. “You shouldn’t have done that. You don’t know what’s down there. You might have hurt something, or . . . or woken something up.”
Hodor looked at him innocently. “Hodor?”
Far, far, far below, they heard the sound as the stone found water. It wasn’t a splash, not truly. It was more a gulp, as if whatever was below had opened a quivering gelid mouth to swallow Hodor’s stone. Faint echoes traveled up the well, and for a moment Bran thought he heard something moving, thrashing about in the water. “Maybe we shouldn’t stay here,” he said uneasily.
“By the well?” asked Meera. “Or in the Nightfort?”
“Yes,” said Bran.
She laughed, and sent Hodor out to gather wood. Summer went too. It was almost dark by then, and the direwolf wanted to hunt.
Hodor returned alone with both arms full of deadwood and broken branches. Jojen Reed took his flint and knife and set about lighting a fire while Meera boned the fish she’d caught at the last stream they’d crossed. Bran wondered how many years had passed since there had last been a supper cooked in the kitchens of the Nightfort. He wondered who had cooked it too, though maybe it was better not to know.
When the flames were blazing nicely Meera put the fish on. At least it’s not a meat pie. The Rat Cook had cooked the son of the Andal king in a big pie with onions, carrots, mushrooms, lots of pepper and salt, a rasher of bacon, and a dark red Dornish wine. Then he served him to his father, who praised the taste and had a second slice. Afterward the gods transformed the cook into a monstrous white rat who could only eat his own young. He had roamed the Nightfort ever since, devouring his children, but still his hunger was not sated. “It was not for murder that the gods cursed him,” Old Nan said, “nor for serving the Andal king his son in a pie. A man has a right to vengeance. But he slew a guest beneath his roof, and that the gods cannot forgive.”
“We should sleep,” Jojen said solemnly, after they were full. The fire was burning low. He stirred it with a stick. “Perhaps I’ll have another green dream to show us the way.”
Hodor was already curled up and snoring lightly. From time to time he thrashed beneath his cloak, and whimpered something that might have been “Hodor.” Bran wriggled closer to the fire. The warmth felt good, and the soft crackling of flames soothed him, but sleep would not come. Outside the wind was sending armies of dead leaves marching across the courtyards to scratch faintly at the doors and windows. The sounds made him think of Old Nan’s stories. He could almost hear the ghostly sentinels calling to each other atop the Wall and winding their ghostly warhorns. Pale moonlight slanted down through the hole in the dome, painting the branches of the weirwood as they strained up toward the roof. It looked as if the tree was trying to catch the moon and drag it down into the well. Old gods, Bran prayed, if you hear me, don’t send a dream tonight. Or if you do, make it a good dream. The gods made no answer.
Bran made himself close his eyes. Maybe he even slept some, or maybe he was just drowsing, floating the way you do when you are half awake and half asleep, trying not to think about Mad Axe or the Rat Cook or the thing that came in the night.
Then he heard the noise.
His eyes opened. What was that? He held his breath. Did I dream it? Was I having a stupid nightmare? He didn’t want to wake Meera and Jojen for a bad dream, but . . . there . . . a soft scuffling sound, far off . . . Leaves, it’s leaves rattling off the walls outside and rustling together . . . or the wind, it could be the wind . . . The sound wasn’t coming from outside, though. Bran felt the hairs on his arm start to rise. The sound’s inside, it’s in here with us, and it’s getting louder. He pushed himself up onto an elbow, listening. There was wind, and blowing leaves as well, but this was something else. Footsteps. Someone was coming this way. Something was coming this way.
It wasn’t the sentinels, he knew. The sentinels never left the Wall. But there might be other ghosts in the Nightfort, ones even more terrible. He remembered what Old Nan had said of Mad Axe, how he took his boots off and prowled the castle halls barefoot in the dark, with never a sound to tell you where he was except for the drops of blood that fell from his axe and his elbows and the end of his wet red beard. Or maybe it wasn’t Mad Axe at all, maybe it was the thing that came in the night. The ’prentice boys all saw it, Old Nan said, but afterward when they told their Lord Commander every description had been different. And three died within the year, and the fourth went mad, and a hundred years later when the thing had come again, the ’prentice boys were seen shambling along behind it, all in chains.
That was only a story, though. He was just scaring himself. There was no thing that comes in the night, Maester Luwin had said so. If there had ever been such a thing, it was gone from the world now, like giants and dragons. It’s nothing, Bran thought.
But the sounds were louder now.
It’s coming from the well, he realized. That made him even more afraid. Something was coming up from under the ground, coming up out of the dark. Hodor woke it up. He woke it up with that stupid piece of slate, and now it’s coming. It was hard to hear over Hodor’s snores and the thumping of his own heart. Was that the sound blood made dripping from an axe? Or was it the faint, far-off rattling of ghostly chains? Bran listened harder. Footsteps. It was definitely footsteps, each one a little louder than the one before. He couldn’t tell how many, though. The well made the sounds echo. He didn’t hear any dripping, or chains either, but there was something else . . . a high thin whimpering sound, like someone in pain, and heavy muffled breathing. But the footsteps were loudest. The footsteps were coming closer.
Bran was too frightened to shout. The fire had burned down to a few faint embers and his friends were all asleep. He almost slipped his skin and reached out for his wolf, but Summer might be miles away. He couldn’t leave his friends helpless in the dark to face whatever was coming up out of the well. I told them not to come here, he thought miserably. I told them there were ghosts. I told them that we should go to Castle Black.
The footfalls sounded heavy to Bran, slow, ponderous, scraping against the stone. It must be huge. Mad Axe had been a big man in Old Nan’s story, and the thing that came in the night had been monstrous. Back in Winterfell, Sansa had told him that the demons of the dark couldn’t touch him if he hid beneath his blanket. He almost did that now, before he remembered that he was a prince, and almost a man grown.
Bran wriggled across the floor, dragging his dead legs behind him until he could reach out and touch Meera on the foot. She woke at once. He had never known anyone to wake as quick as Meera Reed, or to be so alert so fast. Bran pressed a finger to his mouth so she’d know not to speak. She heard the sound at once, he could see that on her face; the echoing footfalls, the faint whimpering, the heavy breathing.
Meera rose to her feet without a word and reclaimed her weapons. With her three-pronged frog spear in her right hand and the folds of her net dangling from her left, she slipped barefoot toward the well. Jojen dozed on, oblivious, while Hodor muttered and thrashed in restless sleep. She kept to the shadows as she moved, stepped around the shaft of moonlight as quiet as a cat. Bran was watching her all the while, and even he could barely see the faint sheen of her spear. I can’t let her fight the thing alone, he thought. Summer was far away, but . . . 
 . . . he slipped his skin, and reached for Hodor.
It was not like sliding into Summer. That was so easy now that Bran hardly thought about it. This was harder, like trying to pull a left boot on your right foot. It fit all wrong, and the boot was scared too, the boot didn’t know what was happening, the boot was pushing the foot away. He tasted vomit in the back of Hodor’s throat, and that was almost enough to make him flee. Instead he squirmed and shoved, sat up, gathered his legs under him—his huge strong legs—and rose. I’m standing. He took a step. I’m walking. It was such a strange feeling that he almost fell. He could see himself on the cold stone floor, a little broken thing, but he wasn’t broken now. He grabbed Hodor’s longsword. The breathing was as loud as a blacksmith’s bellows.
From the well came a wail, a piercing creech that went through him like a knife. A huge black shape heaved itself up into the darkness and lurched toward the moonlight, and the fear rose up in Bran so thick that before he could even think of drawing Hodor’s sword the way he’d meant to, he found himself back on the floor again with Hodor roaring “Hodor hodor HODOR,” the way he had in the lake tower whenever the lightning flashed. But the thing that came in the night was screaming too, and thrashing wildly in the folds of Meera’s net. Bran saw her spear dart out of the darkness to snap at it, and the thing staggered and fell, struggling with the net. The wailing was still coming from the well, even louder now. On the floor the black thing flopped and fought, screeching, “No, no, don’t, please, DON’T . . .”
Meera stood over him, the moonlight shining silver off the prongs of her frog spear. “Who are you?” she demanded.
“I’m SAM,” the black thing sobbed. “Sam, Sam, I’m Sam, let me out, you stabbed me . . .” He rolled through the puddle of moonlight, flailing and flopping in the tangles of Meera’s net. Hodor was still shouting, “Hodor hodor hodor.”
It was Jojen who fed the sticks to the fire and blew on them until the flames leapt up crackling. Then there was light, and Bran saw the pale thin-faced girl by the lip of the well, all bundled up in furs and skins beneath an enormous black cloak, trying to shush the screaming baby in her arms. The thing on the floor was pushing an arm through the net to reach his knife, but the loops wouldn’t let him. He wasn’t any monster beast, or even Mad Axe drenched in gore; only a big fat man dressed up in black wool, black fur, black leather, and black mail. “He’s a black brother,” said Bran. “Meera, he’s from the Night’s Watch.”
“Hodor?” Hodor squatted down on his haunches to peer at the man in the net. “Hodor,” he said again, hooting.
“The Night’s Watch, yes.” The fat man was still breathing like a bellows. “I’m a brother of the Watch.” He had one cord under his chins, forcing his head up, and others digging deep into his cheeks. “I’m a crow, please. Let me out of this.”
Bran was suddenly uncertain. “Are you the three-eyed crow?” He can’t be the three-eyed crow.
“I don’t think so.” The fat man rolled his eyes, but there were only two of them. “I’m only Sam. Samwell Tarly. Let me out, it’s hurting me.” He began to struggle again.
Meera made a disgusted sound. “Stop flopping around. If you tear my net I’ll throw you back down the well. Just lie still and I’ll untangle you.”
“Who are you?” Jojen asked the girl with the baby.
“Gilly,” she said. “For the gillyflower. He’s Sam. We never meant to scare you.” She rocked her baby and murmured at it, and finally it stopped crying.
Meera was untangling the fat brother. Jojen went to the well and peered down. “Where did you come from?”
“From Craster’s,” the girl said. “Are you the one?”
Jojen turned to look at her. “The one?”
“He said that Sam wasn’t the one,” she explained. “There was someone else, he said. The one he was sent to find.”
“Who said?” Bran demanded.
“Coldhands,” Gilly answered softly.
Meera peeled back one end of her net, and the fat man managed to sit up. He was shaking, Bran saw, and still struggling to catch his breath. “He said there would be people,” he huffed. “People in the castle. I didn’t know you’d be right at the top of the steps, though. I didn’t know you’d throw a net on me or stab me in the stomach.” He touched his belly with a black-gloved hand. “Am I bleeding? I can’t see.”
“It was just a poke to get you off your feet,” said Meera. “Here, let me have a look.” She went to one knee, and felt around his navel. “You’re wearing mail. I never got near your skin.”
“Well, it hurt all the same,” Sam complained.
“Are you really a brother of the Night’s Watch?” Bran asked.
The fat man’s chins jiggled when he nodded. His skin looked pale and saggy. “Only a steward. I took care of Lord Mormont’s ravens.” For a moment he looked like he was going to cry. “I lost them at the Fist, though. It was my fault. I got us lost too. I couldn’t even find the Wall. It’s a hundred leagues long and seven hundred feet high and I couldn’t find it!”
“Well, you’ve found it now,” said Meera. “Lift your rump off the ground, I want my net back.”
“How did you get through the Wall?” Jojen demanded as Sam struggled to his feet. “Does the well lead to an underground river, is that where you came from? You’re not even wet . . .”
“There’s a gate,” said fat Sam. “A hidden gate, as old as the Wall itself. The Black Gate, he called it.”
The Reeds exchanged a look. “We’ll find this gate at the bottom of the well?” asked Jojen.
Sam shook his head. “You won’t. I have to take you.”
“Why?” Meera demanded. “If there’s a gate . . .”
“You won’t find it. If you did it wouldn’t open. Not for you. It’s the Black Gate.” Sam plucked at the faded black wool of his sleeve. “Only a man of the Night’s Watch can open it, he said. A Sworn Brother who has said his words.”
“He said.” Jojen frowned. “This . . . Coldhands?”
“That wasn’t his true name,” said Gilly, rocking. “We only called him that, Sam and me. His hands were cold as ice, but he saved us from the dead men, him and his ravens, and he brought us here on his elk.”
“His elk?” said Bran, wonderstruck.
“His elk?” said Meera, startled.
“His ravens?” said Jojen.
“Hodor?” said Hodor.
“Was he green?” Bran wanted to know. “Did he have antlers?”
The fat man was confused. “The elk?”
“Coldhands,” said Bran impatiently. “The green men ride on elks, Old Nan used to say. Sometimes they have antlers too.”
“He wasn’t a green man. He wore blacks, like a brother of the Watch, but he was pale as a wight, with hands so cold that at first I was afraid. The wights have blue eyes, though, and they don’t have tongues, or they’ve forgotten how to use them.” The fat man turned to Jojen. “He’ll be waiting. We should go. Do you have anything warmer to wear? The Black Gate is cold, and the other side of the Wall is even colder. You—”
“Why didn’t he come with you?” Meera gestured toward Gilly and her babe. “They came with you, why not him? Why didn’t you bring him through this Black Gate too?”
“He . . . he can’t.”
“Why not?”
“The Wall. The Wall is more than just ice and stone, he said. There are spells woven into it . . . old ones, and strong. He cannot pass beyond the Wall.”
It grew very quiet in the castle kitchen then. Bran could hear the soft crackle of the flames, the wind stirring the leaves in the night, the creak of the skinny weirwood reaching for the moon. Beyond the gates the monsters live, and the giants and the ghouls, he remembered Old Nan saying, but they cannot pass so long as the Wall stands strong. So go to sleep, my little Brandon, my baby boy. You needn’t fear. There are no monsters here.
“I am not the one you were told to bring,” Jojen Reed told fat Sam in his stained and baggy blacks. “He is.”
“Oh.” Sam looked down at him uncertainly. It might have been just then that he realized Bran was crippled. “I don’t . . . I’m not strong enough to carry you, I . . .”
“Hodor can carry me.” Bran pointed at his basket. “I ride in that, up on his back.”
Sam was staring at him. “You’re Jon Snow’s brother. The one who fell . . .”
“No,” said Jojen. “That boy is dead.”
“Don’t tell,” Bran warned. “Please.”
Sam looked confused for a moment, but finally he said, “I . . . I can keep a secret. Gilly too.” When he looked at her, the girl nodded. “Jon . . . Jon was my brother too. He was the best friend I ever had, but he went off with Qhorin Halfhand to scout the Frostfangs and never came back. We were waiting for him on the Fist when . . . when . . .”
“Jon’s here,” Bran said. “Summer saw him. He was with some wildlings, but they killed a man and Jon took his horse and escaped. I bet he went to Castle Black.”
Sam turned big eyes on Meera. “You’re certain it was Jon? You saw him?”
“I’m Meera,” Meera said with a smile. “Summer is . . .”
A shadow detached itself from the broken dome above and leapt down through the moonlight. Even with his injured leg, the wolf landed as light and quiet as a snowfall. The girl Gilly made a frightened sound and clutched her babe so hard against her that it began to cry again.
“He won’t hurt you,” Bran said. “That’s Summer.”
“Jon said you all had wolves.” Sam pulled off a glove. “I know Ghost.” He held out a shaky hand, the fingers white and soft and fat as little sausages. Summer padded closer, sniffed them, and gave the hand a lick.
That was when Bran made up his mind. “We’ll go with you.”
“All of you?” Sam seemed surprised by that.
Meera ruffled Bran’s hair. “He’s our prince.”
Summer circled the well, sniffing. He paused by the top step and looked back at Bran. He wants to go.
“Will Gilly be safe if I leave her here till I come back?” Sam asked them.
“She should be,” said Meera. “She’s welcome to our fire.”
Jojen said, “The castle is empty.”
Gilly looked around. “Craster used to tell us tales of castles, but I never knew they’d be so big.”
It’s only the kitchens. Bran wondered what she’d think when she saw Winterfell, if she ever did.
It took them a few minutes to gather their things and hoist Bran into his wicker seat on Hodor’s back. By the time they were ready to go, Gilly sat nursing her babe by the fire. “You’ll come back for me,” she said to Sam.
“As soon as I can,” he promised, “then we’ll go somewhere warm.” When he heard that, part of Bran wondered what he was doing. Will I ever go someplace warm again?
“I’ll go first, I know the way.” Sam hesitated at the top. “There’s just so many steps,” he sighed, before he started down. Jojen followed, then Summer, then Hodor with Bran riding on his back. Meera took the rear, with her spear and net in hand.
It was a long way down. The top of the well was bathed in moonlight, but it grew smaller and dimmer every time they went around. Their footsteps echoed off the damp stones, and the water sounds grew louder. “Should we have brought torches?” Jojen asked.
“Your eyes will adjust,” said Sam. “Keep one hand on the wall and you won’t fall.”
The well grew darker and colder with every turn. When Bran finally lifted his head around to look back up the shaft, the top of the well was no bigger than a half-moon. “Hodor,” Hodor whispered, “Hodorhodorhodorhodorhodorhodor,” the well whispered back. The water sounds were close, but when Bran peered down he saw only blackness.
A turn or two later Sam stopped suddenly. He was a quarter of the way around the well from Bran and Hodor and six feet farther down, yet Bran could barely see him. He could see the door, though. The Black Gate, Sam had called it, but it wasn’t black at all.
It was white weirwood, and there was a face on it.
A glow came from the wood, like milk and moonlight, so faint it scarcely seemed to touch anything beyond the door itself, not even Sam standing right before it. The face was old and pale, wrinkled and shrunken. It looks dead. Its mouth was closed, and its eyes; its cheeks were sunken, its brow withered, its chin sagging. If a man could live for a thousand years and never die but just grow older, his face might come to look like that.
The door opened its eyes.
They were white too, and blind. “Who are you?” the door asked, and the well whispered, “Who-who-who-who-who-who-who.”
“I am the sword in the darkness,” Samwell Tarly said. “I am the watcher on the walls. I am the fire that burns against the cold, the light that brings the dawn, the horn that wakes the sleepers. I am the shield that guards the realms of men.”
“Then pass,” the door said. Its lips opened, wide and wider and wider still, until nothing at all remained but a great gaping mouth in a ring of wrinkles. Sam stepped aside and waved Jojen through ahead of him. Summer followed, sniffing as he went, and then it was Bran’s turn. Hodor ducked, but not low enough. The door’s upper lip brushed softly against the top of Bran’s head, and a drop of water fell on him and ran slowly down his nose. It was strangely warm, and salty as a tear.

Are we there yet?
Bran never said the words aloud, but they were often on his lips as their ragged company trudged through groves of ancient oaks and towering grey-green sentinels, past gloomy soldier pines and bare brown chestnut trees. Are we near? the boy would wonder, as Hodor clambered up a stony slope, or descended into some dark crevice where drifts of dirty snow cracked beneath his feet. How much farther? he would think, as the great elk splashed across a half-frozen stream. How much longer? It’s so cold. Where is the three-eyed crow?
Swaying in his wicker basket on Hodor’s back, the boy hunched down, ducking his head as the big stableboy passed beneath the limb of an oak. The snow was falling again, wet and heavy. Hodor walked with one eye frozen shut, his thick brown beard a tangle of hoarfrost, icicles drooping from the ends of his bushy mustache. One gloved hand still clutched the rusty iron longsword he had taken from the crypts below Winterfell, and from time to time he would lash out at a branch, knocking loose a spray of snow. “Hod-d-d-dor,” he would mutter, his teeth chattering.
The sound was strangely reassuring. On their journey from Winterfell to the Wall, Bran and his companions had made the miles shorter by talking and telling tales, but it was different here. Even Hodor felt it. His hodors came less often than they had south of the Wall. There was a stillness to this wood like nothing Bran had ever known before. Before the snows began, the north wind would swirl around them and clouds of dead brown leaves would kick up from the ground with a faint small rustling sound that reminded him of roaches scurrying in a cupboard, but now all the leaves were buried under a blanket of white. From time to time a raven would fly overhead, big black wings slapping against the cold air. Elsewise the world was silent.
Just ahead, the elk wove between the snowdrifts with his head down, his huge rack of antlers crusted with ice. The ranger sat astride his broad back, grim and silent. Coldhands was the name that the fat boy Sam had given him, for though the ranger’s face was pale, his hands were black and hard as iron, and cold as iron too. The rest of him was wrapped in layers of wool and boiled leather and ringmail, his features shadowed by his hooded cloak and a black woolen scarf about the lower half of his face.
Behind the ranger, Meera Reed wrapped her arms around her brother, to shelter him from the wind and cold with the warmth of her own body. A crust of frozen snot had formed below Jojen’s nose, and from time to time he shivered violently. He looks so small, Bran thought, as he watched him sway. He looks smaller than me now, and weaker too, and I’m the cripple.
Summer brought up the rear of their little band. The direwolf’s breath frosted the forest air as he padded after them, still limping on the hind leg that had taken the arrow back at Queenscrown. Bran felt the pain of the old wound whenever he slipped inside the big wolf’s skin. Of late Bran wore Summer’s body more often than his own; the wolf felt the bite of the cold, despite the thickness of his fur, but he could see farther and hear better and smell more than the boy in the basket, bundled up like a babe in swaddling clothes.
Other times, when he was tired of being a wolf, Bran slipped into Hodor’s skin instead. The gentle giant would whimper when he felt him, and thrash his shaggy head from side to side, but not as violently as he had the first time, back at Queenscrown. He knows it’s me, the boy liked to tell himself. He’s used to me by now. Even so, he never felt comfortable inside Hodor’s skin. The big stableboy never understood what was happening, and Bran could taste the fear at the back of his mouth. It was better inside Summer. I am him, and he is me. He feels what I feel.
Sometimes Bran could sense the direwolf sniffing after the elk, wondering if he could bring the great beast down. Summer had grown accustomed to horses at Winterfell, but this was an elk and elk were prey. The direwolf could sense the warm blood coursing beneath the elk’s shaggy hide. Just the smell was enough to make the slaver run from between his jaws, and when it did Bran’s mouth would water at the thought of rich, dark meat.
From a nearby oak a raven quorked, and Bran heard the sound of wings as another of the big black birds flapped down to land beside it. By day only half a dozen ravens stayed with them, flitting from tree to tree or riding on the antlers of the elk. The rest of the murder flew ahead or lingered behind. But when the sun sank low they would return, descending from the sky on night-black wings until every branch of every tree was thick with them for yards around. Some would fly to the ranger and mutter at him, and it seemed to Bran that he understood their quorks and squawks. They are his eyes and ears. They scout for him, and whisper to him of dangers ahead and behind.
As now. The elk stopped suddenly, and the ranger vaulted lightly from his back to land in knee-deep snow. Summer growled at him, his fur bristling. The direwolf did not like the way that Coldhands smelled. Dead meat, dry blood, a faint whiff of rot. And cold. Cold over all.
“What is it?” Meera wanted to know.
“Behind us,” Coldhands announced, his voice muffled by the black wool scarf across his nose and mouth.
“Wolves?” Bran asked. They had known for days that they were being followed. Every night they heard the mournful howling of the pack, and every night the wolves seemed a little closer. Hunters, and hungry. They can smell how weak we are. Often Bran woke shivering hours before the dawn, listening to the sound of them calling to one another in the distance as he waited for the sun to rise. If there are wolves, there must be prey, he used to think, until it came to him that they were the prey.
The ranger shook his head. “Men. The wolves still keep their distance. These men are not so shy.”
Meera Reed pushed back her hood. The wet snow that had covered it tumbled to the ground with a soft thump. “How many men? Who are they?”
“Foes. I’ll deal with them.”
“I’ll come with you.”
“You’ll stay. The boy must be protected. There is a lake ahead, hard frozen. When you come on it, turn north and follow the shoreline. You’ll come to a fishing village. Take refuge there until I can catch up with you.”
Bran thought that Meera meant to argue until her brother said, “Do as he says. He knows this land.” Jojen’s eyes were a dark green, the color of moss, but heavy with a weariness that Bran had never seen in them before. The little grandfather. South of the Wall, the boy from the crannogs had seemed to be wise beyond his years, but up here he was as lost and frightened as the rest of them. Even so, Meera always listened to him.
That was still true. Coldhands slipped between the trees, back the way they’d come, with four ravens flapping after him. Meera watched him go, her cheeks red with cold, breath puffing from her nostrils. She pulled her hood back up and gave the elk a nudge, and their trek resumed. Before they had gone twenty yards, though, she turned to glance behind them and said, “Men, he says. What men? Does he mean wildlings? Why won’t he say?”
“He said he’d go and deal with them,” said Bran.
“He said, aye. He said he would take us to this three-eyed crow too. That river we crossed this morning is the same one we crossed four days ago, I swear. We’re going in circles.”
“Rivers turn and twist,” Bran said uncertainly, “and where there’s lakes and hills, you need to go around.”
“There’s been too much going around,” Meera insisted, “and too many secrets. I don’t like it. I don’t like him. And I don’t trust him. Those hands of his are bad enough. He hides his face, and will not speak a name. Who is he? What is he? Anyone can put on a black cloak. Anyone, or any thing. He does not eat, he never drinks, he does not seem to feel the cold.”
It’s true. Bran had been afraid to speak of it, but he had noticed. Whenever they took shelter for the night, while he and Hodor and the Reeds huddled together for warmth, the ranger kept apart. Sometimes Coldhands closed his eyes, but Bran did not think he slept. And there was something else …
“The scarf.” Bran glanced about uneasily, but there was not a raven to be seen. All the big black birds had left them when the ranger did. No one was listening. Even so, he kept his voice low. “The scarf over his mouth, it never gets all hard with ice, like Hodor’s beard. Not even when he talks.”
Meera gave him a sharp look. “You’re right. We’ve never seen his breath, have we?”
“No.” A puff of white heralded each of Hodor’s hodors. When Jojen or his sister spoke, their words could be seen too. Even the elk left a warm fog upon the air when he exhaled.
“If he does not breathe …”
Bran found himself remembering the tales Old Nan had told him when he was a babe. Beyond the Wall the monsters live, the giants and the ghouls, the stalking shadows and the dead that walk, she would say, tucking him in beneath his scratchy woolen blanket, but they cannot pass so long as the Wall stands strong and the men of the Night’s Watch are true. So go to sleep, my little Brandon, my baby boy, and dream sweet dreams. There are no monsters here. The ranger wore the black of the Night’s Watch, but what if he was not a man at all? What if he was some monster, taking them to the other monsters to be devoured?
“The ranger saved Sam and the girl from the wights,” Bran said, hesitantly, “and he’s taking me to the three-eyed crow.”
“Why won’t this three-eyed crow come to us? Why couldn’t he meet us at the Wall? Crows have wings. My brother grows weaker every day. How long can we go on?”
Jojen coughed. “Until we get there.”
They came upon the promised lake not long after, and turned north as the ranger had bid them. That was the easy part.
The water was frozen, and the snow had been falling for so long that Bran had lost count of the days, turning the lake into a vast white wilderness. Where the ice was flat and the ground was bumpy, the going was easy, but where the wind had pushed the snow up into ridges, sometimes it was hard to tell where the lake ended and the shore began. Even the trees were not as infallible a guide as they might have hoped, for there were wooded islands in the lake, and wide areas ashore where no trees grew.
The elk went where he would, regardless of the wishes of Meera and Jojen on his back. Mostly he stayed beneath the trees, but where the shore curved away westward he would take the more direct path across the frozen lake, shouldering through snowdrifts taller than Bran as the ice crackled underneath his hooves. Out there the wind was stronger, a cold north wind that howled across the lake, knifed through their layers of wool and leather, and set them all to shivering. When it blew into their faces, it would drive the snow into their eyes and leave them as good as blind.
Hours passed in silence. Ahead, shadows began to steal between the trees, the long fingers of the dusk. Dark came early this far north. Bran had come to dread that. Each day seemed shorter than the last, and where the days were cold, the nights were bitter cruel.
Meera halted them again. “We should have come on the village by now.” Her voice sounded hushed and strange.
“Could we have passed it?” Bran asked.
“I hope not. We need to find shelter before nightfall.”
She was not wrong. Jojen’s lips were blue, Meera’s cheeks dark red. Bran’s own face had gone numb. Hodor’s beard was solid ice. Snow caked his legs almost to the knee, and Bran had felt him stagger more than once. No one was as strong as Hodor, no one. If even his great strength was failing …
“Summer can find the village,” Bran said suddenly, his words misting in the air. He did not wait to hear what Meera might say, but closed his eyes and let himself flow from his broken body.
As he slipped inside Summer’s skin, the dead woods came to sudden life. Where before there had been silence, now he heard: wind in the trees, Hodor’s breathing, the elk pawing at the ground in search of fodder. Familiar scents filled his nostrils: wet leaves and dead grass, the rotted carcass of a squirrel decaying in the brush, the sour stink of man-sweat, the musky odor of the elk. Food. Meat. The elk sensed his interest. He turned his head toward the direwolf, wary, and lowered his great antlers.
He is not prey, the boy whispered to the beast who shared his skin. Leave him. Run.
Summer ran. Across the lake he raced, his paws kicking up sprays of snow behind him. The trees stood shoulder to shoulder, like men in a battle line, all cloaked in white. Over roots and rocks the direwolf sped, through a drift of old snow, the crust crackling beneath his weight. His paws grew wet and cold. The next hill was covered with pines, and the sharp scent of their needles filled the air. When he reached the top, he turned in a circle, sniffing at the air, then raised his head and howled.
The smells were there. Mansmells.
Ashes, Bran thought, old and faint, but ashes. It was the smell of burnt wood, soot, and charcoal. A dead fire.
He shook the snow off his muzzle. The wind was gusting, so the smells were hard to follow. The wolf turned this way and that, sniffing. All around were heaps of snow and tall trees garbed in white. The wolf let his tongue loll out between his teeth, tasting the frigid air, his breath misting as snowflakes melted on his tongue. When he trotted toward the scent, Hodor lumbered after him at once. The elk took longer to decide, so Bran returned reluctantly to his own body and said, “That way. Follow Summer. I smelled it.”
As the first sliver of a crescent moon came peeking through the clouds, they finally stumbled into the village by the lake. They had almost walked straight through it. From the ice, the village looked no different than a dozen other spots along the lakeshore. Buried under drifts of snow, the round stone houses could just as easily have been boulders or hillocks or fallen logs, like the deadfall that Jojen had mistaken for a building the day before, until they dug down into it and found only broken branches and rotting logs.
The village was empty, abandoned by the wildlings who had once lived there, like all the other villages they had passed. Some had been burned, as if the inhabitants had wanted to make certain they could not come creeping back, but this one had been spared the torch. Beneath the snow they found a dozen huts and a longhall, with its sod roof and thick walls of rough-hewn logs.
“At least we will be out of the wind,” Bran said.
“Hodor,” said Hodor.
Meera slid down from the elk’s back. She and her brother helped lift Bran out of the wicker basket. “Might be the wildlings left some food behind,” she said.
That proved a forlorn hope. Inside the longhall they found the ashes of a fire, floors of hard-packed dirt, a chill that went bone deep. But at least they had a roof above their heads and log walls to keep the wind off. A stream ran nearby, covered with a film of ice. The elk had to crack it with his hoof to drink. Once Bran and Jojen and Hodor were safely settled, Meera fetched back some chunks of broken ice for them to suck on. The melting water was so cold it made Bran shudder.
Summer did not follow them into the longhall. Bran could feel the big wolf’s hunger, a shadow of his own. “Go hunt,” he told him, “but you leave the elk alone.” Part of him was wishing he could go hunting too. Perhaps he would, later.
Supper was a fistful of acorns, crushed and pounded into paste, so bitter that Bran gagged as he tried to keep it down. Jojen Reed did not even make the attempt. Younger and frailer than his sister, he was growing weaker by the day.
“Jojen, you have to eat,” Meera told him.
“Later. I just want to rest.” Jojen smiled a wan smile. “This is not the day I die, sister. I promise you.”
“You almost fell off the elk.”
“Almost. I am cold and hungry, that’s all.”
“Then eat.”
“Crushed acorns? My belly hurts, but that will only make it worse. Leave me be, sister. I’m dreaming of roast chicken.”
“Dreams will not sustain you. Not even greendreams.”
“Dreams are what we have.”
All we have. The last of the food that they had brought from the south was ten days gone. Since then hunger walked beside them day and night. Even Summer could find no game in these woods. They lived on crushed acorns and raw fish. The woods were full of frozen streams and cold black lakes, and Meera was as good a fisher with her three-pronged frog spear as most men were with hook and line. Some days her lips were blue with cold by the time she waded back to them with her catch wriggling on her tines. It had been three days since Meera caught a fish, however. Bran’s belly felt so hollow it might have been three years.
After they choked down their meagre supper, Meera sat with her back against a wall, sharpening her dagger on a whetstone. Hodor squatted down beside the door, rocking back and forth on his haunches and muttering, “Hodor, hodor, hodor.”
Bran closed his eyes. It was too cold to talk, and they dare not light a fire. Coldhands had warned them against that. These woods are not as empty as you think, he had said. You cannot know what the light might summon from the darkness. The memory made him shiver, despite the warmth of Hodor beside him.
Sleep would not come, could not come. Instead there was wind, the biting cold, moonlight on snow, and fire. He was back inside Summer, long leagues away, and the night was rank with the smell of blood. The scent was strong. A kill, not far. The flesh would still be warm. Slaver ran between his teeth as the hunger woke inside him. Not elk. Not deer. Not this.
The direwolf moved toward the meat, a gaunt grey shadow sliding from tree to tree, through pools of moonlight and over mounds of snow. The wind gusted around him, shifting. He lost the scent, found it, then lost it again. As he searched for it once more, a distant sound made his ears prick up.
Wolf, he knew at once. Summer stalked toward the sound, wary now. Soon enough the scent of blood was back, but now there were other smells: piss and dead skins, bird shit, feathers, and wolf, wolf, wolf. A pack. He would need to fight for his meat.
They smelled him too. As he moved out from amongst the darkness of the trees into the bloody glade, they were watching him. The female was chewing on a leather boot that still had half a leg in it, but she let it fall at his approach. The leader of the pack, an old male with a grizzled white muzzle and a blind eye, moved out to meet him, snarling, his teeth bared. Behind him, a younger male showed his fangs as well.
The direwolf’s pale yellow eyes drank in the sights around them. A nest of entrails coiled through a bush, entangled with the branches. Steam rising from an open belly, rich with the smells of blood and meat. A head staring sightlessly up at a horned moon, cheeks ripped and torn down to bloody bone, pits for eyes, neck ending in a ragged stump. A pool of frozen blood, glistening red and black.
Men. The stink of them filled the world. Alive, they had been as many as the fingers on a man’s paw, but now they were none. Dead. Done. Meat. Cloaked and hooded, once, but the wolves had torn their clothing into pieces in their frenzy to get at the flesh. Those who still had faces wore thick beards crusted with ice and frozen snot. The falling snow had begun to bury what remained of them, so pale against the black of ragged cloaks and breeches. Black.
Long leagues away, the boy stirred uneasily.
Black. Night’s Watch. They were Night’s Watch.
The direwolf did not care. They were meat. He was hungry.
The eyes of the three wolves glowed yellow. The direwolf swung his head from side to side, nostrils flaring, then bared his fangs in a snarl. The younger male backed away. The direwolf could smell the fear in him. Tail, he knew. But the one-eyed wolf answered with a growl and moved to block his advance. Head. And he does not fear me though I am twice his size.
Their eyes met.
Warg!
Then the two rushed together, wolf and direwolf, and there was no more time for thought. The world shrank down to tooth and claw, snow flying as they rolled and spun and tore at one another, the other wolves snarling and snapping around them. His jaws closed on matted fur slick with hoarfrost, on a limb thin as a dry stick, but the one-eyed wolf clawed at his belly and tore himself free, rolled, lunged for him. Yellow fangs snapped closed on his throat, but he shook off his old grey cousin as he would a rat, then charged after him, knocked him down. Rolling, ripping, kicking, they fought until the both of them were ragged and fresh blood dappled the snows around them. But finally the old one-eyed wolf lay down and showed his belly. The direwolf snapped at him twice more, sniffed at his butt, then lifted a leg over him.
A few snaps and a warning growl, and the female and the tail submitted too. The pack was his.
The prey as well. He went from man to man, sniffing, before settling on the biggest, a faceless thing who clutched black iron in one hand. His other hand was missing, severed at the wrist, the stump bound up in leather. Blood flowed thick and sluggish from the slash across his throat. The wolf lapped at it with his tongue, licked the ragged eyeless ruin of his nose and cheeks, then buried his muzzle in his neck and tore it open, gulping down a gobbet of sweet meat. No flesh had ever tasted half as good.
When he was done with that one, he moved to the next, and devoured the choicest bits of that man too. Ravens watched him from the trees, squatting dark-eyed and silent on the branches as snow drifted down around them. The other wolves made do with his leavings; the old male fed first, then the female, then the tail. They were his now. They were pack.
No, the boy whispered, we have another pack. Lady’s dead and maybe Grey Wind too, but somewhere there’s still Shaggydog and Nymeria and Ghost. Remember Ghost?
Falling snow and feasting wolves began to dim. Warmth beat against his face, comforting as a mother’s kisses. Fire, he thought, smoke. His nose twitched to the smell of roasting meat. And then the forest fell away, and he was back in the longhall again, back in his broken body, staring at a fire. Meera Reed was turning a chunk of raw red flesh above the flames, letting it char and spit. “Just in time,” she said. Bran rubbed his eyes with the heel of his hand and wriggled backwards against the wall to sit. “You almost slept through supper. The ranger found a sow.”
Behind her, Hodor was tearing eagerly at a chunk of hot charred flesh as blood and grease ran down into his beard. Wisps of smoke rose from between his fingers. “Hodor,” he muttered between bites, “hodor, hodor.” His sword lay on the earthen floor beside him. Jojen Reed nipped at his own joint with small bites, chewing each chunk of meat a dozen times before swallowing.
The ranger killed a pig. Coldhands stood beside the door, a raven on his arm, both staring at the fire. Reflections from the flames glittered off four black eyes. He does not eat, Bran remembered, and he fears the flames.
“You said no fire,” he reminded the ranger.
“The walls around us hide the light, and dawn is close. We will be on our way soon.”
“What happened to the men? The foes behind us?”
“They will not trouble you.”
“Who were they? Wildlings?”
Meera turned the meat to cook the other side. Hodor was chewing and swallowing, muttering happily under his breath. Only Jojen seemed aware of what was happening as Coldhands turned his head to stare at Bran. “They were foes.”
Men of the Night’s Watch. “You killed them. You and the ravens. Their faces were all torn, and their eyes were gone.” Coldhands did not deny it. “They were your brothers. I saw. The wolves had ripped their clothes up, but I could still tell. Their cloaks were black. Like your hands.” Coldhands said nothing. “Who are you? Why are your hands black?”
The ranger studied his hands as if he had never noticed them before. “Once the heart has ceased to beat, a man’s blood runs down into his extremities, where it thickens and congeals.” His voice rattled in his throat, as thin and gaunt as he was. “His hands and feet swell up and turn as black as pudding. The rest of him becomes as white as milk.”
Meera Reed rose, her frog spear in her hand, a chunk of smoking meat still impaled upon its tines. “Show us your face.”
The ranger made no move to obey.
“He’s dead.” Bran could taste the bile in his throat. “Meera, he’s some dead thing. The monsters cannot pass so long as the Wall stands and the men of the Night’s Watch stay true, that’s what Old Nan used to say. He came to meet us at the Wall, but he could not pass. He sent Sam instead, with that wildling girl.”
Meera’s gloved hand tightened around the shaft of her frog spear. “Who sent you? Who is this three-eyed crow?”
“A friend. Dreamer, wizard, call him what you will. The last greenseer.” The longhall’s wooden door banged open. Outside, the night wind howled, bleak and black. The trees were full of ravens, screaming. Coldhands did not move.
“A monster,” Bran said.
The ranger looked at Bran as if the rest of them did not exist. “Your monster, Brandon Stark.”
“Yours,” the raven echoed, from his shoulder. Outside the door, the ravens in the trees took up the cry, until the night wood echoed to the murderer’s song of “Yours, yours, yours.”
“Jojen, did you dream this?” Meera asked her brother. “Who is he? What is he? What do we do now?”
“We go with the ranger,” said Jojen. “We have come too far to turn back now, Meera. We would never make it back to the Wall alive. We go with Bran’s monster, or we die.”

Something about the way the raven screamed sent a shiver running up Bran’s spine. I am almost a man grown, he had to remind himself. I have to be brave now.
But the air was sharp and cold and full of fear. Even Summer was afraid. The fur on his neck was bristling. Shadows stretched against the hillside, black and hungry. All the trees were bowed and twisted by the weight of ice they carried. Some hardly looked like trees at all. Buried from root to crown in frozen snow, they huddled on the hill like giants, monstrous and misshapen creatures hunched against the icy wind. “They are here.”
The ranger drew his longsword.
“Where?” Meera’s voice was hushed.
“Close. I don’t know. Somewhere.”
The raven shrieked again. “Hodor,” whispered Hodor. He had his hands tucked up beneath his armpits. Icicles hung from the brown briar of his beard, and his mustache was a lump of frozen snot, glittering redly in the light of sunset.
“Those wolves are close as well,” Bran warned them. “The ones that have been following us. Summer can smell them whenever we’re downwind.”
“Wolves are the least of our woes,” said Coldhands. “We have to climb. It will be dark soon. You would do well to be inside before night comes. Your warmth will draw them.” He glanced to the west, where the light of the setting sun could be seen dimly through the trees, like the glow of a distant fire.
“Is this the only way in?” asked Meera.
“The back door is three leagues north, down a sinkhole.”
That was all he had to say. Not even Hodor could climb down into a sinkhole with Bran heavy on his back, and Jojen could no more walk three leagues than run a thousand.
Meera eyed the hill above. “The way looks clear.”
“Looks,” the ranger muttered darkly. “Can you feel the cold? There’s something here. Where are they?”
“Inside the cave?” suggested Meera.
“The cave is warded. They cannot pass.” The ranger used his sword to point. “You can see the entrance there. Halfway up, between the weirwoods, that cleft in the rock.”
“I see it,” said Bran. Ravens were flying in and out.
Hodor shifted his weight. “Hodor.”
“A fold in the rock, that’s all I see,” said Meera.
“There’s a passage there. Steep and twisty at first, a runnel through the rock. If you can reach it, you’ll be safe.”
“What about you?”
“The cave is warded.”
Meera studied the cleft in the hillside. “It can’t be more than a thousand yards from here to there.”
No, thought Bran, but all those yards are upward. The hill was steep and thickly wooded. The snow had stopped three days ago, but none of it had melted. Beneath the trees, the ground was blanketed in white, still pristine and unbroken. “No one’s here,” said Bran, bravely. “Look at the snow. There are no footprints.”
“The white walkers go lightly on the snow,” the ranger said. “You’ll find no prints to mark their passage.” A raven descended from above to settle on his shoulder. Only a dozen of the big black birds remained with them. The rest had vanished along the way; every dawn when they arose, there had been fewer of them. “Come,” the bird squawked. “Come, come.”
The three-eyed crow, thought Bran. The greenseer. “It’s not so far,” he said. “A little climb, and we’ll be safe. Maybe we can have a fire.” All of them were cold and wet and hungry, except the ranger, and Jojen Reed was too weak to walk unaided.
“You go.” Meera Reed bent down beside her brother. He was settled in the bole of an oak, eyes closed, shivering violently. What little of his face could be seen beneath his hood and scarf was as colorless as the surrounding snow, but breath still puffed faintly from his nostrils whenever he exhaled. Meera had been carrying him all day. Food and fire will set him right again, Bran tried to tell himself, though he wasn’t sure it would. “I can’t fight and carry Jojen both, the climb’s too steep,” Meera was saying. “Hodor, you take Bran up to that cave.”
“Hodor.” Hodor clapped his hands together.
“Jojen just needs to eat,” Bran said, miserably. It had been twelve days since the elk had collapsed for the third and final time, since Coldhands had knelt beside it in the snowbank and murmured a blessing in some strange tongue as he slit its throat. Bran wept like a little girl when the bright blood came rushing out. He had never felt more like a cripple than he did then, watching helplessly as Meera Reed and Coldhands butchered the brave beast who had carried them so far. He told himself he would not eat, that it was better to go hungry than to feast upon a friend, but in the end he’d eaten twice, once in his own skin and once in Summer’s. As gaunt and starved as the elk had been, the steaks the ranger carved from him had sustained them for seven days, until they finished the last of them huddled over a fire in the ruins of an old hillfort.
“He needs to eat,” Meera agreed, smoothing her brother’s brow. “We all do, but there’s no food here. Go.”
Bran blinked back a tear and felt it freeze upon his cheek. Coldhands took Hodor by the arm. “The light is fading. If they’re not here now, they will be soon. Come.”
Wordless for once, Hodor slapped the snow off his legs, and plowed upward through the snowdrifts with Bran upon his back. Coldhands stalked beside them, his blade in a black hand. Summer came after. In some places the snow was higher than he was, and the big direwolf had to stop and shake it off after plunging through the thin crust. As they climbed, Bran turned awkwardly in his basket to watch as Meera slid an arm beneath her brother to lift him to his feet. He’s too heavy for her. She’s half-starved, she’s not as strong as she was. She clutched her frog spear in her other hand, jabbing the tines into the snow for a little more support. Meera had just begun to struggle up the hill, half-dragging and half-carrying her little brother, when Hodor passed between two trees, and Bran lost sight of them.
The hill grew steeper. Drifts of snow cracked under Hodor’s boots. Once a rock moved beneath his foot and he slid backwards, and almost went tumbling back down the hill. The ranger caught him by the arm and saved him. “Hodor,” said Hodor. Every gust of wind filled the air with fine white powder that shone like glass in the last light of day. Ravens flapped around them. One flew ahead and vanished inside the cave. Only eighty yards now, Bran thought, that’s not far at all.
Summer stopped suddenly, at the bottom of a steep stretch of unbroken white snow. The direwolf turned his head, sniffed the air, then snarled. Fur bristling, he began to back away.
“Hodor, stop,” said Bran. “Hodor. Wait.” Something was wrong. Summer smelled it, and so did he. Something bad. Something close. “Hodor, no, go back.”
Coldhands was still climbing, and Hodor wanted to keep up. “Hodor, hodor, hodor,” he grumbled loudly, to drown out Bran’s complaints. His breathing had grown labored. Pale mist filled the air. He took a step, then another. The snow was almost waist deep and the slope was very steep. Hodor was leaning forward, grasping at rocks and trees with his hands as he climbed. Another step. Another. The snow Hodor disturbed slid downhill, starting a small avalanche behind them.
Sixty yards. Bran craned himself sideways to better see the cave. Then he saw something else. “A fire!” In the little cleft between the weirwood trees was a flickering glow, a ruddy light calling through the gathering gloom. “Look, someone—”
Hodor screamed. He twisted, stumbled, fell.
Bran felt the world slide sideways as the big stableboy spun violently around. A jarring impact drove the breath from him. His mouth was full of blood and Hodor was thrashing and rolling, crushing the crippled boy beneath him.
Something has hold of his leg. For half a heartbeat Bran thought maybe a root had gotten tangled round his ankle … until the root moved. A hand, he saw, as the rest of the wight came bursting from beneath the snow.
Hodor kicked at it, slamming a snow-covered heel full into the thing’s face, but the dead man did not even seem to feel it. Then the two of them were grappling, punching and clawing at each other, sliding down the hill. Snow filled Bran’s mouth and nose as they rolled over, but in a half a heartbeat he was rolling up again. Something slammed against his head, a rock or a chunk of ice or a dead man’s fist, he could not tell, and he found himself out of his basket, sprawled across the hillside, spitting snow, his gloved hand full of hair that he’d torn from Hodor’s head.
All around him, wights were rising from beneath the snow.
Two, three, four. Bran lost count. They surged up violently amidst sudden clouds of snow. Some wore black cloaks, some ragged skins, some nothing. All of them had pale flesh and black hands. Their eyes glowed like pale blue stars.
Three of them descended on the ranger. Bran saw Coldhands slash one across the face. The thing kept right on coming, driving him back into the arms of another. Two more were going after Hodor, lumbering clumsily down the slope. Meera was going to climb right into this, Bran realized, with a sick sense of helpless terror. He smashed the snow and shouted out a warning.
Something grabbed hold of him.
That was when his shout became a scream. Bran filled a fist with snow and threw it, but the wight did not so much as blink. A black hand fumbled at his face, another at his belly. Its fingers felt like iron. He’s going to pull my guts out.
But suddenly Summer was between them. Bran glimpsed skin tear like cheap cloth, heard the splintering of bone. He saw a hand and wrist rip loose, pale fingers wriggling, the sleeve faded black roughspun. Black, he thought, he’s wearing black, he was one of the Watch. Summer flung the arm aside, twisted, and sank his teeth into the dead man’s neck under the chin. When the big grey wolf wrenched free, he took most of the creature’s throat out in an explosion of pale rotten meat.
The severed hand was still moving. Bran rolled away from it. On his belly, clawing at the snow, he glimpsed the trees above, pale and snow-cloaked, the orange glow between.
Fifty yards. If he could drag himself fifty yards, they could not get him. Damp seeped through his gloves as he clutched at roots and rocks, crawling toward the light. A little farther, just a little farther. Then you can rest beside the fire.
The last light had vanished from amongst the trees by then. Night had fallen. Coldhands was hacking and cutting at the circle of dead men that surrounded him. Summer was tearing at the one that he’d brought down, its face between his teeth. No one was paying any mind to Bran. He crawled a little higher, dragging his useless legs behind him. If I can reach that cave …
“Hoooodor” came a whimper, from somewhere down below.
And suddenly he was not Bran, the broken boy crawling through the snow, suddenly he was Hodor halfway down the hill, with the wight raking at his eyes. Roaring, he came lurching to his feet, throwing the thing violently aside. It went to one knee, began to rise again. Bran ripped Hodor’s longsword from his belt. Deep inside he could hear poor Hodor whimpering still, but outside he was seven feet of fury with old iron in his hand. He raised the sword and brought it down upon the dead man, grunting as the blade sheared through wet wool and rusted mail and rotted leather, biting deep into the bones and flesh beneath. “HODOR!” he bellowed, and slashed again. This time he took the wight’s head off at the neck, and for half a moment he exulted … until a pair of dead hands came groping blindly for his throat.
Bran backed away, bleeding, and Meera Reed was there, driving her frog spear deep into the wight’s back. “Hodor,” Bran roared again, waving her uphill. “Hodor, hodor.” Jojen was twisting feebly where she’d laid him down. Bran went to him, dropped the longsword, gathered the boy into Hodor’s arm, and lurched back to his feet. “HODOR!” he bellowed.
Meera led the way back up the hill, jabbing at the wights when they came near. The things could not be hurt, but they were slow and clumsy. “Hodor,” Hodor said with every step. “Hodor, hodor.” He wondered what Meera would think if he should suddenly tell her that he loved her.
Up above them, flaming figures were dancing in the snow.
The wights, Bran realized. Someone set the wights on fire.
Summer was snarling and snapping as he danced around the closest, a great ruin of a man wreathed in swirling flame. He shouldn’t get so close, what is he doing? Then he saw himself, sprawled facedown in the snow. Summer was trying to drive the thing away from him. What will happen if it kills me? the boy wondered. Will I be Hodor for good or all? Will I go back into Summer’s skin? Or will I just be dead?
The world moved dizzily around him. White trees, black sky, red flames, everything was whirling, shifting, spinning. He felt himself stumbling. He could hear Hodor screaming, “Hodor hodor hodor hodor. Hodor hodor hodor hodor. Hodor hodor hodor hodor hodor.” A cloud of ravens was pouring from the cave, and he saw a little girl with a torch in hand, darting this way and that. For a moment Bran thought it was his sister Arya … madly, for he knew his little sister was a thousand leagues away, or dead. And yet there she was, whirling, a scrawny thing, ragged, wild, her hair atangle. Tears filled Hodor’s eyes and froze there.
Everything turned inside out and upside down, and Bran found himself back inside his own skin, half-buried in the snow. The burning wight loomed over him, etched tall against the trees in their snowy shrouds. It was one of the naked ones, Bran saw, in the instant before the nearest tree shook off the snow that covered it and dropped it all down upon his head.
The next he knew, he was lying on a bed of pine needles beneath a dark stone roof. The cave. I’m in the cave. His mouth still tasted of blood where he’d bitten his tongue, but a fire was burning to his right, the heat washing over his face, and he had never felt anything so good. Summer was there, sniffing round him, and Hodor, soaking wet. Meera cradled Jojen’s head in her lap. And the Arya thing stood over them, clutching her torch.
“The snow,” Bran said. “It fell on me. Buried me.”
“Hid you. I pulled you out.” Meera nodded at the girl. “It was her who saved us, though. The torch … fire kills them.”
“Fire burns them. Fire is always hungry.”
That was not Arya’s voice, nor any child’s. It was a woman’s voice, high and sweet, with a strange music in it like none that he had ever heard and a sadness that he thought might break his heart. Bran squinted, to see her better. It was a girl, but smaller than Arya, her skin dappled like a doe’s beneath a cloak of leaves. Her eyes were queer—large and liquid, gold and green, slitted like a cat’s eyes. No one has eyes like that. Her hair was a tangle of brown and red and gold, autumn colors, with vines and twigs and withered flowers woven through it.
“Who are you?” Meera Reed was asking.
Bran knew. “She’s a child. A child of the forest.” He shivered, as much from wonderment as cold. They had fallen into one of Old Nan’s tales.
“The First Men named us children,” the little woman said. “The giants called us woh dak nag gran, the squirrel people, because we were small and quick and fond of trees, but we are no squirrels, no children. Our name in the True Tongue means those who sing the song of earth. Before your Old Tongue was ever spoken, we had sung our songs ten thousand years.”
Meera said, “You speak the Common Tongue now.”
“For him. The Bran boy. I was born in the time of the dragon, and for two hundred years I walked the world of men, to watch and listen and learn. I might be walking still, but my legs were sore and my heart was weary, so I turned my feet for home.”
“Two hundred years?” said Meera.
The child smiled. “Men, they are the children.”
“Do you have a name?” asked Bran.
“When I am needing one.” She waved her torch toward the black crack in the back wall of the cave. “Our way is down. You must come with me now.”
Bran shivered again. “The ranger …”
“He cannot come.”
“They’ll kill him.”
“No. They killed him long ago. Come now. It is warmer down deep, and no one will hurt you there. He is waiting for you.”
“The three-eyed crow?” asked Meera.
“The greenseer.” And with that she was off, and they had no choice but to follow. Meera helped Bran back up onto Hodor’s back, though his basket was half-crushed and wet from melting snow. Then she slipped an arm around her brother and shouldered him back onto his feet once more. His eyes opened. “What?” he said. “Meera? Where are we?” When he saw the fire, he smiled. “I had the strangest dream.”
The way was cramped and twisty, and so low that Hodor soon was crouching. Bran hunched down as best he could, but even so, the top of his head was soon scraping and bumping against the ceiling. Loose dirt crumbled at each touch and dribbled down into his eyes and hair, and once he smacked his brow on a thick white root growing from the tunnel wall, with tendrils hanging from it and spiderwebs between its fingers.
The child went in front with the torch in hand, her cloak of leaves whispering behind her, but the passage turned so much that Bran soon lost sight of her. Then the only light was what was reflected off the passage walls. After they had gone down a little, the cave divided, but the left branch was dark as pitch, so even Hodor knew to follow the moving torch to the right.
The way the shadows shifted made it seem as if the walls were moving too. Bran saw great white snakes slithering in and out of the earth around him, and his heart thumped in fear. He wondered if they had blundered into a nest of milk snakes or giant grave worms, soft and pale and squishy. Grave worms have teeth.
Hodor saw them too. “Hodor,” he whimpered, reluctant to go on. But when the girl child stopped to let them catch her, the torchlight steadied, and Bran realized that the snakes were only white roots like the one he’d hit his head on. “It’s weirwood roots,” he said. “Remember the heart tree in the godswood, Hodor? The white tree with the red leaves? A tree can’t hurt you.”
“Hodor.” Hodor plunged ahead, hurrying after the child and her torch, deeper into the earth. They passed another branching, and another, then came into an echoing cavern as large as the great hall of Winterfell, with stone teeth hanging from its ceiling and more poking up through its floor. The child in the leafy cloak wove a path through them. From time to time she stopped and waved her torch at them impatiently. This way, it seemed to say, this way, this way, faster.
There were more side passages after that, more chambers, and Bran heard dripping water somewhere to his right. When he looked off that way, he saw eyes looking back at them, slitted eyes that glowed bright, reflecting back the torchlight. More children, he told himself, the girl is not the only one, but Old Nan’s tale of Gendel’s children came back to him as well.
The roots were everywhere, twisting through earth and stone, closing off some passages and holding up the roofs of others. All the color is gone, Bran realized suddenly. The world was black soil and white wood. The heart tree at Winterfell had roots as thick around as a giant’s legs, but these were even thicker. And Bran had never seen so many of them. There must be a whole grove of weirwoods growing up above us.
The light dwindled again. Small as she was, the child-who-was-not-a-child moved quickly when she wanted. As Hodor thumped after her, something crunched beneath his feet. His halt was so sudden that Meera and Jojen almost slammed into his back.
“Bones,” said Bran. “It’s bones.” The floor of the passage was littered with the bones of birds and beasts. But there were other bones as well, big ones that must have come from giants and small ones that could have been from children. On either side of them, in niches carved from the stone, skulls looked down on them. Bran saw a bear skull and a wolf skull, half a dozen human skulls and near as many giants. All the rest were small, queerly formed. Children of the forest. The roots had grown in and around and through them, every one. A few had ravens perched atop them, watching them pass with bright black eyes.
The last part of their dark journey was the steepest. Hodor made the final descent on his arse, bumping and sliding downward in a clatter of broken bones, loose dirt, and pebbles. The girl child was waiting for them, standing on one end of a natural bridge above a yawning chasm. Down below in the darkness, Bran heard the sound of rushing water. An underground river.
“Do we have to cross?” Bran asked, as the Reeds came sliding down behind him. The prospect frightened him. If Hodor slipped on that narrow bridge, they would fall and fall.
“No, boy,” the child said. “Behind you.” She lifted her torch higher, and the light seemed to shift and change. One moment the flames burned orange and yellow, filling the cavern with a ruddy glow; then all the colors faded, leaving only black and white. Behind them Meera gasped. Hodor turned.
Before them a pale lord in ebon finery sat dreaming in a tangled nest of roots, a woven weirwood throne that embraced his withered limbs as a mother does a child.
His body was so skeletal and his clothes so rotted that at first Bran took him for another corpse, a dead man propped up so long that the roots had grown over him, under him, and through him. What skin the corpse lord showed was white, save for a bloody blotch that crept up his neck onto his cheek. His white hair was fine and thin as root hair and long enough to brush against the earthen floor. Roots coiled around his legs like wooden serpents. One burrowed through his breeches into the desiccated flesh of his thigh, to emerge again from his shoulder. A spray of dark red leaves sprouted from his skull, and grey mushrooms spotted his brow. A little skin remained, stretched across his face, tight and hard as white leather, but even that was fraying, and here and there the brown and yellow bone beneath was poking through.
“Are you the three-eyed crow?” Bran heard himself say. A three-eyed crow should have three eyes. He has only one, and that one red. Bran could feel the eye staring at him, shining like a pool of blood in the torchlight. Where his other eye should have been, a thin white root grew from an empty socket, down his cheek, and into his neck.
“A … crow?” The pale lord’s voice was dry. His lips moved slowly, as if they had forgotten how to form words. “Once, aye. Black of garb and black of blood.” The clothes he wore were rotten and faded, spotted with moss and eaten through with worms, but once they had been black. “I have been many things, Bran. Now I am as you see me, and now you will understand why I could not come to you … except in dreams. I have watched you for a long time, watched you with a thousand eyes and one. I saw your birth, and that of your lord father before you. I saw your first step, heard your first word, was part of your first dream. I was watching when you fell. And now you are come to me at last, Brandon Stark, though the hour is late.”
“I’m here,” Bran said, “only I’m broken. Will you … will you fix me … my legs, I mean?”
“No,” said the pale lord. “That is beyond my powers.”
Bran’s eyes filled with tears. We came such a long way. The chamber echoed to the sound of the black river.
“You will never walk again, Bran,” the pale lips promised, “but you will fly.”

The moon was a crescent, thin and sharp as the blade of a knife. A pale sun rose and set and rose again. Red leaves whispered in the wind. Dark clouds filled the skies and turned to storms. Lightning flashed and thunder rumbled, and dead men with black hands and bright blue eyes shuffled round a cleft in the hillside but could not enter. Under the hill, the broken boy sat upon a weirwood throne, listening to whispers in the dark as ravens walked up and down his arms.
“You will never walk again,” the three-eyed crow had promised, “but you will fly.” Sometimes the sound of song would drift up from someplace far below. The children of the forest, Old Nan would have called the singers, but those who sing the song of earth was their own name for themselves, in the True Tongue that no human man could speak. The ravens could speak it, though. Their small black eyes were full of secrets, and they would caw at him and peck his skin when they heard the songs.
The moon was fat and full. Stars wheeled across a black sky. Rain fell and froze, and tree limbs snapped from the weight of the ice. Bran and Meera made up names for those who sang the song of earth: Ash and Leaf and Scales, Black Knife and Snowylocks and Coals. Their true names were too long for human tongues, said Leaf. Only she could speak the Common Tongue, so what the others thought of their new names Bran never learned.
After the bone-grinding cold of the lands beyond the Wall, the caves were blessedly warm, and when the chill crept out of the rock the singers would light fires to drive it off again. Down here there was no wind, no snow, no ice, no dead things reaching out to grab you, only dreams and rushlight and the kisses of the ravens. And the whisperer in darkness.
The last greenseer, the singers called him, but in Bran’s dreams he was still a three-eyed crow. When Meera Reed had asked him his true name, he made a ghastly sound that might have been a chuckle. “I wore many names when I was quick, but even I once had a mother, and the name she gave me at her breast was Brynden.”
“I have an uncle Brynden,” Bran said. “He’s my mother’s uncle, really. Brynden Blackfish, he’s called.”
“Your uncle may have been named for me. Some are, still. Not so many as before. Men forget. Only the trees remember.” His voice was so soft that Bran had to strain to hear.
“Most of him has gone into the tree,” explained the singer Meera called Leaf. “He has lived beyond his mortal span, and yet he lingers. For us, for you, for the realms of men. Only a little strength remains in his flesh. He has a thousand eyes and one, but there is much to watch. One day you will know.”
“What will I know?” Bran asked the Reeds afterward, when they came with torches burning brightly in their hand, to carry him back to a small chamber off the big cavern where the singers had made beds for them to sleep. “What do the trees remember?”
“The secrets of the old gods,” said Jojen Reed. Food and fire and rest had helped restore him after the ordeals of their journey, but he seemed sadder now, sullen, with a weary, haunted look about the eyes. “Truths the First Men knew, forgotten now in Winterfell … but not in the wet wild. We live closer to the green in our bogs and crannogs, and we remember. Earth and water, soil and stone, oaks and elms and willows, they were here before us all and will still remain when we are gone.”
“So will you,” said Meera. That made Bran sad. What if I don’t want to remain when you are gone? he almost asked, but he swallowed the words unspoken. He was almost a man grown, and he did not want Meera to think he was some weepy babe. “Maybe you could be greenseers too,” he said instead.
“No, Bran.” Now Meera sounded sad.
“It is given to a few to drink of that green fountain whilst still in mortal flesh, to hear the whisperings of the leaves and see as the trees see, as the gods see,” said Jojen. “Most are not so blessed. The gods gave me only greendreams. My task was to get you here. My part in this is done.”
The moon was a black hole in the sky. Wolves howled in the wood, sniffing through the snowdrifts after dead things. A murder of ravens erupted from the hillside, screaming their sharp cries, black wings beating above a white world. A red sun rose and set and rose again, painting the snows in shades of rose and pink. Under the hill, Jojen brooded, Meera fretted, and Hodor wandered through dark tunnels with a sword in his right hand and a torch in his left. Or was it Bran wandering?
No one must ever know.
The great cavern that opened on the abyss was as black as pitch, black as tar, blacker than the feathers of a crow. Light entered as a trespasser, unwanted and unwelcome, and soon was gone again; cookfires, candles, and rushes burned for a little while, then guttered out again, their brief lives at an end.
The singers made Bran a throne of his own, like the one Lord Brynden sat, white weirwood flecked with red, dead branches woven through living roots. They placed it in the great cavern by the abyss, where the black air echoed to the sound of running water far below. Of soft grey moss they made his seat. Once he had been lowered into place, they covered him with warm furs.
There he sat, listening to the hoarse whispers of his teacher. “Never fear the darkness, Bran.” The lord’s words were accompanied by a faint rustling of wood and leaf, a slight twisting of his head. “The strongest trees are rooted in the dark places of the earth. Darkness will be your cloak, your shield, your mother’s milk. Darkness will make you strong.”
The moon was a crescent, thin and sharp as the blade of a knife. Snowflakes drifted down soundlessly to cloak the soldier pines and sentinels in white. The drifts grew so deep that they covered the entrance to the caves, leaving a white wall that Summer had to dig through whenever he went outside to join his pack and hunt. Bran did not oft range with them in those days, but some nights he watched them from above.
Flying was even better than climbing.
Slipping into Summer’s skin had become as easy for him as slipping on a pair of breeches once had been, before his back was broken. Changing his own skin for a raven’s night-black feathers had been harder, but not as hard as he had feared, not with these ravens. “A wild stallion will buck and kick when a man tries to mount him, and try to bite the hand that slips the bit between his teeth,” Lord Brynden said, “but a horse that has known one rider will accept another. Young or old, these birds have all been ridden. Choose one now, and fly.”
He chose one bird, and then another, without success, but the third raven looked at him with shrewd black eyes, tilted its head, and gave a quork, and quick as that he was not a boy looking at a raven but a raven looking at a boy. The song of the river suddenly grew louder, the torches burned a little brighter than before, and the air was full of strange smells. When he tried to speak it came out in a scream, and his first flight ended when he crashed into a wall and ended back inside his own broken body. The raven was unhurt. It flew to him and landed on his arm, and Bran stroked its feathers and slipped inside of it again. Before long he was flying around the cavern, weaving through the long stone teeth that hung down from the ceiling, even flapping out over the abyss and swooping down into its cold black depths.
Then he realized he was not alone.
“Someone else was in the raven,” he told Lord Brynden, once he had returned to his own skin. “Some girl. I felt her.”
“A woman, of those who sing the song of earth,” his teacher said. “Long dead, yet a part of her remains, just as a part of you would remain in Summer if your boy’s flesh were to die upon the morrow. A shadow on the soul. She will not harm you.”
“Do all the birds have singers in them?”
“All,” Lord Brynden said. “It was the singers who taught the First Men to send messages by raven … but in those days, the birds would speak the words. The trees remember, but men forget, and so now they write the messages on parchment and tie them round the feet of birds who have never shared their skin.”
Old Nan had told him the same story once, Bran remembered, but when he asked Robb if it was true, his brother laughed and asked him if he believed in grumkins too. He wished Robb were with them now. I’d tell him I could fly, but he wouldn’t believe, so I’d have to show him. I bet that he could learn to fly too, him and Arya and Sansa, even baby Rickon and Jon Snow. We could all be ravens and live in Maester Luwin’s rookery.
That was just another silly dream, though. Some days Bran wondered if all of this wasn’t just some dream. Maybe he had fallen asleep out in the snows and dreamed himself a safe, warm place. You have to wake, he would tell himself, you have to wake right now, or you’ll go dreaming into death. Once or twice he pinched his arm with his fingers, really hard, but the only thing that did was make his arm hurt. In the beginning he had tried to count the days by making note of when he woke and slept, but down here sleeping and waking had a way of melting into one another. Dreams became lessons, lessons became dreams, things happened all at once or not at all. Had he done that or only dreamed it?
“Only one man in a thousand is born a skinchanger,” Lord Brynden said one day, after Bran had learned to fly, “and only one skinchanger in a thousand can be a greenseer.”
“I thought the greenseers were the wizards of the children,” Bran said. “The singers, I mean.”
“In a sense. Those you call the children of the forest have eyes as golden as the sun, but once in a great while one is born amongst them with eyes as red as blood, or green as the moss on a tree in the heart of the forest. By these signs do the gods mark those they have chosen to receive the gift. The chosen ones are not robust, and their quick years upon the earth are few, for every song must have its balance. But once inside the wood they linger long indeed. A thousand eyes, a hundred skins, wisdom deep as the roots of ancient trees. Greenseers.”
Bran did not understand, so he asked the Reeds. “Do you like to read books, Bran?” Jojen asked him.
“Some books. I like the fighting stories. My sister Sansa likes the kissing stories, but those are stupid.”
“A reader lives a thousand lives before he dies,” said Jojen. “The man who never reads lives only one. The singers of the forest had no books. No ink, no parchment, no written language. Instead they had the trees, and the weirwoods above all. When they died, they went into the wood, into leaf and limb and root, and the trees remembered. All their songs and spells, their histories and prayers, everything they knew about this world. Maesters will tell you that the weirwoods are sacred to the old gods. The singers believe they are the old gods. When singers die they become part of that godhood.”
Bran’s eyes widened. “They’re going to kill me?”
“No,” Meera said. “Jojen, you’re scaring him.”
“He is not the one who needs to be afraid.”
The moon was fat and full. Summer prowled through the silent woods, a long grey shadow that grew more gaunt with every hunt, for living game could not be found. The ward upon the cave mouth still held; the dead men could not enter. The snows had buried most of them again, but they were still there, hidden, frozen, waiting. Other dead things came to join them, things that had once been men and women, even children. Dead ravens sat on bare brown branches, wings crusted with ice. A snow bear crashed through the brush, huge and skeletal, half its head sloughed away to reveal the skull beneath. Summer and his pack fell upon it and tore it into pieces. Afterward they gorged, though the meat was rotted and half-frozen, and moved even as they ate it.
Under the hill they still had food to eat. A hundred kinds of mushrooms grew down here. Blind white fish swam in the black river, but they tasted just as good as fish with eyes once you cooked them up. They had cheese and milk from the goats that shared the caves with the singers, even some oats and barleycorn and dried fruit laid by during the long summer. And almost every day they ate blood stew, thickened with barley and onions and chunks of meat. Jojen thought it might be squirrel meat, and Meera said that it was rat. Bran did not care. It was meat and it was good. The stewing made it tender.
The caves were timeless, vast, silent. They were home to more than three score living singers and the bones of thousands dead, and extended far below the hollow hill. “Men should not go wandering in this place,” Leaf warned them. “The river you hear is swift and black, and flows down and down to a sunless sea. And there are passages that go even deeper, bottomless pits and sudden shafts, forgotten ways that lead to the very center of the earth. Even my people have not explored them all, and we have lived here for a thousand thousand of your man-years.”
Though the men of the Seven Kingdoms might call them the children of the forest, Leaf and her people were far from childlike. Little wise men of the forest would have been closer. They were small compared to men, as a wolf is smaller than a direwolf. That does not mean it is a pup. They had nut-brown skin, dappled like a deer’s with paler spots, and large ears that could hear things that no man could hear. Their eyes were big too, great golden cat’s eyes that could see down passages where a boy’s eyes saw only blackness. Their hands had only three fingers and a thumb, with sharp black claws instead of nails.
And they did sing. They sang in True Tongue, so Bran could not understand the words, but their voices were as pure as winter air. “Where are the rest of you?” Bran asked Leaf, once.
“Gone down into the earth,” she answered. “Into the stones, into the trees. Before the First Men came all this land that you call Westeros was home to us, yet even in those days we were few. The gods gave us long lives but not great numbers, lest we overrun the world as deer will overrun a wood where there are no wolves to hunt them. That was in the dawn of days, when our sun was rising. Now it sinks, and this is our long dwindling. The giants are almost gone as well, they who were our bane and our brothers. The great lions of the western hills have been slain, the unicorns are all but gone, the mammoths down to a few hundred. The direwolves will outlast us all, but their time will come as well. In the world that men have made, there is no room for them, or us.”
She seemed sad when she said it, and that made Bran sad as well. It was only later that he thought, Men would not be sad. Men would be wroth. Men would hate and swear a bloody vengeance. The singers sing sad songs, where men would fight and kill.
One day Meera and Jojen decided to go see the river, despite Leaf’s cautions. “I want to come too,” Bran said.
Meera gave him a mournful look. The river was six hundred feet below, down steep slopes and twisty passages, she explained, and the last part required climbing down a rope. “Hodor could never make the climb with you on his back. I’m sorry, Bran.”
Bran remembered a time when no one could climb as good as him, not even Robb or Jon. Part of him wanted to shout at them for leaving him, and another part wanted to cry. He was almost a man grown, though, so he said nothing. But after they were gone, he slipped inside Hodor’s skin and followed them.
The big stableboy no longer fought him as he had the first time, back in the lake tower during the storm. Like a dog who has had all the fight whipped out of him, Hodor would curl up and hide whenever Bran reached out for him. His hiding place was somewhere deep within him, a pit where not even Bran could touch him. No one wants to hurt you, Hodor, he said silently, to the child-man whose flesh he’d taken. I just want to be strong again for a while. I’ll give it back, the way I always do.
No one ever knew when he was wearing Hodor’s skin. Bran only had to smile, do as he was told, and mutter “Hodor” from time to time, and he could follow Meera and Jojen, grinning happily, without anyone suspecting it was really him. He often tagged along, whether he was wanted or not. In the end, the Reeds were glad he came. Jojen made it down the rope easily enough, but after Meera caught a blind white fish with her frog spear and it was time to climb back up, his arms began to tremble and he could not make it to the top, so they had to tie the rope around him and let Hodor haul him up. “Hodor,” he grunted every time he gave a pull. “Hodor, hodor, hodor.”
The moon was a crescent, thin and sharp as the blade of a knife. Summer dug up a severed arm, black and covered with hoarfrost, its fingers opening and closing as it pulled itself across the frozen snow. There was still enough meat on it to fill his empty belly, and after that was done he cracked the arm bones for the marrow. Only then did the arm remember it was dead.
Bran ate with Summer and his pack, as a wolf. As a raven he flew with the murder, circling the hill at sunset, watching for foes, feeling the icy touch of the air. As Hodor he explored the caves. He found chambers full of bones, shafts that plunged deep into the earth, a place where the skeletons of gigantic bats hung upside down from the ceiling. He even crossed the slender stone bridge that arched over the abyss and discovered more passages and chambers on the far side. One was full of singers, enthroned like Brynden in nests of weirwood roots that wove under and through and around their bodies. Most of them looked dead to him, but as he crossed in front of them their eyes would open and follow the light of his torch, and one of them opened and closed a wrinkled mouth as if he were trying to speak. “Hodor,” Bran said to him, and he felt the real Hodor stir down in his pit.
Seated on his throne of roots in the great cavern, half-corpse and half-tree, Lord Brynden seemed less a man than some ghastly statue made of twisted wood, old bone, and rotted wool. The only thing that looked alive in the pale ruin that was his face was his one red eye, burning like the last coal in a dead fire, surrounded by twisted roots and tatters of leathery white skin hanging off a yellowed skull.
The sight of him still frightened Bran—the weirwood roots snaking in and out of his withered flesh, the mushrooms sprouting from his cheeks, the white wooden worm that grew from the socket where one eye had been. He liked it better when the torches were put out. In the dark he could pretend that it was the three-eyed crow who whispered to him and not some grisly talking corpse.
One day I will be like him. The thought filled Bran with dread. Bad enough that he was broken, with his useless legs. Was he doomed to lose the rest too, to spend all of his years with a weirwood growing in him and through him? Lord Brynden drew his life from the tree, Leaf told them. He did not eat, he did not drink. He slept, he dreamed, he watched. I was going to be a knight, Bran remembered. I used to run and climb and fight. It seemed a thousand years ago.
What was he now? Only Bran the broken boy, Brandon of House Stark, prince of a lost kingdom, lord of a burned castle, heir to ruins. He had thought the three-eyed crow would be a sorcerer, a wise old wizard who could fix his legs, but that was some stupid child’s dream, he realized now. I am too old for such fancies, he told himself. A thousand eyes, a hundred skins, wisdom deep as the roots of ancient trees. That was as good as being a knight. Almost as good, anyway.
The moon was a black hole in the sky. Outside the cave the world went on. Outside the cave the sun rose and set, the moon turned, the cold winds howled. Under the hill, Jojen Reed grew ever more sullen and solitary, to his sister’s distress. She would often sit with Bran beside their little fire, talking of everything and nothing, petting Summer where he slept between them, whilst her brother wandered the caverns by himself. Jojen had even taken to climbing up to the cave’s mouth when the day was bright. He would stand there for hours, looking out over the forest, wrapped in furs yet shivering all the same.
“He wants to go home,” Meera told Bran. “He will not even try and fight his fate. He says the greendreams do not lie.”
“He’s being brave,” said Bran. The only time a man can be brave is when he is afraid, his father had told him once, long ago, on the day they found the direwolf pups in the summer snows. He still remembered.
“He’s being stupid,” Meera said. “I’d hoped that when we found your three-eyed crow … now I wonder why we ever came.”
For me, Bran thought. “His greendreams,” he said.
“His greendreams.” Meera’s voice was bitter.
“Hodor,” said Hodor.
Meera began to cry.
Bran hated being crippled then. “Don’t cry,” he said. He wanted to put his arms around her, hold her tight the way his mother used to hold him back at Winterfell when he’d hurt himself. She was right there, only a few feet from him, but so far out of reach it might have been a hundred leagues. To touch her he would need to pull himself along the ground with his hands, dragging his legs behind him. The floor was rough and uneven, and it would be slow going, full of scrapes and bumps. I could put on Hodor’s skin, he thought. Hodor could hold her and pat her on the back. The thought made Bran feel strange, but he was still thinking it when Meera bolted from the fire, back out into the darkness of the tunnels. He heard her steps recede until there was nothing but the voices of the singers.
The moon was a crescent, thin and sharp as the blade of a knife. The days marched past, one after the other, each shorter than the one before. The nights grew longer. No sunlight ever reached the caves beneath the hill. No moonlight ever touched those stony halls. Even the stars were strangers there. Those things belonged to the world above, where time ran in its iron circles, day to night to day to night to day.
“It is time,” Lord Brynden said.
Something in his voice sent icy fingers running up Bran’s back. “Time for what?”
“For the next step. For you to go beyond skinchanging and learn what it means to be a greenseer.”
“The trees will teach him,” said Leaf. She beckoned, and another of the singers padded forward, the white-haired one that Meera had named Snowylocks. She had a weirwood bowl in her hands, carved with a dozen faces, like the ones the heart trees wore. Inside was a white paste, thick and heavy, with dark red veins running through it. “You must eat of this,” said Leaf. She handed Bran a wooden spoon.
The boy looked at the bowl uncertainly. “What is it?”
“A paste of weirwood seeds.”
Something about the look of it made Bran feel ill. The red veins were only weirwood sap, he supposed, but in the torchlight they looked remarkably like blood. He dipped the spoon into the paste, then hesitated. “Will this make me a greenseer?”
“Your blood makes you a greenseer,” said Lord Brynden. “This will help awaken your gifts and wed you to the trees.”
Bran did not want to be married to a tree … but who else would wed a broken boy like him? A thousand eyes, a hundred skins, wisdom deep as the roots of ancient trees. A greenseer.
He ate.
It had a bitter taste, though not so bitter as acorn paste. The first spoonful was the hardest to get down. He almost retched it right back up. The second tasted better. The third was almost sweet. The rest he spooned up eagerly. Why had he thought that it was bitter? It tasted of honey, of new-fallen snow, of pepper and cinnamon and the last kiss his mother ever gave him. The empty bowl slipped from his fingers and clattered on the cavern floor. “I don’t feel any different. What happens next?”
Leaf touched his hand. “The trees will teach you. The trees remember.” He raised a hand, and the other singers began to move about the cavern, extinguishing the torches one by one. The darkness thickened and crept toward them.
“Close your eyes,” said the three-eyed crow. “Slip your skin, as you do when you join with Summer. But this time, go into the roots instead. Follow them up through the earth, to the trees upon the hill, and tell me what you see.”
Bran closed his eyes and slipped free of his skin. Into the roots, he thought. Into the weirwood. Become the tree. For an instant he could see the cavern in its black mantle, could hear the river rushing by below.
Then all at once he was back home again.
Lord Eddard Stark sat upon a rock beside the deep black pool in the godswood, the pale roots of the heart tree twisting around him like an old man’s gnarled arms. The greatsword Ice lay across Lord Eddard’s lap, and he was cleaning the blade with an oilcloth.
“Winterfell,” Bran whispered.
His father looked up. “Who’s there?” he asked, turning …
 … and Bran, frightened, pulled away. His father and the black pool and the godswood faded and were gone and he was back in the cavern, the pale thick roots of his weirwood throne cradling his limbs as a mother does a child. A torch flared to life before him.
“Tell us what you saw.” From far away Leaf looked almost a girl, no older than Bran or one of his sisters, but close at hand she seemed far older. She claimed to have seen two hundred years.
Bran’s throat was very dry. He swallowed. “Winterfell. I was back in Winterfell. I saw my father. He’s not dead, he’s not, I saw him, he’s back at Winterfell, he’s still alive.”
“No,” said Leaf. “He is gone, boy. Do not seek to call him back from death.”
“I saw him.” Bran could feel rough wood pressing against one cheek. “He was cleaning Ice.”
“You saw what you wished to see. Your heart yearns for your father and your home, so that is what you saw.”
“A man must know how to look before he can hope to see,” said Lord Brynden. “Those were shadows of days past that you saw, Bran. You were looking through the eyes of the heart tree in your godswood. Time is different for a tree than for a man. Sun and soil and water, these are the things a weirwood understands, not days and years and centuries. For men, time is a river. We are trapped in its flow, hurtling from past to present, always in the same direction. The lives of trees are different. They root and grow and die in one place, and that river does not move them. The oak is the acorn, the acorn is the oak. And the weirwood … a thousand human years are a moment to a weirwood, and through such gates you and I may gaze into the past.”
“But,” said Bran, “he heard me.”
“He heard a whisper on the wind, a rustling amongst the leaves. You cannot speak to him, try as you might. I know. I have my own ghosts, Bran. A brother that I loved, a brother that I hated, a woman I desired. Through the trees, I see them still, but no word of mine has ever reached them. The past remains the past. We can learn from it, but we cannot change it.”
“Will I see my father again?”
“Once you have mastered your gifts, you may look where you will and see what the trees have seen, be it yesterday or last year or a thousand ages past. Men live their lives trapped in an eternal present, between the mists of memory and the sea of shadow that is all we know of the days to come. Certain moths live their whole lives in a day, yet to them that little span of time must seem as long as years and decades do to us. An oak may live three hundred years, a redwood tree three thousand. A weirwood will live forever if left undisturbed. To them seasons pass in the flutter of a moth’s wing, and past, present, and future are one. Nor will your sight be limited to your godswood. The singers carved eyes into their heart trees to awaken them, and those are the first eyes a new greenseer learns to use … but in time you will see well beyond the trees themselves.”
“When?” Bran wanted to know.
“In a year, or three, or ten. That I have not glimpsed. It will come in time, I promise you. But I am tired now, and the trees are calling me. We will resume on the morrow.”
Hodor carried Bran back to his chamber, muttering “Hodor” in a low voice as Leaf went before them with a torch. He had hoped that Meera and Jojen would be there, so he could tell them what he had seen, but their snug alcove in the rock was cold and empty. Hodor eased Bran down onto his bed, covered him with furs, and made a fire for them. A thousand eyes, a hundred skins, wisdom deep as the roots of ancient trees.
Watching the flames, Bran decided he would stay awake till Meera came back. Jojen would be unhappy, he knew, but Meera would be glad for him, He did not remember closing his eyes.
 … but then somehow he was back at Winterfell again, in the godswood looking down upon his father. Lord Eddard seemed much younger this time. His hair was brown, with no hint of grey in it, his head bowed. “… let them grow up close as brothers, with only love between them,” he prayed, “and let my lady wife find it in her heart to forgive …”
“Father.” Bran’s voice was a whisper in the wind, a rustle in the leaves. “Father, it’s me. It’s Bran. Brandon.”
Eddard Stark lifted his head and looked long at the weirwood, frowning, but he did not speak. He cannot see me, Bran realized, despairing. He wanted to reach out and touch him, but all that he could do was watch and listen. I am in the tree. I am inside the heart tree, looking out of its red eyes, but the weirwood cannot talk, so I can’t.
Eddard Stark resumed his prayer. Bran felt his eyes fill up with tears. But were they his own tears, or the weirwood’s? If I cry, will the tree begin to weep?
The rest of his father’s words were drowned out by a sudden clatter of wood on wood. Eddard Stark dissolved, like mist in a morning sun. Now two children danced across the godswood, hooting at one another as they dueled with broken branches. The girl was the older and taller of the two. Arya! Bran thought eagerly, as he watched her leap up onto a rock and cut at the boy. But that couldn’t be right. If the girl was Arya, the boy was Bran himself, and he had never worn his hair so long. And Arya never beat me playing swords, the way that girl is beating him. She slashed the boy across his thigh, so hard that his leg went out from under him and he fell into the pool and began to splash and shout. “You be quiet, stupid,” the girl said, tossing her own branch aside. “It’s just water. Do you want Old Nan to hear and run tell Father?” She knelt and pulled her brother from the pool, but before she got him out again, the two of them were gone.
After that the glimpses came faster and faster, till Bran was feeling lost and dizzy. He saw no more of his father, nor the girl who looked like Arya, but a woman heavy with child emerged naked and dripping from the black pool, knelt before the tree, and begged the old gods for a son who would avenge her. Then there came a brown-haired girl slender as a spear who stood on the tips of her toes to kiss the lips of a young knight as tall as Hodor. A dark-eyed youth, pale and fierce, sliced three branches off the weirwood and shaped them into arrows. The tree itself was shrinking, growing smaller with each vision, whilst the lesser trees dwindled into saplings and vanished, only to be replaced by other trees that would dwindle and vanish in their turn. And now the lords Bran glimpsed were tall and hard, stern men in fur and chain mail. Some wore faces he remembered from the statues in the crypts, but they were gone before he could put a name to them.
Then, as he watched, a bearded man forced a captive down onto his knees before the heart tree. A white-haired woman stepped toward them through a drift of dark red leaves, a bronze sickle in her hand.
“No,” said Bran, “no, don’t,” but they could not hear him, no more than his father had. The woman grabbed the captive by the hair, hooked the sickle round his throat, and slashed. And through the mist of centuries the broken boy could only watch as the man’s feet drummed against the earth … but as his life flowed out of him in a red tide, Brandon Stark could taste the blood.

